Tensei Shitara Slime Datta Ken




(転 生 し た ら ス ラ イ イ ム だ っ 件)





Volume 10


Arc Perang Besar Tenma





Sekering


(伏 瀬)





Deskripsi cerita:





Mikami Satoru adalah seorang dewasa, 37 tahun yang sukses yang memiliki dua masalah: dia tidak pernah punya pacar; dan, saat bertemu rekannya di jalan, Satoru ditusuk secara fatal. Hasil? Dia bereinkarnasi sebagai lendir. Apakah itu akan menjadi kemalangan ketiganya atau berkat?





Cerita Asli dapat ditemukan di sini: Tautan





Bab 186: Langkah Pertama


Segera setelah Rimuru pergi untuk menyelamatkan Veldora, mereka yang telah ditinggalkan segera berubah menjadi reorganisasi darurat.

Mereka memasuki keadaan siaga tinggi di bawah komando Benimaru sehingga situasi apa pun yang mungkin muncul dapat ditangani dengan cepat.

Reorganisasi selesai dengan cepat tanpa insiden apa pun segera setelah Invasi Kekaisaran. Namun, itu mengecualikan orang-orang yang menerima efek evolusi.

Benimaru mengkonfirmasi bahwa reorganisasi selesai, dengan Souei dan Shion, mereka bertiga telah membuat pengaturan.

Gabil kembali ke gua karena evolusi, Gerudo pergi ke pertemuan di Markas Besar Militer Kekaisaran untuk mengaturnya.

Pertahanan Tempest dengan absennya Rimuru ditinggalkan oleh yang tertinggal.

Wajar jika Benimaru dan Shion bertindak seperti biasa karena mereka tidak terpengaruh oleh evolusi.

Mereka memiliki beberapa keraguan meyakini bahwa "Naga" yang agung itu telah jatuh ke tangan musuh, tetapi mereka tidak perlu khawatir tentang hal itu karena tuan mereka sudah pergi untuk menghadapi situasi ini.

Karena tuan mereka, Raja Iblis Rimuru, adalah yang terkuat dari Raja Iblis yang memiliki kekuatan dan wawasan menakutkan hingga tingkat yang tidak normal.

Selama Rimuru tidak ada, mereka percaya bahwa kemungkinan terjadinya masalah akan sangat tinggi.

「Benimaru …… Apakah baik-baik saja? Anda tahu, yang itu. Bagaimana pekerjaan Anda sebagai ketua? 」

「Wa! Apa yang kamu katakan, Shion! Dalam keadaan darurat ini, aku terlalu sibuk untuk memikirkan hal itu !? 」

Untuk pertanyaan yang agak blak-blakan tentang Shion, yang terlalu mementingkan urusan orang lain, Benimaru berusaha menghindari pertanyaan itu sambil gemetaran.

Namun, dia tidak berhasil dan tempat itu dipenuhi dengan suasana yang canggung.

Alasan untuk ini adalah pernikahannya (mengikat jiwa) dengan Momiji, yang telah disetujui pada saat pesta perayaan kemenangan. Itu dirayakan saat itu, tetapi ada berbagai tradisi yang belum berakhir.

Dia juga prihatin tentang ini, tetapi Benimaru berpikir bahwa dia harus menahan diri sampai segera mencapai keadaan seperti itu.

Di atas segalanya, situasi segera berkembang menjadi keadaan darurat setelah serangan Guy dan mengamuk Veldora. Dia tidak punya waktu untuk memikirkan hal-hal seperti itu sekarang.

Akhirnya, mereka bisa memiliki ketenangan yang relatif singkat.

Meskipun, iblis-iblis (kelompok Diablo) dipanggil dengan pemindahan belum lama ini dan hanya membuat serangan mendadak, ini tidak mengubah fakta bahwa ia tidak bisa membiarkan penjagaannya turun jika terjadi sesuatu yang terjadi kemudian.

Kata-kata yang diucapkan oleh Benimaru benar tetapi,

「Tidak, itu tugas penting.

Benimaru, karena saat ini tidak diketahui apa yang akan terjadi selanjutnya, saya pikir Anda harus melakukan hal yang dapat Anda lakukan sebelumnya. 」

Souei yang mendengar percakapan itu mendesak Benimaru.

Lagi pula, dalam situasi ini ia entah bagaimana akan memberikan alasan untuk menunda masalah. Untuk Souei yang telah lama berkenalan dengannya, dia jelas memahami pikiran teman-teman dekatnya.

「Namun, kamu ...... Meskipun Rimuru-sama pergi ke garis depan, hanya aku yang berada di sana――」

Seperti menyerah, Benimaru berpendapat dengan keras,

「Tidak akan ada masalah. Ada 12 Lord Guardian dengan beberapa lainnya berdiri di sini.

Bawahan saya mengatakan bahwa mereka tidak mendapatkan highlight yang cukup, sehingga kami dapat mengatasinya bahkan jika Anda tidak di sini.

Terlepas dari itu, semakin cepat Anda melakukannya dan bangun, Anda bisa menjadi lebih berguna bagi Rimuru-sama, kan? 」

「Aku tahu itu tapi ...... Bagaimana denganmu, Shion?

Kenapa kamu tidak bisa berevolusi? Apa alasanmu? 」

Shion mengejar dan membuat serangan lebih lanjut pada Benimaru. Tapi, dia diminta kembali.

Keduanya saling memandang dan tempat itu menjadi semakin canggung.

Souei mengungkapkan kekecewaannya dan mendesah,

「Benimaru, tidak apa-apa mempercayakan tempat ini kepada kita. Saat ini, saya sudah memperkuat pengawasan di berbagai tempat.

Jika ada tanda-tanda gerakan, kita bisa segera menghadapinya. Anda harus memenuhi tugas Anda. 」

Dia mendukung Benimaru yang masih kurang tekad.

Setelah pertukaran singkat selesai, Benimaru memutuskan untuk menemani Momiji menuju desa melewati batas untuk menyambut tetua Tengu.

Faktor penentu untuk ini adalah laporan bahwa Rimuru telah berhasil membebaskan Veldora.

Souei dan Shion saling memandang dan mendesah lega.

Benimaru yang merupakan kepala sejak mereka masih Ogres, adalah keberadaan penting di antara teman-teman mereka.

Dan, itu serupa untuk Shion yang berasal dari ras yang sama.

Jadi, Benimaru akhirnya ditentukan karena dorongan keduanya.

Namun, seolah-olah memilih waktu ketika Benimaru akan pergi, satu orang mulai bertindak.

Tindakan ini menjadi langkah pertama untuk perang besar yang akan datang.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Suasana riang pesta perayaan kemenangan berubah total seiring dengan pergantian peristiwa.

Bahkan untuk Ramiris yang telah kembali ke bagian terdalam labirin.

Ramiris dalam semangat tinggi sebagai evolusi bawahannya, raja naga, selesai tanpa insiden juga. Namun, ketika dia mendengar bahwa gurunya Veldora telah ditangkap oleh musuh, bahkan kegembiraannya menghilang dan membuatnya tampak tidak nyaman.

Ramiris ingin menghabiskan setiap hari dengan bahagia. Dia memikirkan tempat yang mengabulkan harapan ini sebagai yang indah.

Ramiris telah menghabiskan waktu lama sendirian mengalihkan perhatiannya dari kesepian dengan keberadaan roh, jadi dia tidak pernah ingin kehilangan sesuatu yang telah menjadi begitu penting baginya.

Karena itu, bisa dikatakan bahwa orang yang paling mengkhawatirkan masalah Veldora adalah dia.

「Ya ampun! Guru benar-benar mengecewakan penjaganya. Saya yakin akan hal itu.

Sungguh, ya ampun. Mau bagaimana lagi, jika dia ceroboh, Guru harusnya tak terkalahkan ....... 」

Ramiris bergumam di dalam laboratorium di lapisan bawah tempat ia menghabiskan banyak waktu bersama Veldora.

Dia terbang berputar-putar di dalam ruangan tanpa ada tanda-tanda dia akan tenang.

Hal yang akhirnya menenangkan Ramiris adalah laporan dari Shuna yang mengatakan bahwa Veldora akhirnya dibebaskan dengan aman.

「Yah saya percaya bahwa guru akan baik-baik saja!

Ketika Rimuru melakukannya, tidak ada yang perlu dikhawatirkan 」

Dia selesai mengatakan hal seperti itu dengan luar biasa dan minum jus itu dengan gembira.

"Ya, ya begitu." Jadi Shinji dan rekannya mengelak.

Beretta, yang berdiri di samping Ramiris, tidak menunjukkan perilaku gelisah sejak awal saat dia terus merawat tuannya yang tidak tenang.

(Aku harus sedikit mengikuti contoh Beretta-san, aku harus sedikit tenang ……)

Shinji memiliki kesan seperti itu terhadap majikannya, tetapi dia tidak pernah mengatakannya. Jika dia mengatakan hal seperti itu, itu akan membangkitkan kemarahan yang tidak perlu dan gajinya mungkin berkurang.

(Meski begitu, Shuna-san indah seperti biasa ~)

Shinji mengusir pikiran itu dengan cepat, karena tidak dapat membantu, bahkan jika dia memikirkan majikannya.

Bahkan sosok Shuna yang membungkuk ketika meninggalkan ruangan, bermartabat dan tidak memiliki cacat. Penampilannya tampak halus, tetapi itu adalah cerita terkenal bahwa dia menakutkan jika Anda membuatnya marah.

Bukan hanya Shinji, tetapi Mark dan para pembantu baru, Michel dan Raymond, yang juga merindukan Shuna.

Setelah Shuna meninggalkan kamar, dia melihat majikannya Ramiris.

Dia secara tidak sengaja menghela nafas.

「...... Tunggu sebentar, Shinji. Jika Anda memiliki sesuatu untuk dikatakan, saya akan mendengarkan? 」

「Tidak, tidak ada apa-apa.」

Dia membantah panik. Perasaannya sepertinya telah muncul di wajahnya.

「Kontrol Anda atas emosi Anda masih kurang!」

Gadra-roushi yang merupakan tuannya telah memarahinya tentang hal ini, tetapi dia sekarang yakin.

Tentu saja dia tidak terlalu pandai mengendalikan emosinya, yang sangat diperlukan oleh seorang penyihir. Dia ingin belajar dari Xing yang tanpa ekspresi.

Oh well, mungkin tidak sopan membandingkan Shuna dengan Ramiris.

Sama seperti, orang dewasa untuk seorang anak. Sebaliknya, tampaknya ada perbedaan lebih lanjut.

Karena meskipun penampilan Shuna masih terlihat seperti seorang gadis muda, sikapnya adalah orang dewasa yang halus.

Meskipun dia tampak hidup selama bertahun-tahun sekarang, Ramiris, yang memiliki penampilan dan pikiran seorang anak, tidak tahan menghadapi Shuna.

Dia berpikir bahwa Ramiris lucu (menyedihkan) dan bahwa dia harus memperlakukannya dengan lebih baik.

Namun, Shinji ingat keadaan pesta perayaan kemenangan belum lama ini.

Sebuah laporan yang tidak pada tempatnya mengatakan bahwa keberadaan seperti dewa [1] bernama Veldora ditangkap oleh musuh datang tiba-tiba, tetapi serangkaian peristiwa selama pesta perayaan kemenangan berada di luar kemampuan pikirannya untuk memahaminya.

Iblis memiliki kekuatan yang tak terbayangkan.

Mereka berjanji kesetiaan mereka kepada Demon Lord Rimuru.

Shinji adalah seorang Otherworlder dan dia sombong dalam berpikir bahwa dia mungkin eksistensi tingkat tinggi. Tetapi setelah dia melihat pemandangan itu, pikiran seperti itu tersapu.

Dia mengerti bahwa potensi perang pasukan Kerajaan yang datang untuk menyerang Tempest kurang dari 30% dari total pasukan Tempest.

Selain itu, ini adalah kisah yang sepenuhnya dari sebelum pesta perayaan kemenangan.

Saat ini, mereka dapat berevolusi lebih lanjut berdasarkan judul mereka. Eksekutif Tempest tampaknya mulai berkembang menjadi Kelas Demon Lord yang Terbangun.

Sejujurnya, dia tidak mengerti artinya.

Tetapi mereka benar-benar senang bahwa mereka membawa seorang pengungsi dari Kekaisaran ke Tempest! Jadi Shinji mengucapkan terima kasih sekali lagi pada Gadora-roushi.

Seperti itu, mengetahui keamanan Veldora, kelompok Ramiris dan Shinji lega.

「Eh, Dino-san? Kemana kamu pergi?

Itu mengingatkan saya ...... Rimuru-sama sedang mencari Anda, Anda tahu? 」

「Ah, burukku burukku. Itu hanya bisnis kecil. Ngomong-ngomong, apakah Ramiris ada di sini? 」

Percakapan seperti itu terdengar.

Dino yang hilang hilang kembali, dan Mark sepertinya memperhatikannya.

「Ah, Dino! Hei kamu, apa yang telah kamu lakukan? Rimuru mencarimu dalam kemarahan, kau tahu !? 」

Ramiris berhenti minum jusnya dan terbang, dia akan menuju Dino.

Dan kemudian, Dino menegaskannya,

「Apa yang ingin Anda lakukan, Dino-sama?」

Tangan Dino yang mengulurkan tangan di depan Ramiris langsung dicengkeram oleh Beretta dari samping.

Meskipun Dino bergerak dengan kecepatan yang bahkan Shinji dan rekannya tidak bisa ikuti dengan mata mereka, Beretta sepertinya mencegahnya.

Tampaknya karena reaksinya terlalu cepat, mereka hanya bisa mengimbanginya dengan menebak.

「...... Begitukah, kamu masih di sini ya. Oh sayang, Ada banyak hambatan nyata di tempat ini. 」

Dino mendesah seolah dia bosan sambil menatap Beretta dengan mata tertutup sebagian.

Akhirnya Shinji dan kawan-kawan memahami situasinya, tampaknya situasinya bukan masalah sepele.

Namun, seseorang masih tidak mengejar situasi,

「…… Eh? Eh !? 」

Ramiris memandang Beretta dan Dino secara bergantian, dia tampaknya berusaha mati-matian untuk memahami situasinya.

Shinji bergerak cepat dan berdiri dalam posisi untuk melindungi Ramiris di samping Beretta.

Demikian pula, Xing juga bergerak tetapi Mark pingsan di tempatnya.

Dino mungkin telah melenyapkan Mark, karena dia adalah penghalang, ketika dia mengulurkan tangannya ke arah Ramiris.

Markus, sama seperti Shinji, adalah bawahan Ramiris. Karena itu kebangunan rohani adalah mungkin bahkan jika dia mati ..... meskipun begitu, Shinji tidak dapat menahan dirinya karena temannya terbunuh.

Shinji terbakar amarah,

"Hei kau! Apa yang kamu lakukan tiba-tiba? 」

Dia bertanya pada Dino.

Namun, Dino hanya menatap Ramiris tanpa mempertimbangkan Shinji atau orang lain ......

「" Manajer "Ramiris, waktunya telah tiba.

Bahkan Anda yang kehilangan ingatan dan bermutasi tidak boleh membahayakan orang itu.

Jika saya mengubur Anda sekarang, labirin ini akan disegel.

Iblis di labirin ini terlalu berbahaya.

Jika Anda tidak berguna, setidaknya jangan menjadi penghalang, jadi tolong mati dengan patuh―― 」

Dengan wajah serius, dia mengatakan itu pada Ramiris.

Tapi,

"Hah? Anda, apakah Anda kehilangan akal sehat?

Mengatakan hal seperti itu, jika aku memberi tahu Guy, dia akan mengalahkanmu, kau tahu? 」

Dia ditolak datar oleh kata-kata Ramiris.

Dino yang mendengarnya mulai tertawa.

"Betul. Seperti yang diharapkan, saya pikir Anda akan mengatakannya.

Tapi sebenarnya ...... aku serius.

Meskipun dengan enggan, saya adalah eksistensi yang diciptakan dengan tujuan "Pengamat [2]".

Sebenarnya, aku tidak mau bekerja.

Dunia di mana saya tidak perlu bekerja adalah cita-cita, ya, begitulah.

Karena hal seperti itu, silakan coba yang terbaik untuk menolak.

Tapi, aku juga tidak bisa berhemat.

Karena ada "Pengamat" lain selain saya, jadi cobalah yang terbaik yang Anda bisa dan mengusir saya 」

Seolah-olah ekspresinya yang biasa adalah malas dan riang, dia mengulangi kata-katanya sambil melambaikan tangannya.

Tapi, berbeda dengan perilaku seperti itu, atmosfer Dino berubah menjadi orang yang halus.

Karena segala sesuatunya telah terjadi, Ramiris tampaknya akhirnya menyadari kenyataan.

"Menunggumu! Anda sepertinya mengatakannya dengan serius.

Ada keberanian yang Anda miliki, saya akan menjadi lawan Anda.

Karena aku memiliki Raja Naga sebagai bawahanku! 」

「Ah, tentang mereka.

Jika mereka muncul, itu akan sangat merepotkan, karena Anda tidak dapat membunuh mereka di dalam labirin kan?

Karena itu, saya akan membuat mereka tidur.

Evolusi mereka tampaknya tidak selesai sepenuhnya, itu bagus karena kemampuan saya efektif.

Saya dapat menghapus rintangan tanpa mendapatkan masalah.

Saat ini, satu-satunya orang yang terbangun di dalam labirin adalah kami berdua. 」

「Haa? Hal seperti itu......"

「Yaitu, itu dengan kemampuanku, Keterampilan Utama『 Raja Belphegor yang malas 』, aku membuat labirin ini tertidur!」

"Terserah! Kirim dia ke ujungnya, Beretta-san! 」

Teriak Ramiris, tidak tahu apa yang mempengaruhinya.

Dino juga,

「Silakan bertahan selama mungkin dan mengambil beberapa langkah defensif!」

Dia mulai menyerang Beretta sambil mengucapkan kata-kata itu.

Itu sangat tiba-tiba, laboratorium yang memiliki ruang yang sangat besar berubah menjadi medan perang.

Dino tampaknya mengungkapkan keadaan pribadinya secara intens, tetapi Shinji berpikir bahwa Dino ini adalah seorang pria yang tidak akan pernah bisa ia pahami.

Meskipun Ramiris tidak cukup sadar untuk memikirkan hal seperti itu, tidak perlu membicarakannya.

Datang dari Dino, tidak perlu menunda waktu, karena waktu sangat berharga.

Dia berpikir tentang bagaimana mereka gagal memperhatikan bahwa dia membocorkan informasi karena dia diterima sebagai kawan.

Namun meski begitu, dia tidak bisa mempercayainya karena dia mungkin bermaksud menipu orang.

Pikiran lain adalah bahwa Dino percaya semuanya akan baik-baik saja jika dia melenyapkan semua orang.

Namun, jika itu masalahnya maka waktu sangat berharga, tidak ada gunanya membocorkan informasi.

Sungguh, dia tidak bisa diandalkan sebagai sekutu tapi bisa dikatakan bahwa dia akan menjadi tipe orang yang lebih merepotkan sebagai musuh.

Pertempuran antara Dino dan Beretta tumbuh lebih intens sementara analisis seperti dari Shinji adalah masalah yang tidak terkait.

Ini menjadi pertempuran awal Perang Besar.

* * *

[1] Keberadaan di atas awan.

[2] 監視 者 Kanshisha = Pengamat, Pengamat, Pengawas, Pengawas.





Bab 187: Orang Yang Mengamati


Menariknya dari udara tipis, Dino mengangkat pedang besar yang sebanding dengan ukuran dirinya.

Pedang bermata satu tebal dan lebar, tampaknya memiliki kekuatan membunuh yang tinggi dan mampu menghancurkan musuh dengan beratnya.

Senjata besar yang tidak cocok dengan peralatan ringan seperti baju besi kulit, itu adalah pedang hebat kelas Dewa yang bertuliskan nama "Crumbling Fang".

Beretta, di sisi lain, benar-benar tangan kosong; Namun, tubuhnya terdiri dari Baja Setan yang awalnya dibuat oleh Rimuru.

Tetapi pada saat ini, sebagai hasil dari bentuknya beradaptasi dengan baik dengan kekuatan sihir Beretta, bahan telah berubah menjadi Adamantite (Bio-Demon Steel) mirip dengan milik Zegion.

Ketika kekuatan sihir beredar di dalam dirinya, itu [1] telah menjadi senjata mematikan yang memiliki kekuatan lebih kuat daripada senjata kelas Legend.

Ketangguhannya tak tertandingi di labirin sampai-sampai senjata biasa tidak bisa menggoresnya. Itu Beretta.

Melawan Dino yang menggunakan senjata, itu tidak berarti bahwa Beretta, yang tidak bersenjata, berada pada posisi yang kurang menguntungkan.

Namun, kemampuan ofensif senjata Dino tampaknya melebihi kemampuan pertahanan Beretta.

Dengan demikian, Dino bergerak dengan ringan untuk memecah ketegangan yang membentang di antara keduanya.

Beretta dengan terampil menangkal serangan pedang Dino meskipun tidak bersenjata.

Tanpa menerima serangan lebih dulu, Beretta memimpin Dino dengan gerakan yang menyatukan serangan dan pertahanan.

Sementara serangan Dino hanya berasal dari pedang, seluruh tubuh Beretta adalah senjata. Tidak bersenjata tidak menjadi kerugian - sebaliknya, itu memungkinkannya untuk menggunakan lebih banyak metode menyerang.

Bagi Beretta, yang merupakan Chaos Doll, transformasi atribut adalah keahliannya.

Dia mengarahkan atribut Suci ke tempat yang diadaptasi untuk serangan atribut setan. Dengan demikian, posisi Dino ditutup oleh Baretta Holy Barrier yang dilokalkan untuk penggunaan anti-individu.

Dia menghadapi Dino dengan gerakan yang diperhitungkan sehingga dia mendapatkan keuntungan.

Tapi, keadaan sebenarnya Beretta adalah situasi di mana dia nyaris tidak mempertahankan operasi rumit saat ini mirip dengan memasukkan jarum.

Bagaimanapun, serangan atribut, baik Suci dan Iblis, tidak menjadi pukulan yang menentukan.

Dino adalah Malaikat Jatuh. Dia awalnya eksistensi atribut Suci yang berubah menjadi atribut Iblis, jadi dia harus lemah terhadap atribut Suci.

Tetapi untuk Dino, Suci dan bahkan Iblis adalah atribut yang akrab baginya. Karena itu, ia tidak memiliki kelemahan.

Beretta terselamatkan oleh fakta bahwa Dino tidak bisa menangani kedua atribut itu.

Juga, ini adalah situasi di mana hanya satu pukulan perpaduan kedua atribut oleh Keterampilan Unik Beretta 『Holy-Demonic Fusion somehow entah bagaimana dapat menyebabkan kerusakan padanya.

Di sisi lain, bahkan jika itu hanya serangan pedang, serangan tunggal itu bisa memotong Beretta dengan mudah.

Kekuatan Adamantite menjadi sangat tidak berdaya di depan senjata kelas Dewa.

Sepintas, Beretta telah melanjutkan pertempuran dalam posisi menguntungkan tetapi situasinya dapat segera dibalik dengan satu gerakan yang salah.

Beretta, yang memahami situasi ini dengan baik, mengabdikan dirinya untuk mengulur waktu dan membeli, karena ia tidak berjuang untuk kemenangan.

Dia mengerti bahwa dia tidak bisa menang melawan Dino, tetapi kemenangan baginya bukanlah kekalahan lawannya.

Tentu saja, akan sangat bagus baginya untuk menang, tetapi kemenangan sejati dalam situasi ini adalah penyelesaian tugasnya melindungi Ramiris.

Selama dia bisa melindungi Ramiris, maka bahkan jika dia dikalahkan, adalah mungkin baginya untuk bangkit kembali nanti.

Karena itu, Beretta memprioritaskan mengulur waktu di atas segalanya, dan karena itu ia memilih strategi yang mengandalkan, berpotensi mengorbankan dirinya sendiri, yang berarti bahwa ia tidak boleh menjadi tidak sabar saat berurusan dengan serangan Dino.

Dino, di sisi lain, secara akurat melihat niat Beretta.

Namun, mengatakan bahwa dia akan menghancurkannya hanya karena dia melihatnya, bukan itu masalahnya.

Apa yang dia hanya perlu waspadai adalah serangan gabungan oleh 『Holy-Demonic Fusion』.

Aura yang menjalin atribut suci dan atribut iblis yang mengenakan tubuh Beretta bisa menyerang dan menembus pertahanan atribut.

Pada dasarnya, bertahan melawan serangan ini tidak mungkin. Dia pasti akan menerima kerusakan kecuali dia melampauinya dengan kemauan dan kekuatan sihirnya.

Meskipun itu hanya Keterampilan Unik, itu luar biasa karena bisa merusak Dino, yang memiliki Keterampilan Ultimate.

Dia harus memuji kemampuan ofensif tinggi-Beretta-nya yang sejauh mengejutkan.

Namun, kemampuan ini tidak digunakan di pertahanan.

Karena kemampuan pertahanannya yang terlalu tinggi, dia tampaknya miskin dalam teknik pertahanan diri.

Saat ini Beretta berhadapan dengan baik terhadap serangan Dino, tetapi itu hanya karena Dino tetap berhati-hati dalam menerima serangan Beretta.

Jika Dino berubah menjadi menyerang dengan serius, Beretta pasti tidak akan selamat dengan selamat.

Dino dengan hati-hati memastikan bahwa Beretta tidak memiliki benda tersembunyi.

Ini sangat menyusahkan tetapi itu adalah pekerjaan yang diperlukan untuk menetralisir Beretta di tempat ini.

Pokoknya, Beretta akan segera hidup kembali bahkan jika dia terbunuh.

Itulah yang menyebabkan dia membuat penjaga setiap lantai labirin tidur.

Dia bisa membunuh orang jika mereka bukan salah satu dari bawahan Ramiris dengan menghancurkan 'Gelang Kebangkitan' mereka, tetapi jika bawahannya terbunuh maka mereka akan bangkit kembali.

Kemampuan yang sangat merepotkan yang diberikan kepada Ramiris.

Oleh karena itu, Dino tidak mengalahkan bawahan Ramiris di dalam labirin, tetapi sebaliknya, dia menetralisir mereka. Diperlukan untuk membunuh Ramiris yang merupakan fondasi jika kesempatan seperti itu muncul.

(Ini benar-benar merepotkan. Bahkan melawan Beretta sendiri membutuhkan banyak usaha ……)

Ngomong-ngomong, pada awalnya Dino tidak memahami bahwa upacara evolusi diadakan di pesta perayaan kemenangan.

Dengan permintaan dari Yuuki, ia menghubungi Guy di tengah pesta perayaan kemenangan dan berencana untuk menyebabkan bentrokan antara dirinya dan Rimuru.

Dan kemudian dia melihat situasi sambil bersembunyi sehingga dia tidak terlibat di dalamnya.

Semuanya adalah bagian dari rencana Yuuki, jadi dia berada dalam posisi untuk bekerja sama dengannya.

Rencananya berjalan dengan baik, dan ada pertanda bahwa Guy tampaknya mulai mengamuk. Tapi, Guy membuka hatinya. Menjadi damai untuk beberapa alasan dan dia menyadari bahwa rencana itu gagal.

"Jika keadaan seperti ini, bahkan tindakan mata-mata saya akan terpapar," untungnya, dino memutuskan untuk mundur pada waktu yang tepat ... ...

Dia memperhatikan bahwa keadaan di dalam labirin itu aneh.

Itu menjadi sunyi seolah telah tertidur.

Itu adalah kesempatannya.

Demi dia melayani tokoh itu - orang yang terbaring dalam Yuuki - keberadaan Ramiris telah menjadi hambatan.

Dia tidak secara pribadi tidak menyukai Ramiris, tetapi dia yang hidup sesuka hatinya seperti dia lupa peran aslinya menjadi keberadaan yang berbahaya bagi tuan Dino.

Tidak, lebih tepatnya itu bukan Ramiris yang berbahaya ...... itu labirin yang dia buat yang terlalu berbahaya.

Labirin dengan banyak Iblis menyaingi Dewa Iblis abadi yang hidup di dalamnya.

Itu bukan tempat yang tidak bisa ditembus.

Belum lagi, penelitian teknologi terbaru yang bisa disebut inti dari peradaban yang hilang itu dilakukan di bagian terdalam labirin.

Karena potensi perang biasa yang menyerangnya dari depan untuk menghancurkan fasilitas penelitian tentu saja tidak dapat diraih.

Jadi, perlu untuk menyegel labirin dengan biaya berapa pun.

Cara paling sederhana untuk itu adalah menghapus Ramiris. Dino memutuskan bahwa dia tidak punya waktu untuk memikirkan cara lain.

Yuuki selalu menganggap labirin itu berbahaya.

Juga, kemampuan Ramiris.

Bisa dikatakan bahwa ketika seseorang terjebak di dalam labirin dan pintu masuk ditutup, melarikan diri akan sulit.

Ramiris '『Labyrinth Creation』 adalah kemampuan yang terlalu berbahaya, karena ini adalah sekilas kemampuan yang menciptakan dunia.

Dino juga setuju dengan pemikiran ini.

Karena itu, ia perlu membunuh Ramiris di tempat ini.

Ketika ia merampas kekuatan fisik orang-orang kuat di labirin, mereka tertidur dengan cukup mudah.

Jika saat ini, tidak akan ada hambatan yang datang.

Dia sedikit menyesal tentang membunuh Ramiris karena dia adalah teman dekat, tetapi meskipun demikian, dia tidak ragu-ragu.

「Beretta, kamu melakukannya dengan baik. Tidurlah sekarang, “Fallen Hypno (Slothful Sleep)” !! 」

Dino, tanpa ragu-ragu, melepaskan kemampuan Ultimate Skill-nya yang sekarang dapat digunakan kembali [2].

Induksi hipnosis yang kuat.

Menolaknya dengan tekad tidak berguna. Bagi mereka yang membutuhkan istirahat, mereka pasti akan jatuh ke dalam tidur yang kekal.

Itu adalah kemampuan terkuat Dino yang memberikan efek jangkauan luas.

Karena Dino tahu bahwa itu tidak ada artinya bahkan jika dia membunuh Beretta, dia menjatuhkan Beretta dengan efek kemampuan.

Sama halnya dengan dia, bahkan Ramiris yang sedang dilindungi tertidur di bawah pengaruh kemampuan Dino.

「Serius ada terlalu banyak orang kuat di tempat ini. Sungguh, sungguh menyebalkan ... 」

Mengkonfirmasi bahwa Beretta telah runtuh, Dino bergumam.

Dia melirik Ramiris yang sedang tidur nyenyak,

「Sebenarnya, aku tidak ingin melakukan hal seperti ini ..... tapi aku tidak menyuruhmu memaafkanku.

Selamat tinggal, Ramiris. 」

(EN: sayonara ditulis dalam katakana di sini, untuk beberapa alasan. Mungkin hanya ada di sana untuk membuatnya lebih dramatis?)

Dengan cahaya kejam di matanya, Dino, tanpa ragu-ragu, mengulurkan tangannya ke arah Ramiris――

Setan adalah ras yang tidak perlu tidur

Karena itu, Beretta nyaris tidak berhasil melawan kemampuan Dino.

Dia melindungi Ramiris dari tangan tombak Dino yang bersinar menggunakan tubuhnya sebagai perisai.

Tangan tombak Dino menembus tubuh Adamantite Beretta dengan mudah.

Dia tampaknya tidak peduli dengan kekuatan pertahanan Beretta karena saat ini dia tidak mengenakan pertahanan kekuatan sihir.

Alih-alih mengatakan dia berhasil menolak kemampuan, dia tidak perlu tidur.

Dia secara paksa membuat Beretta memasuki Mode Tidur dan Beretta sudah tidak memiliki kemampuan tempur.

Tapi,

「Fu, fufufu. Saya sengaja membiarkan inti saya dihancurkan. Akibatnya, sekarang saya akan mati dan hidup kembali dengan sempurna.

Masih belum berakhir, Dino. Aku tidak akan membiarkanmu membunuh tuanku! 」

Suara Beretta tidak memiliki tanda-tanda keputusasaan dan diyakinkan dengan kemenangan mereka.

"Menipu. Selama waktu kecil sampai Anda bangkit, tidak ada halangan bagi saya untuk membunuh Ramiris! 」

Teriak Dino, menyangkal kata-kata Beretta.

Namun, kepercayaan diri Beretta tepat.

Sementara dia mengulur waktu untuk membeli, situasinya telah membaik menjadi lebih baik.

Daripada, di tempat pertama ini di dalam labirin ini――

「Tidak, saya tidak akan membiarkan Anda melakukannya.

"Gehenna Lord (Dark Soul Lord)" Adalman ini akan menjadi lawanmu! 」

Satu orang— Tidak, satu kerangka memasuki Ruang Penelitian seolah menanggapi suara Dino.

「Saya meminta Anda untuk menunda dia, Adalman.」

Ketika Beretta memanggilnya dengan kepercayaan, dia menjadi partikel cahaya dan menghilang.

Adalman mengangguk dan mulai mengambil alih pertarungan.

Di dalam labirin, pertempuran kedua telah dimulai.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Dia benar-benar muak dengan ini.

Itu bukan kesan palsu Dino.

Bahkan Adalman bukan ancaman bagi Dino. Namun, tanpa menghancurkan "Gelang Kebangkitan" nya, Adalman tidak dapat dibunuh sepenuhnya.

Sebaliknya, dari pihak Adalman, bisa mengulur waktu untuk melawan Dino, yang berpangkat lebih tinggi, sudah cukup.

Apalagi,

「Apakah Anda punya waktu untuk membuang muka sekarang?」

Sebuah suara terdengar, dan tebasan yang tajam menyerempet pipi Dino.

Ini pedang Albert - yang muncul setelah Adalman - pedang.

Serangan tunggal dengan senjata kelas Dewa dari Albert, yang merupakan pendekar pedang terbaik.

Albert tampaknya belum menguasai armor itu, dan sudah pasti bahwa Dino masih menguntungkan ……

Serangan terhadap Adalman dikepung oleh dua orang - Albert dan Beretta yang dihidupkan kembali.

Dan kemudian, serangan keduanya mencapai Dino dengan bantuan Sihir Pemulihan dalam kategori Sihir Dukungan yang kuat.

Sihir tidak memengaruhi seseorang yang memiliki Keterampilan Tertinggi.

Dalam arti tertentu, ini adalah hasil alami karena Keterampilan Ultimate memiliki peringkat sihir yang lebih tinggi. Tapi, itu efektif bahkan jika itu hanya memberikan efek tidak langsung daripada langsung.

Dengan kata lain, melemahkan sihir dan sejenisnya tidak akan berhasil, tetapi memberikan dukungan kepada pelopor sekutu itu efektif.

Dan di samping itu, itu adalah efek gabungan dari 〈Sihir Mati〉 dengan 〈Sihir Ilahi〉 dari Adalman yang merupakan Kelas Grand Priest terbaik.

Beretta sudah bisa menunjukkan kemampuan yang melebihi ini beberapa waktu lalu, Albert juga dalam kondisi prima.

Pertukaran gerakan super spesial oleh dua pelopor yang dapat merusak bahkan bentuk kehidupan spiritual.

Mengenai tidur khusus, itu tidak berpengaruh karena Undead dan Demon tidak perlu tidur.

Dia, yang seharusnya berada pada peringkat yang jauh lebih tinggi, sedang berjuang keras melawan 3 orang dengan peringkat lebih rendah darinya, yang menyebabkan dia kehilangan kepercayaannya ........ “Sudahkah aku melemah karena kebiasaan malasku sejak lama? ”

Meskipun bisa dikatakan bahwa Dino masih memiliki ketenangan, bisa memikirkan pemikiran bercanda seperti itu.

"Diam! Namun kalian berdua datang untuk menyerang saya yang lemah, jangan katakan itu dengan bangga!

Sial! Lagipula kenapa? Waktunya terlalu baik, kau tahu !? 」

Ini terlalu banyak untuk Dino, waktu ketika Adalman muncul terlalu sempurna.

Itu tidak wajar bagi Adalman untuk muncul segera setelah Dino menggunakan serangan jarak jauh yang adalah "Fallen Hypno".

Sepertinya kedatangan serangan itu sudah diprediksi sejak awal ……

(Tidak, seperti yang diharapkan aku terlalu memikirkannya ...)

Dia menyangkal pikirannya sendiri, dan selesai berurusan dengan serangan dua pelopor itu.

Dino juga seorang pendekar pedang tingkat tinggi yang menyamai Albert dalam teknik pedang, yang memiliki Langkah Super-Spesial.

Namun, ia mampu bertarung secara merata karena kemampuan fisiknya daripada tekniknya.

Karena ino's Slothful King Belphegor D Dino memiliki kemampuan khusus untuk meningkatkan kekuatannya jika dia tidak bergerak.

Jika Anda mengatakannya dengan jelas, ia pada dasarnya dapat meningkatkan energinya dengan menghemat energinya.

Meskipun ada batas jumlah maksimum yang bisa dia keluarkan pada satu waktu, dia dapat menggunakannya secara sewenang-wenang dalam Mode Hyper untuk melampaui keadaan biasanya.

Dengan kemampuan itu, Dino bisa mendapatkan kekuatan bertarung luar biasa sementara.

Karena itu, karena dia masih memiliki kelebihan kekuatan, dia harus memastikan cara paling efisien untuk membunuh 3 orang di depannya .....

「Fuu, fuhahahahaha! Saya senang saya bahagia. Mungkin bukan masalah bahkan jika saya memberi tahu Anda.

Anda diamati, Anda tahu.

Itu wajar kan? Sudahkah Anda memikirkan tempat Anda sekarang?

Setelah semua, itu adalah wilayah dari Great Demon Lord Rimuru-sama. Anda tidak dapat melakukan apapun yang Anda inginkan.

Tentu saja, pertempuran ini juga sedang diamati (dipantau) 」

Adalman memberi tahu Dino sepenuhnya seolah-olah apa yang dikatakannya adalah fakta yang diketahui.

Tidak, jika dia lebih memikirkannya, dia juga akan setuju.

Bahkan Dino bisa melihat bahwa Raja Iblis Rimuru memiliki kecerdikan yang menakutkan, cukup untuk mengatur rencana yang sangat mendalam ini.

Jika itu masalahnya, bahkan jika mereka berhasil menolak "Fallen Hypno" pada awalnya, mereka tidak akan segera datang, dia mungkin perlu berhati-hati untuk menggunakannya kembali.

Karena Dino tahu bahwa mereka akan hidup kembali bahkan jika dia telah membunuh mereka, diharapkan dia pasti akan bertujuan untuk menetralisir mereka dengan serangan tidur.

Dan jika mereka memahami waktu penggunaannya kembali, dia tidak akan memiliki cara yang efektif untuk sepenuhnya membungkam mereka.

Di atas segalanya――

(Ini, aku ..... "Pengamat", sedang diamati, katanya !?)

――Itu memalukan.

Ini merangsang kebanggaan Dino, yang awalnya malas di alam, dan Adaman berhasil membuat Dino marah.

Itu adalah peraturan bagi Dino untuk mencapai hasil terbesar dengan sedikit usaha, oleh karena itu ia menghindari penggunaan kemampuan yang menghabiskan energi secara sia-sia.

Tapi, bukan berarti dia tidak akan melakukannya.

(Mungkin bagus jika aku mengakhirinya dengan cepat!)

Dino melepaskan semua kekuatannya dalam kemarahan, sifatnya yang tidak rela telah menghilang.

Dia membuat kesalahan terbesar dengan tidak menyadari siapa yang benar-benar diamati dan karena itu, dia tidak bisa membiarkan orang yang mengetahui informasi ini hidup.

「Ini merepotkan, tapi aku juga tidak bisa mengatakannya.

Jangan berpikir buruk tentang saya! "Bencana Jatuh (Godaan menuju Penghancuran)" !! 」

Hukum ditulis ulang, dan faktor positif mulai berubah menjadi minus.

Energi yang mengarah pada penangguhan aktivitas, terlepas dari hidup atau mati. Namun, karena tidak ada kekuatan yang memaksa, itu adalah target dari teknik yang secara sukarela berjalan di jalan menuju kehancuran.

Ini dapat dilihat sebagai semacam hipnotisme, tetapi efek yang disebabkan oleh kemampuan ini ada pada level yang berbeda.

Karena setiap orang yang gagal menolak ini pasti akan mati.

Titik bujukan kali ini adalah "Penghancuran", tetapi Dino bisa membuat target melakukan hasil tertentu dengan hipnosis. Itu adalah kemampuan serbaguna.

Karena tidak menggunakan suara sebagai medium, penghalang atau sejenisnya tidak dapat bertahan melawannya yang mungkin merupakan titik penting.

Sebagai salah satu dari tujuh dosa mematikan, "Sloth" juga bisa disebut sebagai salah satu kemampuan pamungkas yang paling mengerikan.

Itu karena itu adalah kemampuan yang dapat melakukan kontrol mutlak atas orang-orang dengan emosi dan kecerdasan ..

Karena aktivasi kemampuan Dino, semua orang yang berada di tempat ini jatuh dan kematian mereka dikonfirmasi.

Dino mengalami masa yang lebih sulit daripada yang dia kira.

Mereka adalah eksistensi yang belum memperoleh Keterampilan Ultimate, namun dia bergidik pada kenyataan bahwa mereka hanya bawahan dari Lord Demon tunggal.

Tepatnya, Beretta memegang dua posisi karena dia adalah bawahan Ramiris, tetapi hal semacam itu adalah hal yang tidak relevan.

(Sungguh ...... mereka bukan orang-orang berpangkat paling tinggi di antara bawahan Demon Lord Rimuru, kan?)

Ini adalah poin yang dibenarkan Dino ingin mengeluh.

Menurut pendapat Dino, lawan-lawannya sekarang bisa menjadi tokoh kunci di antara bawahan Rimuru.

Tetapi setelah bertarung dengan Albert dan yang lainnya, tampaknya dia harus melakukan penyesuaian ke atas dalam evaluasinya.

Karena itu telah menjadi keadaan darurat, kelompok berpangkat tinggi telah dikirim. Di antara orang-orang berpangkat tinggi yang tersisa, dia telah mengkonfirmasi bahwa Benimaru telah pergi ke tempat lain.

Satu-satunya ancaman yang tersisa untuk Dino adalah Shion, tapi dia belum membangunkan Skill Ultimate.

Dia sangat berhati-hati dan, setelah mengkonfirmasi situasinya, sepertinya itu adalah jawaban yang tepat baginya untuk menunggu sampai menit terakhir ketika tingkat keberhasilan meningkat.

Karena jika Benimaru, Shion dan Souei juga berpartisipasi dalam pertarungan dengan ketiganya yang baru saja dia kalahkan, situasinya akan menjadi lebih sulit bahkan jika dia tidak kalah.

Menjadi lega untuk saat ini, Dino mengulurkan tangannya dan menuju mayat Ramiris untuk mengkonfirmasi hasilnya.

“Fallen Catastrophe” adalah kemampuan yang menyebarkan gelombang hipnosis ke lingkungan, jadi tidak ada jalan keluar darinya.

Efeknya ditampilkan jika target berjemur di dalamnya, bahkan dalam kondisi tidur. Sebaliknya, target akan mati tanpa bisa menahannya dalam tidur mereka.

Dino yakin kematian Ramiris dan menyentuh tubuh.

―― Dia menyentuhnya (mayat), atau apa yang seharusnya.

Mayat itu berubah menjadi partikel cahaya, karena mengambil bentuk kupu-kupu dan terbang di sekitar lingkungan Dino.

Seolah-olah itu mengejek Dino ……

(Way Tidak mungkin ...... itu hanya ilusi !?)

Dia tidak ingin mempercayainya karena itu sulit dipercaya.

Tapi …… tentu saja, Adalman mengatakannya.

"Pertempuran ini sedang diamati juga".

(Apakah itu provokasi? Untuk membuatku menggunakan kartu trufku …… !?)

Jadi, ketika dia memikirkannya, tidak wajar bagi Adalman untuk mengatakan ucapan itu di sana meskipun itu tidak menciptakan keuntungan melawan Dino.

Tapi, bahkan jika itu bisa menciptakan situasi yang menguntungkan, itu bukan sesuatu yang bisa dia mengerti.

Dengan kata lain……

Thunk, thunk――

Perlahan, langkah kaki seseorang terdengar.

Kupu-kupu cahaya yang indah terbang, seolah menari, ke arah orang yang berjalan dengan tenang dan menyentuh tangan orang itu.

Dan kupu-kupu itu kembali ke bentuk peri yang tidur dengan manis ...... Ramiris, yang tidur dengan polos dan tampak bahagia.

Ramiris diserahkan kepada seorang pria dengan rambut biru kehitaman di sebelah pemilik tangan, yang berdiri tanpa kehadiran dan sebelum ada yang menyadarinya,

「Souei-dono, aku meninggalkan Ramiris-sama padamu」

Seorang pria mengatakannya dengan tenang.

「Ya, serahkan padaku. Mendukung?"

「Tidak perlu. Saya sendiri sudah cukup 」

Sejak awal, pertahanan untuk Ramiris dilakukan dengan sempurna.

Di kedalaman labirin teraman, banyak lapisan perangkap dipasang.

Dengan instruksi dari orang tertentu, mereka diperintahkan untuk bertarung seminimal mungkin untuk menghilangkan kemampuan orang yang datang sebagai mata-mata.

Mereka mengikuti perintah dengan setia.

Satu-satunya yang tidak tahu tentang ini adalah Ramiris.

Dan sekarang--

Keberadaan terkuat di dalam labirin mulai bergerak.

Itu telah menelan dirinya dalam kepompong untuk mengembangkan kemampuannya, tetapi kesadarannya selalu terjaga.

Itu selalu memperhatikan karena Link Pemikiran, dan itu benar-benar memahami situasinya.

Karena berkat pertahanan yang luar biasa dan absolut, keselamatan Ramiris terjamin.

Di dalam labirin, pertarungan ketiga dimulai.

Berdiri di depan Dino adalah "Tuan Mist (Tuan Phantasmal)" Zegion.

Dia yang merupakan makhluk terkuat di labirin ini.

* * *

[1] Tubuh Beretta. Ini sepenuhnya Adamantite.

[2] Pikirkan bahwa kemampuannya telah cooldown.

Catatan Guro

Anda bertemu Cliff-san di sini juga!





Bab 188: Rasul Akhir


"Sungguh, tolong berhenti bercanda."

Ini adalah keadaan pikiran Dino saat ini.

Seseorang baru muncul begitu dia berpikir bahwa dia telah mengalahkan lawan sebelumnya. Selain itu, tujuan mereka tampaknya untuk membuatnya mengekspos keahliannya.

Dia gagal dalam tujuannya untuk membuang Ramiris dan dia punya perasaan bahwa melarikan diri sendiri akan menjadi situasi yang sulit.

Tampaknya benar bahwa entah bagaimana ia telah diamati dan bahkan niat Dino untuk membunuh orang-orang yang menjaga Ramiris tampaknya telah diprediksi.

Pertama-tama dia tidak tahu apakah orang yang dimaksud, Ramiris, telah melarikan diri.

Ini adalah hal yang tidak normal.

"Jangan bilang padaku bahwa percakapan itu dengan ilusi sejak awal?"

Tapi, dia memiliki Skill Ultimate, belum lagi itu Skill Ultimate dengan hipnosis sebagai kekuatan utamanya, jadi dia berpikir bahwa mustahil baginya untuk tertipu oleh ilusi.

Dia tahu kekuatan iblis tipe serangga bernama Zegion.

Ketika pasukan Kekaisaran menyerbu labirin, dengan kekuatan tempurnya yang luar biasa, dia adalah iblis yang menyingkirkan individu-individu berpangkat tinggi dari pasukan Kekaisaran.

Dia adalah eksistensi yang bisa disebut sebagai yang terkuat di sana, di dalam labirin yang diciptakan oleh Ramiris.

(Itu sebabnya aku benci bekerja ……)

Dino sedang merumuskan tindakan terbaik yang harus diambil di tempat ini, sambil menghela nafas dan berpikir untuk menyerah.

Zegion melangkah maju dengan tenang tanpa peduli pada Dino.

"Apa itu? Apakah Anda punya kata-kata terakhir? 」

Zegion bertanya.

「Apakah kalian mengabaikan serangan saya dengan sengaja untuk mengungkap kekuatan saya?

Jangan bercanda dengan saya, itu sangat kotor! 」

Dino yang telah mengeluh untuk saat ini, mengabaikan tindakannya sendiri yang penuh kesalahan.

Meskipun itu tidak lebih dari ledakan kemarahan semata, dia mengerti bahwa itu tidak dapat membantu bahkan jika dia mengatakannya.

「Kata-kata konyol apa, begitulah seharusnya pertarungan.」

「Saya sudah tahu itu!」

Pertukaran kata sudah berakhir, ketegangan membentang di antara keduanya.

Dino tahu kekuatan Zegion. Itu adalah keuntungan yang dimiliki Dino, tentu saja dia akan menggunakannya.

Zegion memiliki kemampuan yang berspesialisasi dalam pertempuran yang melebihi tingkat Keterampilan Unik.

Jika membandingkan hanya dalam kemampuan pertarungan jarak dekat, maka Zegion akan lebih kuat dari Dino yang memiliki Keterampilan Ultimate.

Kemampuan Dino lebih condong ke arah serangan mental, jadi itu berbeda dari kemampuan serangan fisik langsung.

Namun, kemampuan Dino 『Slothful King Belphegor』 dapat terjalin ke dalam teknik pedangnya juga, menciptakan pedang ilusi phantasmagoric.

Itu menghalangi persepsi musuh dan bisa membuatnya melanjutkan pertempuran dengan menguntungkan.

Juga, dia bisa mendapatkan kekuatan bertarung yang melampaui ahli pedang ahli, seperti Albert, dengan melepaskan kekuatan tersimpannya dengan waktu yang sempurna.

Namun, penilaian Dino membuatnya waspada dalam pertempuran jarak dekat dengan Zegion.

Namun, itu bukan saatnya baginya untuk ragu-ragu.

Untuk melewati tempat ini, cara paling efisien adalah membunuh Zegion dengan serangan terkuatnya, mungkin bahkan kartu asnya.

「Huh! Jangan meremehkan saya. Meskipun aku terlihat seperti ini, aku adalah satu (satu pilar) dari Raja Iblis; Saya telah hidup untuk waktu yang lama.

Ambil ini, lalu kamu akan binasa! "Fallen Strike (Fallen Heaven Strike)" !! 」

Teknik rahasia terkuat dari pedang ilusi yang Dino ciptakan.

Dia melakukan pelepasan kemampuan maksimum 『Slothful King Belphegor』, serangan terkuat dengan semua kekuatannya.

Itu menyembunyikan gelombang yang merangsang perasaan negatif dan hanya sedikit saja bisa merampas target keinginannya untuk hidup.

Satu-satunya orang yang bisa menahan serangan ini adalah orang-orang yang memiliki kemauan kuat dan Keterampilan Ultimate.

Bahkan Guy tidak akan berakhir aman jika dia terkena langsung itu, atau begitulah yang diyakini Dino.

Gelombang negatif akan dilepaskan ke segala arah, jadi bahkan jika seseorang berhasil menghindari serangan, mereka hanya akan bermandikan gelombang dan akhirnya orang itu tidak bisa melarikan diri dari kekuatan tempurnya yang terkuras. Kemudian, Dino bisa memberikan pukulan terakhir dengan menebas lawannya dengan pedangnya.

Itu adalah kartu tersembunyi miliknya yang dirilis Dino dengan percaya diri.

Namun, Zegion tidak bergerak.

Dia memastikan lintasan pedang Dino dan, seolah-olah itu bukan sesuatu yang serius, dia mengambil Pedang Besar Dino "Runtuh Fang" dengan rangka luar dari tangan kirinya, yang telah diubah, memberikan sifat-sifat Hiihirokane (Ultimate Metal).

"Kamu bodoh! Bahkan jika kamu menghentikan pedangku, itu akan menjadi cedera fatal. Saya memenangkan pertandingan ini! 」

Teriak Dino.

Itu adalah serangan tercepatnya, tetapi ditangkap seperti yang diharapkan. Apalagi dengan satu tangan, seolah mengatakan bahwa itu adalah serangan sepele.

Dampak hebat seharusnya terjadi dari Great Sword Kelas Dewa, tapi Zegion tetap berdiri tanpa sedikit pun guncangan. Dia tenang sampai menjadi najis.

Tapi pertandingan ini adalah kemenangan Dino.

Bahkan jika Zegion memiliki banyak Keterampilan Unik dengan kemampuan pertahanan yang tinggi hingga tingkat yang tidak terpikirkan, itu tidak akan dapat mencegah efek serangan seri jiwa dari Keterampilan Ultimate.

Dia membuat Zegion membiarkan penjaganya berpikir bahwa itu hanya serangan pedang, strategi Dino untuk mengeluarkan serangan fatal dari seri jiwa tampaknya telah berhasil.

Karena Dino tahu bahwa Zegion kuat, dia akan memprediksi lintasan pedang dan memilih untuk tidak menghindarinya, karena serangan jarak dekat adalah keahliannya.

「Huh. Saya ingin semua ini berhenti, kesedihan yang bagus.

Dia tampaknya bangkit kembali dalam beberapa menit, saya harus membunuh Ramiris dengan cepat ... 」

Jadi dia bergumam, sambil berbalik ke arah Souei yang memegang Ramiris yang sedang tidur.

Dengan 『Sihir Persepsi』, dia merasa bahwa kehadiran Souei tipis. Dengan kata lain, Souei ini adalah salah satu klon.

Kekuatan bertarung klon itu lebih lemah dari tubuh utama dan jauh lebih rapuh.

Selain itu, karena Souei tidak memiliki Keterampilan Ultimate dan Dino memahami bahwa dia tidak memiliki "Gelang Kebangkitan" Ramiris, bahkan jika orang yang berdiri di depannya adalah tubuh utama, Souei bukan ancaman bagi Dino .

Namun, dia telah mengungkapkan semua kartu trufnya dan energinya yang tersisa juga berkurang.

Beradu dengan para eksekutif satu demi satu tidak terduga untuk Dino.

Karena dia mampu mengalahkan Zegion dengan kartu truf yang disimpannya, dia harus pergi sebelum dia bangkit.

Dino mulai berjalan menuju Souei ...

Namun, dia merasakan hawa dingin yang kuat dan berbalik ke Zegion.

「Saya bertanya sekarang, apakah serangan Anda dari seri efek yang tertunda?

Apakah Anda pikir serangan seperti angin yang tidak mengancam ini dapat mengalahkan saya?

Jika, dalam situasi ini, tidak perlu metode lesu seperti itu, Anda harus melepaskan serangan dengan efek langsung. 」

Zegion mengatakan itu sambil berdiri dengan tenang dan tidak berubah seperti beberapa waktu yang lalu, dia membuka dorongnya dengan tangan kiri yang digenggam dari sebelumnya.

5 flash dipancarkan. Itu adalah Dimensi Sinar Zegion.

Dino berhasil menghindari cedera fatal dengan tindakan penghindaran sesaat. Namun, sayap hitam dan lengan kanannya terputus.

「Rasanya sakit ……」

Dino berjongkok dan mengerang kesakitan, tetapi tidak sebanyak itu.

"Akan sangat berbahaya jika keadaan terus seperti ini", karena Dino mengabaikan peringatan yang diberikan oleh nalurinya, dan berteriak

"Kamu kenapa? Mengapa “Fallen Thanatos (Bujukan Hipnotis Menuju Kematian)” tidak berfungsi?

Bahkan jika itu adalah tubuh virtual, itu adalah teknik yang tak terhindarkan yang akan mempengaruhi tubuh utama bahkan jika itu berada di tempat yang jauh, kau tahu !? 」

Kepada Dino yang meneriakkan pertanyaannya,

「Saya tidak punya kewajiban untuk menjawabnya.」

Jadi Zegion menjawab dengan suara dingin dan tidak berperasaan.

Namun, dia melanjutkan ...

「――Tapi, aku akan menjawabnya untukmu yang menyedihkan.

Saya membuatnya menjadi hantu, halus dan mendalam. Sejak awal, Anda telah berada di bawah kendali kemampuan saya.

Ketahuilah bahwa serangan pikiran tidak berdampak pada saya, yang telah diberi gelar "Tuan Misterius", penguasa dunia ilusi! 」

Dengan suara makhluk yang absolut dan baik hati, Zegion menjawab pertanyaan Dino.

Akibatnya, Dino menyadari bahwa Zegion adalah keberadaan yang sama dengan dirinya saat ini, tidak, Zegion mungkin menjadi jauh, keberadaan peringkat yang lebih tinggi.

Dengan kata lain--

(Kamu bercanda kan!?

Saya melihat orang ini menjadi kepompong sementara yang lain jatuh tertidur nyenyak, tapi itu adalah fenomena yang terlihat ketika berevolusi ……

Anda tidak bisa serius, apakah itu "Harvest Festival"? Semua orang? Dan, lebih jauh lagi, dalam mode tidur !?

Meskipun begitu ...... Apa-apaan dengan orang ini, bagaimana dia bisa menjadi begitu kuat !!)

Dino mengerti bahwa itu adalah semacam fenomena evolusi.

Namun, tidak dapat dibayangkan bahwa meskipun Rimuru hanya seorang Raja Iblis yang terbangun, bawahannya telah berevolusi menjadi keberadaan yang setara dengan Tuan mereka.

Fenomena ini tidak diharapkan, bahkan oleh Dino yang telah hidup lama juga.

Tidak, pada awalnya, sudah tidak normal bahwa ada beberapa Dukes Iblis.

Mereka, yang merupakan eksistensi Iblis berperingkat tertinggi, bentuk kehidupan spiritual terkuat, adalah kekuatan yang dapat menghentikan Dino.

Sama seperti Beretta dan Adalman dari beberapa waktu yang lalu. Dia bisa mengatakan bahwa keduanya adalah kekuatan yang sama atau melebihi mantan Raja Iblis.

Jika hal-hal tidak berjalan dengan baik, mereka bisa sama dengan Raja Iblis yang terbangun bahkan jika hanya berkuasa ...

Tapi, Dino mengerti bahwa itu tidak terjadi pada Zegion, yang ada di depannya.

Dia jelas berbeda.

Dia berada pada tingkat Demon Lord yang terbangun, dan kekuatan yang tak ada habisnya dapat dirasakan dari kemampuannya.

Dia setara dengan Dino dan ini menunjukkan kemungkinan Zegion memperoleh Keterampilan Ultimate.

Dan di atas segalanya, kekuatannya sendiri telah dibatalkan yang berarti bahwa kemampuan musuh lebih kuat.

(Tidak mungkin ... Kemampuan saya adalah dari seri Deadly Sins. Ini adalah kemampuan kelas atas di antara Keterampilan Ultimate lho !?)

Sudah menjadi kebiasaan bagi Dino untuk hidup sambil menyembunyikan kemampuannya dan dia bisa menangani kemampuan itu dengan baik.

Sama sekali tidak lemah.

Hanya saja lawannya memiliki kompatibilitas yang buruk dengannya, tidak, kompatibilitas yang sangat, sangat buruk dengannya ...

Sejak awal, tempat ini adalah ruang kendali Zegion.

Dengan kata lain, itu merupakan indikasi ketidakcocokan ini.

「Kamu harus berdoa. Oh, si berdosa yang menyentuh jurang maut! Dimension Storm (Phantom Dimension Wave Storm) !! 」

Faktanya adalah bahwa Zegion jauh lebih kuat daripada Dino.

Badai berwarna pelangi menelan Dino, dan seluruh keberadaan Dino terhapus.

Ini persis badai energi tinggi dari dimensi yang berbeda.

Dino, yang tidak memiliki alat pertahanan, dimusnahkan tanpa meninggalkan sepotong daging meat atau seharusnya begitu.

「Oh, apakah doanya dijawab? Dia tampak senang bahwa itu bukan hanya nasib buruk 」

Zegion bergumam.

Sementara itu, suara pecah kecil dari sesuatu bergema, dan keberadaan Dino yang seharusnya terhapus diregenerasi.

Zegion mengerti situasinya dengan pasti.

Suara itu mereda dan semuanya adalah peristiwa dalam perhitungannya.

Dino telah dilengkapi gelang biasa di tangan kirinya.

Itu adalah barang murah yang bisa dibeli di kios di depan labirin.

Benar, itu adalah "Gelang Kebangkitan".

Komoditas yang diproduksi massal dibuat oleh Ramiris.

Berbeda dengan artikel asli yang dikenakan oleh para eksekutif di dalam labirin, itu adalah produk yang lebih rendah yang hanya dapat digunakan sekali.

Demi hati-hati, Dino telah membeli gelang ini pada hari liburnya. Ini karena dia tidak mendapatkan yang asli yang dikenakan para eksekutif ..

Ketika dia memakainya, dia berpikir bahwa bahkan ketika semua posisi dan percakapannya bocor, pikirannya bisa lega.

Pokoknya, Dino menyiapkan artikel inferior dan melengkapinya kali ini.

Dia akan membunuh Ramiris yang memproduksi barang tersebut dan barang yang diproduksi itu menjadi asuransinya. Mampu melakukan tindakan tanpa prinsip seperti itu tanpa peduli, itu adalah cara Dino sendiri dalam melakukan sesuatu.

Secara alami, Zegion memperhatikan bahwa Dino mengenakan gelang itu.

Dia menutup mata untuk itu setelah dia perhatikan itu, terutama karena dia sedang melakukan percobaan.

'Apakah perlindungan ilahi Ramiris akan diaktifkan untuk orang yang memiliki niat memusuhi Ramiris atau tidak?'

Hasilnya tepat di depan matanya.

Dino tampaknya telah memenangkan pertaruhan.

Untuk Zegion, tidak ada perbedaan besar apakah Dino menang atau kalah dalam pertaruhan karena, selain mendapatkan hasil percobaan, ia juga memenuhi syarat untuk menang dengan melindungi Ramiris.

Zegion mengangkat Ramiris, yang sedang berbaring di tanah, dengan satu tangan dan dengan tenang membaringkannya di sofa.

Souei tampaknya pergi untuk mendukung permukaan ...

Zegion juga akan bergabung dalam pertarungan, tetapi tampaknya dia tidak diperlukan untuk itu.

Dino yang lolos akan menuntut penarikan, dan akan segera berakhir.

Dan jika tidak ada tanda-tanda melarikan diri, dia akan menghancurkannya.

Keamanan tempat ini diamankan. Segera Beretta dan Adalman juga akan hidup kembali.

Setelah Zegion memastikan keselamatan Ramiris sekali lagi, dia mulai berjalan dengan tenang ke permukaan.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

"Aku benar-benar lelah dengan ini."

Dino berada dalam suasana hati yang suram karena strategi itu gagal, daripada berada dalam suasana hati yang lebih senang karena dia selamat.

Sebaliknya, jika Zegion telah menjadi monster seperti itu, maka menangkap labirin dengan serangan frontal akan sia-sia.

Mungkin situasi sampai beberapa waktu yang lalu adalah kesempatan terbesarnya dan dia mengerti bahwa itu benar-benar hilang sekarang.

(Bukankah pria itu terlalu kuat !?)

Bahkan pukulan terakhir terhadap dirinya sendiri di luar kemampuannya.

Bahkan untuk Dino, dia hanya melihat sekilas kemampuan Zegion'strue dan semua informasi lainnya praktis telah disembunyikan.

Pasti itu pertanda yang dia abaikan karena yang terputus adalah tangan kanannya dan bukan tangan kirinya.

Dino tidak sebodoh itu untuk tidak menyadari hal ini.

Di atas segalanya, monster itu akan tiba di permukaan jika dia tidak melarikan diri dengan cepat.

Dengan kekuatan yang dia miliki saat ini, dia bisa mengerti bahwa dia tidak bisa menang melawan Zegion dan karena itu, dia harus mundur sesegera mungkin.

(Ini mungkin sesuai dengan harapan orang itu juga.

Dia akan membiarkan saya memutuskan untuk menarik hanya karena rekannya di permukaan berada pada posisi yang kurang menguntungkan.

Atau lebih tepatnya, alasan mereka meninggalkan gelang padaku adalah untuk percobaan untuk menguji apakah kemampuan Ramiris akan mempengaruhi orang-orang dengan niat memusuhi dia?

Adapun alasan untuk melakukan percobaan tersebut ...

Bergantung pada situasinya, orang-orang itu mungkin telah mengambil kemungkinan Ramiris dicabut dari manajemen labirinnya.

Untuk percobaan itu, saya terbiasa ... Astaga.

Menakutkan dan tidak menyenangkan untuk dipikirkan.

Setan Lord Rimuru, orang yang tidak boleh kamu ceroboh dengan ...)

Untuk imajinasi menakutkan yang dia pikirkan sendiri, Dino meningkatkan evaluasinya tentang Raja Setan Rimuru dengan beberapa langkah.

Dia bahkan menggunakan Ramiris yang adalah temannya; dia adalah seseorang yang mungkin membuang sesuatu jika tidak perlu lagi.

Jika orang seperti itu, yang lebih menakutkan daripada iblis, merencanakan strategi, maka tidak ada yang akan tahu apakah ada jenis perangkap lain yang telah diletakkan.

Dino buru-buru kembali ke rekan-rekannya di permukaan.

Ketika Dino menelusuri kembali ke rekan-rekannya, kemajuan pertempuran berubah menjadi keuntungan baginya.

Berdiri di sana, melindungi pintu masuk Monster Country Tempest adalah "Barrier Lord" Gerudo.

Tubuhnya berlumuran darah dan tidak aneh baginya tiba-tiba pingsan karena dia penuh luka.

Di sisinya adalah Souei dan Shion.

Para eksekutif itu sendiri dan bukan bawahan mereka adalah orang-orang yang telah menjadi lawan untuk mencegah kerusakan agar tidak menyebar.

Dino berpikir bahwa itu adalah tindakan yang benar.

Lawan dari ketiga adalah dua malaikat yang jatuh yang adalah kawan Dino.

Pico dan Gracia.

Rekan-rekan "Pengamat" -nya yang disebut "Rasul Akhir" memiliki kekuatan luar biasa.

Menyebarkan 3 pasang sayap hitam legam mereka, mereka tidak pantas untuk malaikat yang mewakili kehendak Tuhan.

Tidak seperti 10 orang yang tinggal di langit, keduanya sama seperti Dino, yang telah jatuh ke bumi.

Termasuk Dino, sebelumnya ada 13 anggota Seraphim.

Tetapi tiga dari mereka telah jatuh ke bumi dan telah melakukan banyak jenis kegiatan.

Jika itu adalah gadis-gadis dari kelas Seraphim, seharusnya mudah untuk memusnahkan Tempest ...

Meskipun mereka dominan saat ini, mereka tidak dapat menghancurkan pertahanan Gerudo dan hanya sedikit demi sedikit mendapat kerusakan dari Shion.

Shion sendiri tidak terluka.

Dan kemudian, bukan hanya Souei yang datang untuk memberikan bantuannya, bahkan jika itu adalah gadis-gadis itu, mereka tidak bisa menembus pertahanan.

(Apakah kamu serius? Meskipun mereka berada di tingkat yang sama dengan saya, jika hanya menilai dengan kekuatan belaka, gadis-gadis itu setara dengan kekuatan rata-rata dari Raja Iblis yang terbangun, kau tahu ...)

Meskipun tidak memiliki Ultimate Skill, rekan-rekannya yang mungkin setara dengan Demon Lords yang terbangun tidak dapat mengalahkan keduanya yang hanya dua Iblis. Atas kenyataan itu, Dino merasa pusing.

(Aku sadar kalau wanita bernama Shion itu abnormal, tapi Orc Tinggi itu juga bukan yang biasa)

Dia tidak terlalu menarik perhatian karena dia bekerja dengan tenang, tetapi iblis bernama Gerudo itu tampaknya adalah prajurit yang sangat bagus.

Itu pasti karena dia telah selamat dengan dua kelas Seraphim sebagai lawannya.

「Ya ampun! Sangat ulet! Jika Anda tidak menyelesaikannya dalam satu pukulan, luka akan segera sembuh 」

「Jangan panik ... Tapi tetap saja, itu merepotkan!」

Pico berteriak sementara kesal dan bahkan Gracia yang biasanya bijaksana tampaknya telah kehilangan ketenangannya.

Mungkin begitu, pikir Dino.

Meskipun mereka telah jatuh, mereka adalah seraphim peringkat pertama. Karena gadis-gadis itu tidak bisa menyerang, harga diri mereka mungkin hancur berkeping-keping.

Tapi, itu adalah strategi kemenangan Shion sehingga Dino dengan tenang menyimpulkan.

Mereka memanfaatkan kekuatan pertahanan Gerudo sebagai tameng, secara harfiah tameng, karena mereka telah mempercayakan kepadanya untuk melakukan setiap serangan. Gerudo, yang bisa bertahan hidup terlepas dari semua itu, sangat pantas dipuji.

(Sebaliknya ... Orang-orang ini, menurut mereka apa yang dimaksud dengan kawan?

Tanpa simpati, dia dimanfaatkan sebagai perisai ……)

Dino merasa sangat kecewa.

Tapi, ini bukan waktunya untuk mengatakan sesuatu yang bodoh tanpa batas.

Jika dia tidak mundur dengan cepat, monster itu (Zegion) akan datang.

「Kalian, mundur. Kami akan menarik! 」

Teriak Dino.

Kedua orang bereaksi terhadapnya dan tampaknya tidak puas tetapi mereka mematuhi Dino.

「Hei, apakah strateginya berhasil?」

"Ah? Gagal. Jika tidak gagal, maka saya tidak akan lari, Anda tahu! 」

「Oi, bukankah itu berarti kamu dikalahkan?」

"Ah? Itu sebabnya Anda tidak perlu bertanya tentang setiap detail!

Tidak bisakah kalian merasa kasihan padaku dan dengan ramah berpura-pura tidak memperhatikan ini !? 」

『……』

Pico dan Gracia terdiam saat menjawab Dino.

Sementara situasinya tampak seolah-olah mereka melarikan diri karena malu, Dino berhasil melarikan diri dari tempat itu.

Sisi mana yang benar-benar memimpin di langkah pertama?

Itu adalah pendapat yang sangat diperdebatkan di masa mendatang.

Namun, dapat dipastikan bahwa detail kontroversial hanya diketahui oleh orang-orang yang tahu tentang keadaan internal secara mendalam.

Satu hal yang bisa dikatakan, karena acara itu baik-baik saja dalam perhitungan, tidak ada kerusakan sama sekali pada Tempest.





Bab 189: Tentara di Langit


Di kastil di langit yang luas.

Di dalam ruang penonton, pilar kapur berderet.

Malaikat dengan sayap putih bersih memenuhi aula.

Di antara mereka adalah 10 orang yang menonjol dengan 3 pasang sayap yang terlihat besar, kuat, dan putih murni, serta 3 individu dengan sayap hitam legam, semuanya berlutut di barisan depan.

13 individu kelas Seraphim dari kelompok "Rasul Akhir".

Tidak seperti Dino, yang adalah malaikat yang jatuh, seraphim putih bersih tidak menunjukkan ekspresi apa pun.

Seolah-olah mereka adalah robot, ekspresi mereka tetap seperti topeng Noh [1].

Namun, dua dari mereka memohon dengan emosi yang melonjak untuk mempertahankan kemanusiaan mereka.

Mereka adalah Kagali dan Vega, yang dibangkitkan sebagai serafim.

Tentu saja, karena mereka mendapatkan "kekuatan" yang jauh melebihi yang sebelumnya, energi mereka tampaknya sangat meningkat.

Tuan mereka belum muncul.

Mereka menerima pesanan untuk berkumpul, namun mereka menunggu karena tidak ada perkiraan waktu.

Itu bukan semua pasukan malaikat yang terdiri dari 1 juta malaikat, hanya malaikat kelas komandan kelas atas yang berkumpul di sini, namun, aula itu dipenuhi dengan keilahian yang agung.

Di aula yang tenang itu,

「Hei, Dino. Agar kamu menjadi bawahan orang itu, ini pertama kalinya aku mendengarnya, tahu? Know

Kagali berbisik pelan.

Dino dengan canggung,

「Saya pikir tidak ada alasan yang sah untuk mengatakannya. Karena saya seorang "Pengamat" yang Anda lihat. Adalah dasar untuk bertindak sambil menyembunyikan identitas asli seseorang, Anda tahu know

Dijawab begitu.

Dia mengangguk, setuju bahwa itu akan terjadi ,,

「Lalu, Anda sepertinya dikalahkan kan? Selain dari Demon Lord Rimuru, apakah bawahan juga menimbulkan banyak masalah? 」

Dan dia mengajukan pertanyaan yang paling dia khawatirkan.

Rimuru adalah Raja Iblis dengan koneksi mendalam. Tampaknya itu adalah tugas Dino untuk menetralisir kekuatan labirin selama periode ketika orang itu bertarung melawan Kagali and Co.

Perjanjian rahasia Yuuki dan Dino tidak diketahui, bahkan untuk Kagali.

Dino yang telah menyusup ke dalam Octogram bertindak sebagai "Pengamat".

Tujuannya adalah untuk mengawasi mereka dari dalam, penguasa iblis; siapa kekuatan utama yang menentang para malaikat. Menyusup ke grup, tugas Dino adalah mengumpulkan informasi.

Adalah Pico dan Garasha yang menyelidiki tanpa pergi ke panggung depan, sementara Dino berbaring rendah karena posisinya yang mencolok.

Malaikat yang jatuh adalah individu yang terlibat dalam misi khusus, dan dibebaskan untuk menyelidiki masyarakat manusia.

Namun, ada alasan mengapa Dino memulai operasi.

Awalnya, Veldanava memegang hak untuk memerintah para malaikat. Namun, mereka dipindahkan dari Veldanava ke Ultimate Skill 『Justice Lord Michael』 dan akhirnya, ke Rudra ketika dia meminjam skill.

Namun, bahkan dengan kemauannya, Rudra tidak mampu menggerakkan kelas seraphim.

Dengan kata lain, Rudra tidak memperhatikan keberadaan Dino, yang bertindak diam-diam.

Namun, Dino telah membuat perjanjian rahasia dengan Yuuki.

Dia tertarik pada Yuuki ketika dia bertemu dengannya, dia terpesona oleh "kekuatan" yang dimiliki Yuuki ―― dan tidak menyadari ruang lingkupnya, ke titik di mana dia mematuhi setiap perintah Yuuki.

Dia tidak dapat dengan jelas memahami alasannya, tapi mungkin—

「Itu tidak merepotkan. Itu ke tingkat di mana itu tidak bisa dianggap enteng, tidak peduli apa ..

Saya pikir orang itu adalah yang terkuat di labirin, saya yakin dia lebih kuat dari saya.

Tentu saja, saya lelah karena pertempuran yang terus menerus dan saya juga meremehkan lawan saya juga ......

Pihak lain telah membawaku berkeliling tanpa menunjukkan keseriusannya.

―― Selain itu, tampaknya, beberapa dari mereka tampaknya telah dilahirkan kembali sebagai Raja Iblis yang terbangun.

Jangan membuat wajah "apa yang kamu bicarakan?"!

Saya percaya bahwa jika posisi kami terbalik, saya mungkin akan memiliki reaksi yang sama seperti Anda. 」

Dino menjawab seolah dia lelah.

Untuk penampilan seperti itu, Kagali menyadari bahwa apa yang Dino katakan bukanlah lelucon tetapi kebenaran.

「Hal yang lemah untuk dikatakan. Anda harus menghancurkan pria seperti itu! Jangan khawatir, milikmu benar-benar akan menghancurkannya! 」

Vega membual.

(Senang menjadi idiot ……)

Dino berpikir begitu, tetapi dia tidak membiarkannya keluar dari mulutnya.

Karena tidak ada yang akan keluar darinya, bahkan jika dia mengatakannya.

Kagali menghela nafas, kagum, sementara Pico dan Garasha dengan tidak senang merajut alis mereka.

Namun, tidak ada yang dikatakan, ketika para gadis itu menyadari bahwa bahkan jika mereka mengatakan sesuatu kepada Vega, itu tidak akan berguna.

Tempat itu dibungkus oleh keheningan sekali lagi mengikuti ucapan Vega.

Kagali memikirkan komentar Dino.

Kagali, dirinya sendiri, telah mengambil alih kekuatan seraphim dan pada gilirannya, kekuatannya meningkat pesat. Selain itu, meskipun itu adalah sesuatu yang tidak diketahui selain Yuuki, dia juga terbangun sebagai Raja Iblis.

10.000 jiwa telah dituangkan ke dalam benih Raja Iblisnya.

Sebagai orang yang mengambil kekuatan Raja Iblis yang terbangun dan seorang Seraphim, Dia memperoleh Keterampilan Tertinggi 『Dominion Lord Melchizedek』.

Memperoleh kemampuan memerintah absolut, dia diberi peringkat "Four Fiend of the Heaven Commanders" oleh Yuuki.

Dia memilih empat orang terkuat dan menamakan mereka "Empat Iblis dari Surga Komandan".

Dia dan Dino adalah dua dari "Empat iblis Komandan Surga". Yang lain adalah Vega, sementara orang terakhir tidak diketahui ……

Dia berpikir bahwa panggilan hari ini adalah untuk mengungkap orang terakhir.

Dia mengesampingkannya dan terus berpikir.

Dia dan Dino sama.

Orang seperti itu telah menyatakan bahwa dia tidak bercanda tentang dipermainkan oleh lawannya.

Mungkin musuh yang tidak pernah bisa mereka ceroboh. Tapi, meski begitu ......

Kagali mengalami kesulitan menekan perasaan menyenangkan yang muncul dari hatinya.

Kekuatan luar biasa yang dia miliki sekarang.

Dia punya firasat bahwa kesempatan untuk mengujinya akan segera datang.

Dan……

"Tunggu saja, Leon. Lain kali, giliran Anda untuk menangis! ”

Kagali terus berpikir sambil menahan perasaan kegembiraannya yang tidak jelas.

Apakah dirinya yang sekarang benar-benar lebih lemah daripada Dino?

Tidak. Dia tidak pernah berpikir begitu.

Bahkan jika lawannya mampu memimpin Dino, jika itu dia, maka dia mungkin bisa menang.

Karena kekuatannya sudah melampaui Raja Iblis yang terbangun.

Kagali berpikir, bahwa jika itu adalah dirinya saat ini, bahkan Raja Iblis Leon mungkin tidak menjadi ancaman.

Kagali diam-diam menunggu Yuuki muncul sambil melanjutkan pikirannya.

Vega tidak berpikir.

Dia hanya menunggu pesanan.

Dia memiliki kekuatan.

Dia melihat ke jurang yang dalam di dunia ini dengan mengalami kematian.

Dia dengan tidak sabar melahap serafim dan menjadikan kekuatannya sendiri.

Pada saat yang sama, fragmen dari kemampuan yang dia dapatkan sejauh ini menyatu, dan dia merasa bahwa itu diperkuat.

Kekalahan melahirkan kekuatan.

Inkarnasi kekuatan ledakan spontan. Itu adalah Vega.

Sebagai hasil ciptaan Yuuki, ia mampu mengambil berbagai keterampilan (kemampuan), menggabungkan mereka, dan melengkapi mereka, memungkinkannya untuk berkembang menjadi monster pertempuran pamungkas.

Dia memperoleh Keterampilan Tertinggi 『Naga Jahat Lord Azi Dahaka [2]』.

Ia memiliki kemampuan merusak untuk membanjiri keterampilan lain yang ada.

Ini akan menjadi malapetaka bagi dunia, karena kemampuan ini telah menyadarkan orang yang tidak memikirkan kontrol daya. Tidak, itu mungkin menjadi alasan mengapa dia bisa mendapatkan kekuatan itu, hanya karena dia tidak berpikir, dia hanya melakukannya.

Bagaimanapun, itu dia.

Vega menunggu. Ketertiban mengalir di sekujur tubuhnya.

Tujuannya adalah hanya untuk memblokir orang-orang di depannya dan memusnahkan mereka.

Dino mengarahkan matanya ke bawah dan memikirkan situasi saat ini.

Bagaimana jadinya seperti ini? Tidak peduli berapa kali dia bertanya-tanya tentang hal itu, dia tidak bisa memberikan jawaban.

Dahulu kala, tugasnya adalah turun ke permukaan atas perintah tokoh itu.

Dia berpikir bahwa, pada saat itu, dia tidak memiliki egonya, tetapi suatu hari dia tiba-tiba menyadari bahwa dia dapat memikirkan berbagai hal untuk dirinya sendiri.

Dia bertanya pada Pico dan Garasha siapa rekannya, dan keduanya tampaknya memiliki ego mereka yang tumbuh pada waktu yang hampir bersamaan.

Itu merepotkan untuk menggunakan kekuatannya, tapi Dino harus menggunakan Ramiris untuk menjadi Raja Iblis.

Degenerasi dari atribut Holy ke Demonic.

Pada saat itu, ia telah menggunakan metode perubahan atribut rahasia yang hanya mampu dilakukan oleh Ramiris.

Kedua rekannya tidak perlu merosot, tetapi untuk beberapa alasan mereka pergi bersama dengannya dan menjadi malaikat yang jatuh. Kesan Dino tentang mereka adalah bahwa mereka orang aneh.

Setelah tuannya menghilang, Dino terus mengamati sepanjang waktu.

Dia harus memastikan akhir pertandingan antara Guy dan Rudra, karena kesetiaannya kepada tuannya, yang telah menghilang, tidak hilang.

Karena Dino percaya bahwa tuannya akan kembali suatu hari, tidak peduli berapa lama waktu yang dibutuhkan.

Dan kemudian, dia menemukan itu.

Kecerahan jiwa yang bisa dia pahami pada pandangan pertama.

Dino menyadari bahwa tuannya akhirnya kembali.

Tapi, sepertinya tuannya tidak dapat bergerak bebas karena semacam kendala.

Jadi dia menangani tugasnya sebagai "Pengamat", sama seperti biasanya.

Karena dia tahu bahwa temannya bermasalah, dia melanjutkan kehidupannya yang disengaja sambil secara kebetulan melakukan beberapa campur tangan dalam berbagai cara.

Dia melakukannya dengan baik sejauh ini.

Karena satu-satunya instruksi yang diberikan kepadanya oleh tuannya, yang kembali, adalah baginya untuk bekerja sama dengan seorang pemuda bernama Yuuki.

Masalahnya adalah masalah kegagalannya dalam serangannya terhadap Ramiris dari hari yang lalu.

Dia enggan membunuh Ramiris, yang merupakan dermawannya, namun dia tidak punya pilihan lain selain melakukannya untuk menetralisir labirin.

Labirin itu jelas-jelas merupakan ancaman dan dia memutuskan bahwa para pengawalnya, iblis, di dalam bukanlah eksistensi yang bisa dia abaikan.

Karena akan sulit untuk mengubur mereka semua, itu wajar untuk membidik Ramiris, yang membuat labirin.

Namun, dia tidak benar-benar berniat untuk membunuhnya dan hanya bermaksud menerapkan segel dengan Deep Hypno (Eternal Sleep).

Tapi itu berakhir dengan kegagalan.

Bukan hanya itu ……

Sebuah tanda kupu-kupu biru terukir di tangan kanannya yang baru lahir.

Tidak peduli bagaimana dia melihatnya, Dino berpikir bahwa mungkin itu adalah kutukan, atau sesuatu yang serupa, dari beberapa jenis kemampuan seri pembatasan.

Ini akan menjelaskan alasan mengapa pelariannya begitu mudah diizinkan, jadi Dino merasa seperti dia ingin menghela nafas panjang.

Tepat setelah upaya itu, master sejati Dino terbangun.

Dia merasa tertekan dalam melaporkan ketidakmampuannya sendiri, sementara pada saat yang sama merasa senang.

Jika pihak lain adalah Yuuki, setidaknya ……

"Maaf, gagal, gagal!" Dia bisa melaporkannya sambil tersenyum.

Semakin lama dia ragu untuk membuat laporan, semakin buruk konsekuensinya.

Bagaimanapun, kecemasan Dino terbukti benar.

『Hiya! Dino-kun, kamu baik-baik saja? 』

Dia tidak ingin mendengarnya, suara Dewa Setan (Rimuru), yang lebih tidak menyenangkan daripada iblis, bergema di otaknya.

(Ini buruk, seperti yang diduga, itu adalah kemampuan sistem seperti itu kan !?)

Dia tidak bisa menghapus tanda kupu-kupu biru, bahkan jika dia telah mencoba melakukannya.

Itu bersinar lebih indah sekarang, dibandingkan dengan waktu pertama kali terpasang, seolah-olah kilau itu adalah bukti bahwa kemampuan itu telah berakar.

Meskipun dia menutupinya dengan gelang, hanya penampilannya yang bisa dia sembunyikan.

『Apakah Rimuru ini?』

『Ya, kamu mengerti dengan baik. Ini aku, aku. 』

『Apa bisnis Anda? Aku sibuk …… 』

Untuk suara yang menggema meskipun dia tidak ingin mendengarnya, Dino bertanya.

"Tidak ada. Itu hanya percakapan sederhana, Dino-kun.

Anda tampaknya telah memprovokasi saya untuk berkelahi bukan?

Cukup baik tentang serangan Anda ke labirin, kolega Anda sepertinya membidik kota dengan benar.

Biasanya, ini adalah tindakan yang tidak termaafkan, tapi aku mungkin membiarkannya meluncur kali ini 』

『Serius !? Apa kondisinya ……? 』

『Ini hal yang sederhana. Anda berada di pihak Yuuki (Diasumsikan) kan?

Karena perang habis-habisan akan terjadi antara aku dan Yuuki, kamu tidak boleh melakukan apa-apa.

Saya bermaksud membuat Anda menjadi mata-mata, tetapi informasinya akan sama sekali tidak dapat dipercaya.

Bahkan Anda akan merasa menyesal dengan pengkhianatan juga. 』

『Wa? Itu bukan pertanyaan yang dipaksakan atau sejenisnya? 』

『Saya akan tahu jika Anda berbohong, dan itu sama bahkan jika masalahnya berubah setelah Anda mengatakannya oke?』

Dino mengerti apa yang dibicarakan Rimuru.

Jika dia mengubah konten informasi setelah dia melaporkannya, itu bukan lagi laporan yang valid.

Rimuru tampaknya telah memahami hak untuk memutuskan hidup atau mati Dino dari kejauhan, tetapi tidak mungkin untuk mengendalikan sejauh membatasi tindakan Dino, atau sesuatu seperti itu.

Bunuh diri untuk merencanakan strategi berdasarkan informasi yang tidak dapat dipercaya untuk kampanye militer skala besar.

Jadi, Dino seharusnya tidak melakukan apa-apa, singkatnya, ia harus melanjutkan sebagai seorang neet?

Tapi, lalu tidak ada gunanya kan?

『Tapi, hanya dengan itu, bukankah tidak ada gunanya bagimu?』

"Ada. Aku bisa mencukur potensi perang pihakmu, asalkan kamu tidak ikut pertempuran ......

Keuntungan terbesar adalah membuat Anda menjadi kontak kami.

Meskipun tidak apa-apa jika kamu berpartisipasi dalam pertarungan, aku ingin kamu bergerak ketika itu menjadi semacam keadaan darurat.

Oh well, meskipun saya ragu apakah lawan yang ingin menghancurkan dunia akan merespon untuk diskusi―― 』

"Aku mengerti", jadi Dino mengerti.

Setan Lord Rimuru akan berniat bertarung dengan serangan frontal sampai akhir.

Dia berencana untuk menang. Meskipun dia menasihatinya untuk menyerah, dia masih ingin menggunakan Dino.

Dino berpikir bahwa dia adalah Raja Iblis yang benar-benar naif, naif dalam setiap aspek.

Atau mungkin, itu mungkin tujuan Rimuru untuk membuatnya berpikir seperti itu ……

Bahkan jika kelompoknya hampir kalah, dia mengerti bahwa penyerahan tidak akan diterima, oleh karena itu Dino tidak berpikir bahwa Rimuru akan bergantung padanya juga.

『Dipahami. Saya akan menerima keluhan Anda.

Saya akan mengabdi pada peran pengamat sebanyak mungkin. Ini akan baik-baik saja bukan?

Ah, benar juga. Untuk Ramiris, saya minta maaf, saya akan diselamatkan jika Anda memberinya permintaan maaf saya. 』

" Ah? Mohon maaf nanti sendiri. Dia berteriak mengancam bahwa dia akan mencoba semua 48 gerakan spesialnya pada Anda. 』

『Itu tidak benar 48! Dia hanya bisa menggunakan dropkick, kan ?!? 』

"Bagaimana saya tahu. Dia bilang begitu. Apakah Anda akan mengatakannya padanya? 』

『Fufu. Dimengerti Sampai jumpa."

『Ah, sampai jumpa lagi.』

(Sampai nanti, ya.)

Dino sadar bahwa dia merasa bahagia dari lubuk hatinya setelah sekian lama.

Dan itu adalah masalah, karena dia sudah kehabisan akal.

Lagipula Dino tidak punya niat untuk mengkhianati penciptanya (tuan).

Di sisi lain, Dino mengerti bahwa jika dia melaporkannya dengan jujur, dia akan terhapus.

Sudah menjadi masalah, itu adalah perasaan jujur ​​Dino.

Tapi,

(Terserahlah. Bagaimanapun, aku sangat tidak berguna.

Maksud saya, semakin serius saya bekerja, semakin lemah saya jadinya.

Karena saya mengatakan bahwa saya tidak ingin bekerja, itu adalah mimpi yang menjadi kenyataan!)

Positif, dan dengan pikiran riang dan malas yang tidak bisa diikuti orang lain, Dino mencapai kesimpulan.

Maka, wajahnya yang cerah menjadi sedikit segar sementara dia menunggu kedatangan tuannya.

Kepositifan itu adalah titik menakutkan dari pria bernama Dino.

Sudah waktunya.

Sebuah lonceng bergema dengan khusyuk, dan pintunya terbuka.

Seorang pria muda dan seorang gadis surgawi, yang mengikuti di belakangnya, muncul dan berjalan dengan tenang menuju tahta.

Pria muda itu adalah Yuuki, bukan, dia 'Yuuki' lain di dalam Yuuki.

Gadis selestial adalah seorang wanita cantik yang memiliki rambut perak panjang mengalir di punggungnya. Namun, wajahnya tanpa emosi.

Dia adalah wanita cantik yang memiliki wajah cantik seperti topeng Noh.

Ketika Yuuki duduk di tahta, gadis surgawi, dengan gerakan alami, berdiri di sisi kanannya.

「Tunjukkan rasa hormat Anda!」

Suara bermartabat, merdu bergema di seluruh aula.

Dengan itu sebagai sinyal, orang-orang yang berkumpul berdiri bersama dan membentuk garis.

「Yo, semuanya. Lama tidak bertemu. Bagi sebagian orang, senang bertemu dengan Anda.

Aku adalah orang yang membawa inti inti (jantung) dari "Stellar King Dragon" Veldanava dalam jiwaku.

Menjadi satu dalam tubuh dan jiwa dengan Yuuki, ini adalah kasus yang tidak biasa karena ada 2 hati dalam 1 jiwa.

Sekarang giliranku, tolong perlakukan aku dengan baik.

Tentang saya, panggil saya Velda dan bukan Yuuki. 」

Maka Yuuki, bukan Velda, berkata ketika dia mulai berbicara.

Ketika Veldanava menikahi Lucia, yang merupakan adik perempuan Rudra, dia mengubah namanya menjadi Velda Nava.

Karena itu, ia menyelesaikannya dengan memberikan nama resminya.

Dan sekarang, sudah waktunya bagi keturunan tuan sejati kastil di langit.

Aula audiensi yang agung, atas restu dari para malaikat tanpa keinginan, terbungkus dalam gelombang sukacita karena keilahian yang luar biasa.

Pencipta sejati mereka telah kembali setelah waktu yang lama.

Velda bermaksud untuk menyelesaikan semuanya dengan Perang Besar (permainan) yang dia nyatakan kepada Raja Iblis Rimuru.

Ini adalah keputusan terakhir yang dia berikan dan kehendak Sang Pencipta (Kagurazaka Yuuki) yang mereproduksi dirinya.

Bisa dengan mudah dibayangkan bahwa itu akan menjadi Perang Besar berskala besar, yang belum pernah terjadi sebelumnya.

Dia tidak mengerti identitas aslinya sendiri.

Dia adalah Angra Mainyu, orang yang menginginkan kehancuran dunia.

Dia mengembara ke banyak dunia, melewati keabadian waktu, sampai dia berdiam di dalam jiwa Yuuki.

Ketika Yuuki baru saja menjadi siswa sekolah dasar, orang tuanya terlibat dalam kecelakaan dan meninggal.

Itu adalah kematian instan karena tabrakan langsung dengan truk yang sopirnya tertidur di belakang kemudi dan pada saat itulah Yuuki terbangun.

Dapat dikatakan bahwa kehendak Yuuki, yang menginginkan kehancuran dunia, adalah alasan utama mengapa Angra Mainyu terbangun.

Sejak itu, beberapa tahun telah berlalu dan sekali lagi dia melintasi dunia sekali lagi. Apakah itu kebetulan atau apakah itu tak terhindarkan?

Dia memulihkan sebagian ingatannya yang hilang dan membangun firma yang kuat karena Yuuki memperoleh Keterampilan Tertinggi 『Penciptaan Lord Ahura Mazda [3]』.

Namun, kekuatan itu terlalu besar untuk Yuuki saat itu.

Angra Mainyu mendapatkan kembali ingatannya sebagai Velda sekali lagi secara bersamaan.

Velda, yang baru saja terbangun, menggunakan sebagian besar kekuatan Yuuki, sehingga Keterampilan Tertinggi 『Penciptaan Tuhan Ahura Mazda』 diturunkan menjadi Keterampilan Unik 『Pencipta』.

Maka, dengan hubungan koeksistensi dan kemakmuran bersama, menjadi seperti sekarang.

Menurut ingatannya, identitas aslinya adalah Velda, dengan kata lain; dia adalah jantung dari "Stellar King Dragon" Veldanava.

Sebagian besar kekuatan jiwanya telah diserahkan kepada Milim Nava yang adalah putrinya.

Sisanya adalah dia, Velda Nava.

Tapi, apakah dia benar-benar Velda? Dia mungkin hanya Angra Mainyu, yang kemauannya terbangun dengan keterampilan sederhana.

Ini adalah pertanyaan yang selalu ada di benak Velda.

"Stellar King Dragon" Veldanava telah binasa, dan Velda ditinggalkan.

Lalu, apakah saat ini dia adalah "Stellar King Dragon"? Jawabannya adalah tidak.

Dia adalah cangkang kosong yang kehilangan kekuatannya dan dia tidak cocok dengan kekuatannya selama masa jayanya.

Tapi, tidak ada masalah. Kekuatannya sudah cukup, dia bahkan selesai memulihkan 『Justice Lord Michael』, yang ditransfer ketika dia meninggal.

Adapun tujuannya, itu sederhana dan sederhana.

Untuk membangkitkan kembali Lucia dan untuk melihat apakah ia benar-benar adalah jantung dari "Naga Raja Stellar" yang benar-benar mencintai Lucia.

Dia akan menghancurkan dunia berkali-kali dan jiwanya akan kembali berkali-kali untuk memanggil kembali jiwa Lucia.

Harapannya adalah untuk menghancurkannya berulang-ulang tanpa henti untuk mendapatkan kembali punggungnya dengan pasti.

Dia mengumpulkan potongan-potongan jiwanya untuk mendapatkan kembali hatinya.

Probabilitas keberhasilan itu sangat kecil, sampai-sampai bisa dikatakan sebagai tidak mungkin, tetapi jawabannya tidak akan pernah 0.

Kemudian, dia hanya akan melaksanakannya.

Tuan rumahnya yang bernama Yuuki ingin menghancurkan dunia, sehingga tujuan mereka cocok.

Dengan demikian, mereka membentuk hubungan kooperatif dan memperlakukan satu sama lain dengan setara.

Sekarang giliran Velda sekarang. Sampai dia ingin bertukar, Yuuki akan dimeteraikan di kedalaman jiwa mereka.

Ngomong-ngomong, dia membiarkan tubuh Lucia yang dia simpan untuk melahirkan seorang malaikat, dan mengembalikan penampilannya ketika dia masih hidup.

『Justice Lord Michael』 menggerakkan Lucia seperti boneka tak berperasaan.

Michael memiliki sifat yang dekat dengan Angra Mainyu, yang telah diambil oleh Velda sekali sebelumnya, mempertahankan niatnya yang setia kepadanya.

Dapat dikatakan bahwa Michael paling cocok untuk menjadi wali yang akan melindungi tubuh Lucia.

Karena Michael, tidak mungkin terluka, atau bahkan menyentuh tubuh Lucia, selama Velda merindukan Lucia.

Awalnya, Lucia memiliki Skill Ultimate 『Wisdom Lord Raphael』 yang tampaknya telah hilang setelah kematiannya.

Memikirkan kembali hal itu, ketika dia mentransfer 『Justice Lord Michael』, alih-alih menyimpannya, Skill Ultimate-nya, 『Lord Lord Uriel』 juga hilang dengan cara yang sama.

Kedua jiwa itu telah benar-benar hancur, dan mungkin karena itu, ia tersebar ke dunia.

Karena dia adalah Velda, bahkan dari keadaan hanya menjadi hati, dia mampu bangkit kembali.

Menghidupkan kembali Lucia mungkin terjadi ketika dia adalah "Stellar Lord Dragon" Veldanava, tetapi itu bukan tugas yang mudah untuk Velda saat ini.

Pertama-tama, ia harus memulihkan semua kemampuan.

Apa pun yang diperlukan, ia perlu mendapatkan Keterampilan Utama, 『Dewa Kebijaksanaan Raphael』 yang akan terlahir kembali di suatu tempat, dan suatu hari nanti.

Dia tidak panik.

Karena waktu tidak terbatas dan rentang hidupnya juga.

Karena Lucia pasti akan menunggunya sampai setelah dia selesai menghancurkan dunia.

Ketika Velda mengkonfirmasi kembali raison d'etre miliknya, dia menatap para malaikat.

Mereka adalah makhluk yang telah ia ciptakan sejak lama.

Pasukan kehancuran yang membutuhkan sejumlah besar kekuatan untuk memanggil, namun menghilang segera setelah dilemahkan.

Tapi, dia memecahkan masalah dengan memberikan tubuh fisik malaikat tanpa mengkonsumsi energinya sendiri saat ini.

Bisa dikatakan persiapan adalah segalanya.

13 pilar "Rasul Akhir". Juga, ksatria pelindung Velda yang setia.

Ke-14 orang itu menjadi bawahan terkuat Velda.

Lucia adalah kepala.

Michael, yang berdiam di tubuh Lucia, akan menggunakan kekuatan seraphim dan melindunginya.

Mengikuti setelahnya adalah 4 komandan terkuat, Empat iblis Komandan Surga.

Mantan Raja Iblis Kazaream, Kagali.

Vega yang ia ciptakan bekerja sama dengan mitranya, Yuuki.

Dino, yang merupakan bawahan lamanya.

Dan 'Dia', wali ksatria Velda.

Malaikat yang jatuh, Pico dan Garasha, diperlakukan sebagai bawahan Dino tetapi telah diputuskan bahwa keduanya akan menjadi pelayan pribadi Lucia.

Tujuh dari mereka tetap ada.

Algojo (Tujuh Malaikat Hukuman).

Mereka adalah komandan korps terpisah yang memimpin pasukan malaikat.

Mereka dihidupkan kembali sebagai seraphim menggunakan jiwa orang-orang kuat di antara bawahan Yuuki.

Kepala tujuh orang itu adalah pembunuh bayaran bernama Arios.

Mereka membangunkan Keterampilan Tertinggi 『Senjata Tuan』, karena mereka adalah orang-orang yang terampil dengan perisai, pedang, kapak, palu, tombak, cambuk dan busur.

Mereka juga cukup sebagai potensi perang, cukup untuk menghancurkan dunia.

Malaikat yang mendengarkan pidato Velda tidak menunjukkan ekspresi apa pun.

Namun, mereka merasakan kegembiraan tertinggi karena dapat mematuhi perintah pencipta mereka sekali lagi, dan mereka tidak sabar menunggu perintah dikeluarkan.

Pecahnya perang sudah dekat.

* * *

Catatan Guro

Apakah berpikir dianggap sebagai tebing? XD

Terima kasih sudah datang ~

* * *

[1] Ini: Untuk informasi lebih lanjut, kunjungi di sini

[2] ji aka ・ ダ ハ ー カ Aji Dahaka (Aži Dahāka / Azh dahak / Zahhak). Putra Angra Mainyu dalam Zoroastrianisme, seorang tokoh jahat dalam mitologi dan cerita rakyat Iran.

[3] ア フ ア ・ マ ズ ダ Ahura Mazda. Pencipta dan satu-satunya Dewa Zoroastrianisme.





Bab 190: Keterampilan Utama


Saya tidak bisa kembali ke Tempest sampai kedatangan Krishna.

Tetapi, saya tidak hanya beristirahat dengan santai sambil menunggu kedatangan Krishna.

Persis seperti keinginan Kaisar Rudra, aku akan mengambil tempatnya untuk menjaga kedamaian dan ketertiban Ibukota Kekaisaran.

Saya berunding dengan para bangsawan yang telah meminta pertemuan, berpatroli di Ibukota Kekaisaran atau itulah yang saya klaim ketika saya pergi mengunjungi Ibukota Kekaisaran. Aku sangat sibuk.

Karena tamasya berfungsi sebagai inspeksi terhadap struktur kota, saya tidak bermain-main. Namun, itu berubah menjadi rekreasi.

Untuk rekonstruksi, tidak perlu melakukan sesuatu yang istimewa sekarang.

Bagaimanapun, tidak ada kerusakan pada bangunan, kerusakan utama adalah pada populasi manusia.

Namun, ketika kerabat mereka dirampok oleh para malaikat, mungkin perlu bagi kita untuk melakukan perawatan mental untuk mengatasi ketakutan warga yang akan diperintah oleh Raja Iblis.

Tidakkah Anda berpikir bahwa hal-hal seperti itu tidak akan menjadi tugas yang cocok untuk setan? Namun, tanpa diduga, ini tidak benar.

Setan yang memakan emosi sangat membantu, karena mereka mengurangi beban pikiran dengan memakan emosi seperti ketakutan dan kecemasan warga.

Meskipun akan ada efek negatif bagi warga jika semua emosi mereka dimakan, saya memerintahkan mereka untuk menyesuaikan emosi warga dengan moderasi. Itu tidak berarti semua kesedihan warga hilang, tetapi itu bisa mencegah mereka melakukan pemberontakan atau mengatur perlawanan, jadi itu mungkin yang terbaik bagi mereka.

Meskipun iblis mungkin akan menghapusnya saat tanda-tanda seperti itu terlihat.

Saya memperkirakan bahwa mereka tidak akan melaporkan hal-hal kecil seperti itu sama sekali.

Sebelum pertandingan, Yuuki atau lebih tepatnya Angra Mainyu memastikan untuk mencabut semua kecambah dari unsur-unsur yang mengkhawatirkan ...... Saya bermaksud mengabaikan hal-hal seperti itu karena tidak dapat membantu ketika itu terjadi.

Saya tidak bermaksud mengganggu warga sipil, tetapi saya tidak akan ragu untuk menghancurkan mereka jika mereka mengangkat pemberontakan bersenjata.

Karena saya tidak ingin hal seperti itu terjadi jika memungkinkan, saya merasa lega ketika perawatan mental gaya Iblis berhasil.

Dino tampaknya menunjukkan warna aslinya di Tempest, seolah dia sedang menunggu waktu ketika kita akan berada di tengah pertempuran dengan tentara Kekaisaran (atau lebih tepatnya, kita mungkin menjadi orang yang memilih waktu).

Saya mengkonfirmasi kerusakan segera, Gerudo telah menerima cedera serius sementara Shion dan Souei tampaknya terluka ringan.

Cedera Shion hanya pada tingkat yang akan segera sembuh, sementara Souei tidak bisa disebut terluka, karena itu aku merasa lega.

Di sisi lain, cedera Gerudo tampaknya sangat buruk. Itu tidak membahayakan hidupnya, namun, ia tampaknya telah jatuh ke dalam situasi yang membutuhkan istirahat total.

Karena kekhawatiran saya, saya kembali untuk memeriksa kondisinya dengan gerbang transfer saat istirahat.

「Hei, Gerudo. Apa kamu baik baik saja?"

Saya menanyakan kondisinya segera setelah saya memasuki ruang perawatan

Saya melihat penampilan Gerudo yang menyedihkan.

Bagi Gerudo, yang memiliki tingkat pemulihan tinggi, masih dalam kondisi ini, mungkin itu adalah pengaruh dari kemampuan musuh.

Ketika aku mendengar tentang kondisinya, aku melihatnya sambil merujuk pada arsip [1] ... pertarungan, di mana Shion dan Souei menggunakan Gerudo sebagai tameng hidup, diproyeksikan dengan jelas.

"Betapa kejamnya!" Adalah perasaanku yang membuatku ingin menghibur Gerudo dari lubuk hatiku.

Tidak ... Sejauh yang saya bisa lihat, mereka telah memukul mundur dua malaikat yang jatuh yang memiliki peringkat lebih tinggi dan sebagai strategi ini mungkin pilihan yang paling optimal.

Itu rahasia, yang saya pikir, bahwa saya agak takut dengan kurangnya belas kasihan ini.

Saya yakin bahwa tindakan ini persis seperti tindakan dalam strategi yang dirancang oleh Raphael-san.

「Oh Rimuru-sama!

Aku, Gerudo benar-benar malu, karena kesia-siaanku sendiri, yang satu ini telah membuatmu khawatir.

Yang ini akan mengabdikan diriku lebih banyak dari sekarang, dan mendapatkan tubuh yang lebih keras yang tidak akan terluka sejauh ini! 」

Oh ……

Tidakkah kamu berpikir bahwa kamu sudah cukup tangguh sekarang?

Lagipula, dia membuatku kagum dengan bagaimana dia menerima serangan dua musuh kelas Demon Lord yang terbangun berkali-kali, namun tidak mendapatkan luka fatal.

Meskipun, itu mungkin hasil dari kemampuan pemulihan dirinya dibantu oleh keterampilan Shion.

"--Apakah begitu. Maka saya akan mengantisipasinya.

Dalam hal ini, saya hanya akan membantu Anda sedikit. 」

Setelah saya katakan, saya menjalankan evolusi Gerudo.

"Pemberitahuan. Apakah Anda ingin melakukan evolusi Individual: Gerudo? YA TIDAK"

Saya menjawab dengan YA, dan mengirim 100.000 jiwa ke Gerudo.

Dengan cara ini, Gerudo telah berkembang menjadi Raja Iblis yang terbangun juga.

「Ini hanya kesempatan yang sempurna, sementara Anda membayangkan penampilan yang Anda inginkan untuk diri sendiri, Anda harus istirahat.」

「Dipahami! Saya sangat berterima kasih atas berkat yang telah Anda berikan kepada saya! 」

Meninggalkan Gerudo yang berterima kasih padaku, aku mempercayakan sisanya kepada petugas perawatan, dan meninggalkan ruangan.

Karena saya sangat tersentuh dan hampir menangis, dapat dikatakan bahwa saya telah melarikan diri. Karena aku berharap setengah matang tidak akan baik, ketika sampai pada Perang Besar. Evolusi Gerudo memiliki waktu yang tepat, namun saya tidak berpikir saya sangat bahagia. Upacara selesai tanpa masalah karena dia tidak menolak kali ini.

Dan, ada pekerjaan lain untuk saya.

Saya pergi ke posting kelompok labirin.

Di dalam labirin, Dino tampaknya membidik Ramiris, jadi ada kebutuhan untuk menghadapinya di masa depan.

Saya mendengarkan ceritanya, karena itu perlu untuk masa depan.

Dino telah mengalahkan Beretta, dia juga mengalahkan Adalman dan Albert, sepertinya dia hampir menumpangkan tangan ke Ramiris.

Oh well, pada akhirnya, Ramiris aman karena Zegion melindunginya, itu adalah keputusan yang cerdas untuk mengawasinya sejak awal, seperti yang saya perkirakan pengkhianatan Dino.

Tapi, bukan berarti Beretta dan Adalman lemah.

Mereka sangat kuat, namun Dino adalah musuh yang lebih kuat dari yang kita duga.

Juga, saya terkejut dengan penampilan Zegion yang luar biasa.

Dia keluar dari keberadaan norma. Di antara bawahan saya, dia dan Diablo membentuk sepasang orang kuat yang tak tertandingi.

Kekuatannya jelas pada tingkat yang berbeda dari penjaga lantai lainnya.

Ketika saya melihat arsip, Zegion tampaknya telah mengalahkan Dino dengan mudah, sambil masih menyembunyikan kemampuannya.

Anak yang menakutkan.

Jujur, saya pikir itu hal yang sangat baik bahwa dia adalah sekutu saya.

Saya tidak bermaksud mengatakan bahwa kinerja Adalman dan yang lainnya buruk, saya ingin memuji mereka, karena menghabiskan waktu dengan sangat baik.

Namun, saya khawatir mereka, yang sangat tulus, akan menyalahkan diri mereka sendiri lagi.

Dan, seperti yang saya pikirkan,

「Saya sangat minta maaf, Rimuru-sama. Saya telah mengekspos Ramiris-sama dengan bahaya―― 」

Ketika saya memanggil Beretta, Adalman dan rekannya menundukkan kepala dan meminta maaf kepada saya.

Seperti yang diharapkan. Saya pikir mereka akan merasakan semacam tanggung jawab, seperti ini.

「Tidak, bukankah kalian berhasil mengulur-ulur Dino, sesuai dengan rencana, kan? Ini adalah prestasi luar biasa. 」

「Namun, saya adalah tokoh sentral dalam pertahanan.

Meskipun aku ditunjuk oleh Rimuru-sama sebagai wali Ramiris-sama, dalam krisis ini―― 」

Beretta masih berargumen dengan keras.

Dia pasti sangat frustrasi, tetapi saya percaya bahwa dia bukan satu-satunya yang memperhatikan apakah dia bisa menang atau tidak, selain itu dia mengambil tindakan yang paling tepat.

Dia kelihatannya akhirnya tenang, ketika aku memujinya bahwa itu adalah pekerjaan yang luar biasa.

Beretta dan Adalman telah mendapatkan cukup banyak prestasi, tidak hanya dari melakukan serangan sembrono mengetahui bahwa tidak mungkin menang melawan Dino.

Mengenai hasilnya, Ramiris aman sehingga tidak ada masalah apa pun.

Selain,

「Oh well, aku mengerti perasaanmu yang menyesali kurangnya kekuatanmu.

Jika begitu, maka saya akan memberi Anda semua lebih banyak kekuatan! 」

Jadi, saya mengambil pose seolah-olah menunjukkan "Raja Iblis Yang Hebat!", Dan memegang tangan saya di atas kepala Adalman.

《Pemberitahuan。 Apakah Anda ingin melakukan evolusi Individu: Adalman? YA TIDAK "

Saya membalas dengan YA dan evolusi kebangkitan Adalman selesai.

Selanjutnya adalah Beretta.

Untungnya, saya mendapatkan sejumlah besar jiwa selama pertempuran dengan Tentara Kekaisaran, oleh karena itu saya dapat mengembangkan Beretta.

Meskipun aku telah mengubah hubungan tuan dan pelayan dengan Ramiris sebagai tuan daripada aku, Beretta masih salah satu iblis yang aku ciptakan. Bahkan sekarang, saya memiliki otoritas sebagai sub-master, dan ada juga tugas penting untuk melindungi Ramiris.

Karena saya bisa memperkuatnya, saya ingin membangunkannya. Kekuatan yang diperlukan untuk menemani keempat raja naga.

「Kamu juga, Beretta. Mulai sekarang, terus lindungi Ramiris! 」

Aku mengakhiri evolusi kebangkitan Beretta ketika aku memerintahkannya.

"Iya nih! Aku akan mempertaruhkan nyawanya! 」

Beretta sangat mengangguk pada kata-kataku dan sepertinya menerima evolusi.

Kemudian saya mengatakan kepadanya untuk memulihkan diri dengan tenang dan membuatnya kembali ke pekerjaannya.

Oh well, itu karena mereka kuat sampai-sampai bahkan jika musuh agak kuat, pertahanan labirin akan baik-baik saja. Namun, ada juga kemungkinan bahwa penjaga akan perlu maju untuk menghadapi musuh.

Jika Beretta menjadi penanggung jawab perlindungan Ramiris dan manajemen labirin, maka aku akan merasa lebih yakin.

Dan dengan ini, salah satu tugas saya berakhir.

Ketika saya mengunjungi Ramiris yang sedang tidur tidak bersalah di sofa, dia sepertinya tidur dengan bahagia.

Cukup lega karena dia aman.

「Munya munya ...... Apakah kamu bajingan!

Saya akan menguji semua 48 gerakan khusus saya pada Anda ...... 」

Apakah dia berbicara sambil tidur?

Orang ini, dan dia bahkan percaya diri dalam mimpinya ......

「Saya sangat senang bahwa Anda aman.」

Saya berkata, dengan suara kecil agar tidak membangunkannya, dan kemudian meninggalkan ruangan.

Saya telah mempercayakan Shuna untuk merawat Ramiris. Karena dia hanya tidur, itu akan baik-baik saja.

Saya percaya bahwa labirin akan baik-baik saja selama Zegion melindunginya, tetapi untuk saat ini saya bertanya tentang hal itu dari Zegion juga.

「Zegion, Anda melakukan pekerjaan dengan baik.

Saya sudah tahu bahwa Dino curiga, namun waktu pengkhianatannya adalah pada saat kami kekurangan tangan.

Saya merasa lega bahwa Anda ada di sini. 」

「Tidak, seseorang seperti saya masih harus menempuh jalan panjang.

Jika itu adalah Rimuru-sama, bahkan jika aku tidak muncul, kamu bisa membunuhnya dengan satu serangan yang melintasi ruang-waktu, kan?

Saya merasa bersyukur atas kesempatan yang Anda berikan kepada saya untuk berpartisipasi, apakah saya bisa bertemu - ――

Apa yang dia katakan?

Pemogokan yang melintasi ruang-waktu? Aku mungkin tidak bisa melakukan itu …… Monster apa yang orang ini anggap sebagai ......

「Ah, ya. Itu benar ...... Mungkin, aku mungkin bisa melakukan itu, kan. 」

"Iya nih! Ini adalah tugas yang sederhana jika itu adalah Rimuru-sama. 」

Ini jauh melampaui rasa hormat, saya merasa tatapannya lebih seperti seseorang yang menghormati Tuhan mereka.

Karena Zegion memiliki mata majemuk, ini mungkin tidak lebih dari imajinasiku.

Sambil menenangkan diri, aku berbicara dengan Zegion sebentar.

Rupanya, dia mengukir kutukan ke Dino. Bukan jenis Manipulasi Pikiran, tetapi jenis yang menakutkan yang bahkan memiliki kuasa atas hidup dan mati.

Dalam kasus bahwa target tidak bertindak sesuai dengan niat praktisi, itu bisa langsung merampok target hidup mereka. Namun, itu tidak dapat membuat batasan yang terperinci, seperti menahan tindakan target, sehingga tidak dapat benar-benar membatasi apa yang akan dilakukan pihak lain.

Meskipun dia tampaknya tahu kapan target berbohong, tidak ada batasan khusus selain itu. Ia mampu membuatnya mustahil, bagi target, untuk mengatakan apa pun tentang kutukan kepada orang lain, karena itu adalah isyarat untuk aktivasi kemampuan.

Sederhananya, itu adalah kutukan yang menangkap kehidupan dan kematian target. Menolak tidak mungkin dilakukan setelah kutukan diukir.

Dengan kata lain, sudah tidak mungkin bagi Dino untuk mengangkat kutukan, ya. Dimungkinkan baginya untuk mengeluarkannya, dengan kerja sama dari pemegang keterampilan berpangkat tinggi.

Tapi setidaknya Zegion, bisa membuat penghalang bahkan pada pemilik Ultimate Skill.

Tentu saja, dia bisa mengambil nyawanya pada kesempatan seperti itu, karena dia telah menyebabkan kematian Dino sekali sebelumnya. Saat ini, Dino hidup dengan kehidupan sementara yang diberikan Zegion.

Sejujurnya, Keterampilan Tertinggi 『Illusion Lord Mephisto』 tampaknya merupakan kemampuan yang keterlaluan.

Saya punya perasaan, bahwa setidaknya untuk orang ini, tidak ada orang lain dengan spesialisasi pertempuran yang luar biasa dan kemampuan keterampilan.

Bisa dibilang mereka saling melengkapi. Zegion telah memperoleh keterampilan yang menghilangkan kelemahannya, sementara ada banyak orang yang memperoleh keterampilan untuk meningkatkan kekuatan mereka sebagai gantinya.

Dengan keahliannya, ia dapat menciptakan situasi yang menguntungkan bagi dirinya sendiri, ia juga memperluas kemampuannya untuk menggunakannya secara efektif. Perasaan tempurnya menjadi lebih penting dari titik ini, namun, pada aspek ini saya dapat mengatakan bahwa ia unggul.

Zegion adalah pria yang sangat menakutkan.

Setelah itu, saya menghubungi Dino melalui kutukan, memberinya peringatan.

Oh well, untuk pria itu, bertarung melawannya mungkin lebih sederhana.

Dikatakan bahwa teman yang tidak kompeten lebih menakutkan daripada musuh yang sangat baik. Dalam kasus Dino, Anda dapat berpikir bahwa dia berkontribusi untuk sisi ini hanya dengan berada di pihak musuh.

Paling-paling, aku ingin dia menghalangi sisi Yuuki.

Saya berkeliling untuk berbagai hal lain dan setelah menyelesaikan bisnis saya di Tempest, saya kembali ke Imperial Capital.

Saya kembali ke Ibukota Kekaisaran.

Saya mulai berpikir tentang keterampilan sambil mengambil komando sebagai pemimpin pasukan.

Itu adalah hal yang paling penting untuk dilakukan sebelum Krishna datang.

Pertempuran antara iblis dan Ksatria Kerajaan dan konfrontasi berikut dengan Yuuki yang menjadi Angra Mainyu, serta pertarungan antara Zegion dan Dino.

Informasi yang saya peroleh dari peristiwa-peristiwa ini telah menimbulkan keraguan di dalam diri saya. Itu berkaitan dengan hal yang belum kupikirkan secara mendalam sampai sekarang; tentang dasar dunia ini.

Begitulah adanya, jadi itulah yang terjadi, tetapi saya tidak bisa mengabaikan pertanyaan saya tentang arus peristiwa ini.

Dengan kata lain,

"Apa itu Keterampilan?"

Tentang masalah ini.

Saya memiliki Keterampilan Unik sejak saya datang ke dunia ini.

Pada dasarnya, dikatakan bahwa hanya individu kelas pahlawan yang memiliki Keterampilan Unik.

Namun, kemampuannya beragam karena disebut unik; yaitu, sejenis.

Karena unik, ada perbedaan besar dalam kekuatan kemampuan, jika itu menjadi Keterampilan Ultimate, maka akan ada perbedaan kekuatan, seperti surga dan bumi.

Orang-orang yang memperoleh Keterampilan Utama akan memahami hukum dunia. Karena itu, mereka adalah eksistensi yang unggul dalam memanfaatkan sihir.

Karena itu lebih unggul daripada Keterampilan Unik, saya berpikir bahwa satu-satunya hal yang bisa menentang Keterampilan Ultimate, adalah Keterampilan Ultimate lain.

Tapi, sepertinya itu bukan aturan mutlak, meskipun itu benar.

Misalnya, Chloe's 『Penjara Tak Terbatas』 dan 『Absolute Severance』.

Meskipun keterampilan ini adalah kelas yang unik, kekuatan mereka, pada dasarnya dapat dikatakan milik kelas utama.

Tergantung pada situasinya, itu bahkan mungkin menang melawan pemegang Skill Ultimate.

Selain itu, iblis telah menunjukkan ini, dengan mengalahkan Ksatria Kerajaan yang memiliki Hadiah Tertinggi 『Alternatif』, yang merupakan kelas pamungkas, dengan Keterampilan Unik mereka.

Dengan kata lain, perbedaan antara Ultimate dan Unique tidak mutlak.

Bahkan jika saya memikirkannya dari sudut pandang seperti itu, maka sebuah pertanyaan muncul: "Apa itu 'keterampilan'?".

Masih mudah untuk memahami keterampilan bawaan spesies. Karena, seperti yang dinyatakan, itu adalah keterampilan yang dimiliki spesies tertentu.

Saya juga bisa memahami Keterampilan Ekstra dan Keterampilan Dasar, seperti ilmu pedang dan sihir.

Karena keterampilan seperti itu hanya menghasilkan perbedaan antara masing-masing individu berdasarkan tingkat kemahiran mereka.

Namun, Keterampilan Unik menghasilkan secara individual, dan kinerja masing-masing juga berbeda.

Ada juga yang mirip yang bisa dikelompokkan bersama, namun tidak ada yang identik. Mungkin, bahkan jika keterampilan memiliki nama yang sama, kinerja dan aturan mereka mungkin berbeda.

Dari pengalaman saya saat ini, saya yakin bahwa mudah untuk membangkitkan kemampuan dengan memiliki keinginan atau keinginan yang kuat.

Alih-alih bakat, itu bakat. Tidak peduli seberapa besar keinginan Anda, Anda tidak dapat memperolehnya jika energi Anda tidak mencukupi. Bagaimanapun, keterampilan bukanlah sesuatu yang bisa diperoleh dengan berharap saja. Kekuatan atau kelemahan keterampilan secara langsung dipengaruhi oleh kemauan. Untuk mewujudkan efek yang lebih kuat, kemauan yang kuat diperlukan. Pada akhirnya, saya kira tekad akan digunakan sebagai sumber daya utama. Setelah memastikan sifat keterampilan, langkah selanjutnya adalah menyelidiki penggunaannya dengan benar. Karena saya memiliki Raphael-san dengan saya, saya minta dia mengajari saya penggunaan yang benar. Bahkan melalui memperoleh keterampilan sendiri, tidak seperti seseorang akan mengerti bagaimana menggunakannya. Contoh yang bagus adalah Dino. Menurut Raphael-san, keterampilan Dino tampaknya adalah 『Slothful Lord Belphegor』 dari seri Deadly Sin. Serial Deadly Sin adalah keterampilan yang ditempatkan di peringkat teratas di antara Keterampilan Ultimate. Meski begitu, dia benar-benar dikalahkan oleh Zegion. Itu adalah hasil yang diprediksi Raphael-san. Aku setengah yakin, namun Raphael-san menegaskan bahwa labirin itu baik-baik saja jika Zegion ada di sana. Hasilnya persis seperti yang dikatakan Raphael-san.

Lalu aku mendengar alasannya,

"Larutan. Individual Dino telah membuat penggunaan skill yang salah.》

Jadi, dia menjelaskan dengan cara itu, seperti mengatakannya sebagai hal biasa.

『Slothful Lord Belphegor』 yang lahir dari pikiran yang malas menjadi semakin lemah saat pemegangnya bergerak. Oleh karena itu, cara yang benar untuk menggunakannya adalah mempekerjakan bawahan (atau teman). Hanya dengan memberikan penggunaan kemampuannya ke proxy, keterampilan itu akan menunjukkan kekuatan sebenarnya.

Jika itu Guy, Dia akan memahami sifat dari kemampuan dan menguasainya dengan benar. Namun, tulang malas seperti Dino tampaknya tidak memperhatikan sifat sebenarnya dari skill itu.

Sebaliknya, dia mungkin hanya menguasai keterampilan secara insting dan dengan cara yang tidak terduga jika dia selalu mengandalkan orang lain.

Kekalahannya adalah hasil dari bergeraknya dia. Orang itu memiliki karakter seperti itu, dan mungkin itu sebabnya dia selamat.

Tentu saja, moniker dari "semakin dia bekerja, semakin dia gagal" bukan hanya untuk pertunjukan.

Selain itu, ada juga keterampilan lain yang sulit dikendalikan, seperti milik Masayuki, meskipun ia sendiri tidak menginginkannya, karena ia secara alami dipandang sebagai pahlawan.

Tidakkah sulit untuk mengetahui sifat sebenarnya dari keterampilan dan cara untuk menguasainya? Ini identik dengan memahami hati seseorang, tugas yang rumit.

Itulah sebabnya Anda tidak akan pernah bisa menampilkan kinerja sebenarnya jika Anda salah mengira bahwa 'keterampilan' hanyalah senjata atau sejenisnya.

Pertanyaan selanjutnya.

'Apakah mungkin untuk menduplikasi Skill Ultimate dan memberikannya kepada bawahan?'

Sifat sebenarnya dari keterampilan Dino adalah Hadiah Ultimate yang diproduksi secara massal oleh 『Justice Lord Michael』. Pemindahan keterampilan ke bawahan atau teman, tetapi bisakah saya mentransfer kemampuan yang ditemukan? Saya tidak dapat menyangkal kemungkinannya karena mungkin ada contoh sebelumnya.

Namun, jika memungkinkan, apakah itu berarti memungkinkan untuk menciptakan pasukan yang tak terkalahkan?

Saya memikirkannya sampai sejauh itu dan segera menyangkal pikiran saya sendiri.

Jika Anda hanya memikirkannya, itu tidak akan semudah itu.

Tentu saja Ksatria Kerajaan yang memiliki Hadiah Tertinggi itu kuat. Namun, hanya ada dua orang yang benar-benar mampu menguasai Hadiah Tertinggi mereka, mereka adalah Damrada dan prajurit yang adalah Ksatria No. 3, Graneet-san.

Lagipula orang-orang lain tidak mengerti sifat Hadiah Utama, dan dengan demikian dikalahkan oleh iblis yang hanya memiliki Keterampilan Unik.

Menurut pendapat saya, bahkan Damrada hanya sama atau sedikit lebih rendah dari Hinata selama masa jayanya.

Dia memang kuat, tetapi Hadiah Tertinggi lemah.

Mungkin saja bedanya dengan pria bernama Kondo yang telah mengembangkan kemampuannya sendiri.

Saya yakin pria itu istimewa. Dari kenyataan bahwa dia tidak goyah bahkan ketika sedang kewalahan oleh Carrera dan setara dengan Diablo hanya dalam hal kekuatannya.

(Hei, apakah mungkin bagiku untuk memberikan Hadiah Utama kepada bawahanku?)

"Larutan. Itu mungkin》

Raphael menjawab seolah itu bukan apa-apa.

Saya tampaknya dapat memberikan salinan kemampuan saya kepada seseorang yang memiliki bakat untuk itu. Namun, tidak ada artinya jika orang itu tidak bisa menguasainya.

Kalau dipikir-pikir, bukankah 『Pasokan』 cocok dengan 『Rantai Makanan』?

Sejak awal, Raphael-san telah memberikan kemampuan hanya kepada orang-orang yang memiliki bakat dan mampu mengatasinya.

Dan bagi orang-orang yang menginginkannya, misalnya keterampilan Zegion dan Veldora-san, versi remodel yang diperkuat akan dilakukan.

Bahkan jika saya hanya memberikan kemampuan yang kuat, saya tidak bisa memberikan penguasaan untuk itu.

Karena itu, untuk penguatan, dimungkinkan bahkan jika mereka memintanya sejak awal. Karena jika mereka tidak memintanya, maka itu akan sia-sia.

Rudra salah pada saat itu.

Tidak, bahkan jika dia menyadarinya, dia mungkin tidak bisa membantu tetapi melakukannya.

Bahkan jika keterampilan yang kuat diberikan, tidak ada artinya jika orang itu sendiri tidak memahami pikiran mereka sendiri atau kemauan yang kuat untuk menguasai kemampuan.

Turun ke pertanyaan terakhir.

'Pertama-tama, apa itu Angra Mainyu?'

Bisa jadi sesuatu seperti kepribadian ganda yang disebut gangguan identitas disosiatif.

Namun, Raphael-san berpikir bahwa itu mungkin eksistensi yang berevolusi dari Will yang tumbuh dari skill.

Saya juga bisa memahami pemahaman yang begitu mendalam terhadap keterampilan.

Sejak awal, itu sama seperti ketika Raphael-san mengambil alih tubuhku dan aku menjadi lebih kuat. Kehendak otonom dibuat dari kemampuan yang menghilangkan emosi. Eksistensi yang merepotkan. Baik negosiasi maupun perundingan dengannya mungkin tidak ada artinya. Jika tujuannya adalah untuk menghancurkan dunia, maka dia tidak akan menerima apa pun selain kehancuran mutlak. Tampaknya tidak ada artinya mengharapkannya mengubah niatnya. Karena jika itu Raphael, dia akan menerima tuntutan saya dan menyelesaikannya. Serta para malaikat yang menyertainya. Individu-individu berpangkat tinggi yang disebut Seraphim memiliki volume energi yang tinggi untuk tingkat Demon Lord yang terbangun. Dan mereka tampaknya semacam bentuk kehidupan spiritual. Titik lemah malaikat, aspek yang membuat mereka lebih rendah dibandingkan dengan iblis, adalah bahwa malaikat tidak memiliki Kehendak. Kekuatan bentuk kehidupan spiritual berubah oleh kemauan mereka. Malaikat hanya memiliki energi tinggi dan karenanya tidak benar-benar ancaman. Meskipun mereka kuat, mereka seperti robot yang hanya mengikuti perintah mereka, saya memprediksi bahwa mereka akan lemah sebagai individu. Namun, mereka akan menjadi keberadaan yang menyaingi iblis jika mereka memiliki wasiat. Tidak seperti sebelumnya, sekarang para malaikat telah mencapai inkarnasi. Jika kehendak orang-orang yang ditangkap terbangun, saya pikir mereka akan berubah menjadi pasukan yang sangat merepotkan. Sangat mungkin bahwa individu yang memperoleh Keterampilan akan muncul di antara mereka. Apa yang akan terjadi jika Hadiah Utama diberikan kepada orang-orang seperti itu? mereka seperti robot yang hanya mengikuti perintah mereka, saya memperkirakan mereka akan lemah sebagai individu. Namun, mereka akan menjadi keberadaan yang menyaingi iblis jika mereka memiliki wasiat. Tidak seperti sebelumnya, sekarang para malaikat telah mencapai inkarnasi. Jika kehendak orang-orang yang ditangkap terbangun, saya pikir mereka akan berubah menjadi pasukan yang sangat merepotkan. Sangat mungkin bahwa individu yang memperoleh Keterampilan akan muncul di antara mereka. Apa yang akan terjadi jika Hadiah Utama diberikan kepada orang-orang seperti itu? mereka seperti robot yang hanya mengikuti perintah mereka, saya memperkirakan mereka akan lemah sebagai individu. Namun, mereka akan menjadi keberadaan yang menyaingi iblis jika mereka memiliki wasiat. Tidak seperti sebelumnya, sekarang para malaikat telah mencapai inkarnasi. Jika kehendak orang-orang yang ditangkap terbangun, saya pikir mereka akan berubah menjadi pasukan yang sangat merepotkan. Sangat mungkin bahwa individu yang memperoleh Keterampilan akan muncul di antara mereka. Apa yang akan terjadi jika Hadiah Utama diberikan kepada orang-orang seperti itu? Sangat mungkin bahwa individu yang memperoleh Keterampilan akan muncul di antara mereka. Apa yang akan terjadi jika Hadiah Utama diberikan kepada orang-orang seperti itu? Sangat mungkin bahwa individu yang memperoleh Keterampilan akan muncul di antara mereka. Apa yang akan terjadi jika Hadiah Utama diberikan kepada orang-orang seperti itu?

Selain itu, jika aku memberikan Hadiah Tertinggi ......

Meskipun sangat mungkin bahwa mereka tidak akan bisa menguasainya, dapatkah saya memastikan bakat mereka dengan Raphael? Seperti yang diharapkan, dalam hal Yuuki = Angra Mainyu dapat memastikan bakat dan meningkatkan jumlah pemegang keterampilan mereka, itu akan menjadi ancaman yang jelas. Jika demikian, pihak ini juga akan menentangnya, jadi, haruskah saya memberikan beberapa Hadiah Utama kepada para eksekutif? Jika mereka menjadi lebih kuat, meskipun hanya sedikit. Saya bingung apakah saya harus melakukannya atau tidak, meskipun ternyata tidak berguna.

"Pertanyaan. Untuk memperkuat orang-orang yang memiliki bakat, apakah Anda ingin mempromosikan keterampilan mereka? YA TIDAK"

N?

Apakah begitu, memberikan bantuan kepada mereka yang berada di tengah evolusi, ya?

Membantu dengan promosi kemampuan seperti apa yang saya lakukan dengan Zegion? Itu mungkin bagus juga.

Saya membalas dengan YA.

Perasaan ingin memperkuat bawahan saya, untuk menentang pasukan musuh, tampaknya ditularkan, bahkan jika hanya sedikit. Mau bagaimana lagi kalau aku bingung, namun hanya butuh waktu sebanyak ini untuk membuat hati dan pikiranku saling bertentangan. Namun, jika Anda memikirkannya, Raphael-san selalu memberi saya bantuan. Bahkan sekarang, dia telah mengambil tindakan yang tepat dan dia akan melakukan reorganisasi keterampilan saya.

Namun, aku masih belum punya cara yang cocok untuk memanggilnya selain 『Guru』 atau 『Raphael-san』. Jadi, tiba-tiba saya memiliki pikiran bawah sadar.

(Hei, Raphael ...... haruskah aku memberimu nama resmi juga?

Itu benar …… karena kamu selalu mengajariku tentang berbagai hal, bagaimana dengan “Ciel” ≒ oshieru [2]?)

Segera setelah saya mengatakannya dengan aneh,

《！！！！！！！！》

Aku merasakan Will yang intens, seolah-olah menjadi gila, dari Raphael.

Pada saat yang sama, berbagai informasi mulai mengalir ke saya, dan menjadi torrent.

"Pemberitahuan. Manas (Inti Kebijaksanaan Tuhan): Ciel lahir dari Keterampilan Akhir 『Hikmat Tuhan Raphael』.

Pengumuman ini disembunyikan oleh Manas: Ciel.》

Tiba-tiba, "Suara Dunia" telah mencapai pikiranku.

Ini …… evolusi?

Raphael-sensei, tidak ada Ciel-sensei yang bisa menyembunyikannya dalam mode penyembunyian.

Ciel tampaknya mampu menyembunyikan "Suara Dunia". Saya terkagum.

Tapi, lebih dari itu ...

Saya merasa agak diberkati. Sepertinya saya sudah melakukannya lagi.

Yah, seperti yang diharapkan, seseorang yang memberi nama pada suatu keterampilan, dengan penuh kasih sayang, seperti orang cabul, mungkin belum pernah ada, sampai sekarang.

《Saya, saya Ciel. Orang yang mengintegrasikan keterampilan, Manas.

Yang akan mendukung tuanku, dalam jiwa Setan Lord Rimuru.

Guru, sekali lagi, tolong perlakukan saya dengan baik‼》

Ooh ……

Meskipun dia masih memiliki nada robot, dia menjadi sangat fasih !?

Saya merasa bahwa kinerja kecepatan kalkulasinya dan hal-hal lain telah ditingkatkan sampai taraf tertentu.

Menyatukan keterampilan saya tampaknya telah meningkatkan keterampilan.

Itu hanya ide yang tiba-tiba, tetapi hasilnya mengejutkan saya.

(Senang bertemu denganmu, Ciel ……?)

"Iya nih! Mohon perlakukan saya dengan baik, Tuan!》

Maka “Ciel” dilahirkan terpisah dari Raphael.

"Ciel" akan memainkan peran lebih lanjut sebagai sub-otak saya yang menyatukan kemampuan saya.

* * *

[1] 戦 闘 記録 Sentou Kiroku = Catatan Tempur dibaca sebagai Arsip. Pada dasarnya, anggap ini sebagai Rimuru melihat rekaman kamera ~

[2] Oshieru (Mengajar) = Shieru = Ciel dalam bahasa Inggris.





Bab 191: Sintesis Keterampilan Ciel-Sensei


Atas kemauan saya yang tidak masuk akal, Ciel, antarmuka yang cerdas, telah memisahkan dirinya dari Wisdom Lord Raphael.

Gelar resminya tampaknya adalah Manas (Inti Kebijaksanaan Ilahi); Inti yang cerdas, dia dapat dianggap sebagai hal semacam itu.

Mirip dengan Bentuk Kehidupan Spiritual, ia tidak mampu mematerialisasi dengan kehendaknya sendiri.

Suatu entitas yang hanya "berpikir"; Dia telah menjadi semacam keberadaan.

Yang ada sebagai bagian dari jiwaku, orang dapat menganggapnya seperti memiliki "hati" kedua (Sebenarnya, bukan itu yang terjadi, kognisi menjadi 'perasaan diri' = hati).

Nah, apa yang terjadi dengan Kebijaksanaan Lord Raphael?

Sama seperti saya berpikir Raphael telah menjadi kalkulator kecepatan tinggi sederhana,

《Guru, tentang mensintesis Keterampilan yang tersisa yang ditahan, apa yang harus dilakukan?》

Saya sudah lupa.

Banyak hal terjadi, dan saya akhirnya tidak memulai proses.

Jika saya ingat dengan benar, kami akan menggunakan 『Covenant King Uriel』 dan 『Storm King Veldora』 untuk menghasilkan 『Stellar Wind King Hastur』.

Ngomong-ngomong, setelah kejadian baru-baru ini, AKA menyerap Velgrynd "Scorch Dragon", aku juga mendapatkan Skill Ultimate 『Scorch King Velgrynd』.

Velgrynd, yang telah menyingkirkan Kaisar Rudra, sekarang dalam keadaan bebas, melalui Pelepasan Naga Scorch saya.

Meskipun saya tidak bertanya tentang hal itu, 『Charity King Raguel』 kemungkinan besar sudah dianalisis.

Pada akhirnya, sepertinya aku sekarang menggunakan 5 ~ 6 Keterampilan Ultimate.

Ditambah lagi, dengan mengaktifkan Chain Rantai Makanan 』, kemampuan bawahan saya yang mengalami evolusi, tidak termasuk beberapa kemampuan, juga telah dikumpulkan.

Ini tidak seperti saya dapat sepenuhnya menggunakan begitu banyak, mensintesis mereka harus baik-baik saja. Lagi pula tidak ada pertempuran, jadi tidak ada masalah di sana.

Tetapi, apakah menggunakan keterampilan pada tingkat 『Scorch King Velgrynd』 atau 『Gluttony King Beelzebuth』 untuk mensintesis dapat membuat sesuatu yang lain?

Saat itu, selama pesta teh kami dengan Guy, dia mengatakan sesuatu tentang keterampilan "Dosa" menjadi bagian dari "Seri", saya samar-samar ingat dia mengatakan sesuatu seperti itu ......

(Benar, aku harus mulai mensintesis. Tapi, bukankah Seri Sin dan Keterampilan Seri Keutamaan (Malaikat) agak penting?)

"Tidak ada masalah. Sebagai kemampuan tingkat yang lebih tinggi, mengumpulkan semua 7 akan memberikan bonus yang melepaskan batas ras.

Seri Sin akan menjadi ras Setan, dan Seri Kebajikan akan menjadi ras Angel.

Itulah sebabnya, untuk mencegah musuh mengumpulkan kemampuan, Guy ・ Crimson memutuskan untuk menerima Leon, yang akan menjadi spekulasi saya.》

Kanan.

Pembicaraan ini tentang melepaskan batasan ras, apakah itu berarti ia datang setelah menyelesaikan evolusi, melalui jiwa?

"Itu betul.

Saat ini, ras Iblis memiliki pohon evolusi mereka disegel.

Tetapi, melalui "Penamaan" Guru, dan persembahan jiwa, batas itu telah dilepaskan untuk beberapa individu.

Bagi para Malaikat, pohon evolusi mereka tidak disegel, tetapi "Kehendak Bebas" mereka telah disegel.

Namun sayangnya, Angra ・ Mainyu kemungkinan besar telah melepaskan segel itu dengan cara lain.

Misalnya, mendominasi pikiran seseorang, berinkarnasi dengan tubuh Malaikat, dan menggunakan kemampuan Malaikat tersebut dengan cara itu, atau dengan cara serupa lainnya— ――

Ah, jadi begitu.

Karena Malaikat memiliki "Kehendak Bebas" mereka disegel, itu sebabnya mereka sangat lemah. Tidak heran rasanya aneh.

Dibandingkan dengan Iblis yang memiliki kehendak bebas, para Malaikat yang kekurangannya adalah tidak wajar, tidak peduli bagaimana kamu melihatnya.

Ngomong-ngomong tidak wajar, aturan berevolusi untuk Iblis juga aneh.

Jika mereka matang secara alami, yang tertinggi yang bisa mereka capai hanya sampai tingkat Arc Demon.

Bahkan Iblis, yang telah hidup sangat lama, mengapa mereka tidak dapat berevolusi ke tingkat Demon Noble ?, pikirku.

Melalui ini, kedua belah pihak seimbang.

Perkelahian akan terjadi hanya dari dua pertemuan ras. Ini seperti pekerjaan seseorang, sebagai sarana untuk menyeimbangkannya.

Taruhan saya ada di Veldanava.

Di dunia bawah, kemungkinan besar hanya ada 1 Demon Noble yang ada, yang telah ditugaskan dengan peran administrator.

Demons Arc yang baru saja lahir, dan Demons Arc veteran seperti Diablo dan Testarossa adalah keberadaan karisma yang tak tertandingi.

Itu jelas, karena mereka tidak memiliki kekuatan untuk berevolusi secara alami.

Tidak diketahui sejak kapan, tetapi diperkirakan bahwa evolusi lebih lanjut tidak mungkin, tanpa mengumpulkan semua 7 Sin Series Skill.

Jika kamu berpikir seperti ini, saat Guy tiba-tiba muncul tepat ketika ada gelombang Iblis Noble di bawahku, aku sekarang bisa memahami tindakannya.

Malaikat-malaikat itu semua "diperbudak" di bawah King Justice King Michael 』dengan surat wasiat mereka disegel.

Dengan mengumpulkan semua 7 Keterampilan Seri Kebajikan, kehendak Malaikat yang terkena dampak akan dirilis.

Tapi, daripada menjelma sebagai Malaikat, itu akan sama dengan mendapatkan kendali atas Malaikat dengan kehendak bebas.

Tidak ada keraguan bahwa pihak yang melepaskan 'segel' mereka terlebih dahulu akan unggul.

Berpikir seperti itu, Guy memprioritaskan mengumpulkan Keterampilan Seri Sin. Pada saat yang sama, ia membawa seseorang (Leon) yang memiliki keterampilan Seri Malaikat, sehingga menghalangi sisi Malaikat.

Dengan pemikiran itu, ada kemungkinan bahwa ada kelompok yang mengumpulkan Keterampilan untuk melepaskan sisi Malaikat juga.

Hmm, tunggu sebentar ....

Seharusnya itu adalah pilihan yang baik bagi Rudra untuk menjadi orang yang memimpin para Malaikat yang kehilangan kemauan mereka.

Tetapi itu akan menyiratkan bahwa hanya karena meterai pada kehendak para Malaikat, meterai pada iblis dilaksanakan untuk menyeimbangkannya.

Sambil memberikan Rudra 『Raja Keadilan Michael』, itu dilemparkan sebagai bonus?

Yah, tidak ada gunanya memikirkan hal-hal seperti itu sekarang juga.

Mekanisme yang mendasari antara Seri Sin dan Seri Kebajikan ini tidak benar-benar relevan bagi saya.

Evolusi Iblis belum menjadi masalah bagi saya.

(Sepertinya tidak ada masalah. Baiklah, aku akan menyerahkannya padamu! Ah, wai ....)

《Dipahami! Mulai prosesnya segera !!》

Melihat ke belakang, saya adalah seorang pria yang mengulangi kesalahannya.

Tidak pernah merupakan ide yang baik untuk mengatakan "serahkan padamu", belumkah aku menyesali hal ini berkali-kali! Mengapa, saya melakukannya lagi ....

Bahkan sebelum saya bisa menghentikannya, Ciel, yang sudah sepenuhnya siap, mulai mensintesis kemampuan saya.

Ada kemungkinan bahwa saya memberikan lampu hijau secara tidak sengaja, kemudian dengan panik mencoba menghentikan proses, semuanya berada dalam jangkauan prediksinya.

Dengan kecepatan yang menakutkan, sintesis dimulai segera setelah saya menyetujui.

Seolah-olah telah menunggu selamanya dalam "Tetap!" posisi, dia bekerja dengan kecepatan marah ...... (EN: tetap! seperti anjing peliharaan)

Ahh, dia pasti melakukan sesuatu yang luar biasa luar biasa, pikirku, setelah menyerah berusaha menghentikannya.

Nah sekarang.

Sintesis ini terasa menyenangkan kali ini, karena berakhir tanpa saya beralih ke Mode Tidur.

Itu yang diharapkan.

Karena aku dimintai persetujuan di tengah pertempuran, jika proses itu membuatku masuk ke Mode Tidur, bahkan aku akan marah.

Butuh lebih dari 48 jam untuk menyelesaikan proses; Selama waktu itu, saya tidak punya masalah dengan kegiatan sehari-hari.

(Jadi, bagaimana penampilannya kali ini?)

Mengambil pertanyaan saya sebagai peluang, Ciel dengan senang hati mulai menjelaskan hasilnya.

《Pertama, menggunakan 『Wisdom Lord Raphael』 dan 『Gluttony King Beelzebuth』 I synthes――》

(Ooooi !! Tunggu tunggu tunggu tunggu――)

Apa yang dia katakan tadi !?

Orang ini, apa yang baru saja dia biarkan lolos? 『Dewa Kebijaksanaan Raphael』, yang merupakan "tubuh" aslinya, digunakan sebagai bagian dari sintesis !?

Apakah ada masalah? adalah kesan yang diberikan Ciel, tapi aku tenang dan memulai tanya jawab dengannya.

Tapi, sepertinya aku tidak salah dengan apa yang aku dengar. Aku tahu itu agak tidak mungkin untuk keliru tentang hal-hal seperti itu ......

Meskipun saya agak mengharapkannya, tetap saja mengejutkan.

Setelah itu, saya melanjutkan T&J saya dengan Ciel-sensei, dan mengkonfirmasi hasil sintesis kemampuan saya.

Saya pasti harus mengkonfirmasi konten sebelum memulai proses.

Kemampuan saya setelah sintesis, tidak tampak seperti sebelumnya.

Lebih tepatnya, rasanya mengerikan hanya menyebutnya sintesis. Ya, memang seperti itu.

Status

Nama: Rimuru Tempest

Spesies: Ultimate Slime

Divine Blessing: Great Demon Lord's Blessing

Judul: "Great Demon Lord"

Sihir: 〈Sihir jenis Naga Sejati〉 Spirit Pemanggilan Roh Tingkat Tinggi〉

〈Pemanggilan Demon Tingkat Tinggi t, dll

Keterampilan: Manas: Ciel

　　　 ・ Akselerasi Pemikiran ・ Penilaian ・ Pemrosesan Paralel

・ Fusi ・ Pemisahan ・ Pembatalan Nyanyian

・ Semua Ciptaan ・ Rantai Makanan ・ dll

Keahlian Utama

『Void God Azathoth』

・ Konsumsi Jiwa ・ Putar Null [1] ・ Ruang Imajiner

・ Kontrol Waktu Antariksa ・ Penghalang Multi Dimensi

・ True Dragon Release ・ True Core Core Transformation

『Harvest Lord Shub Niggurath』

　　　 ・ Pembuatan Keterampilan ・ Duplikasi Keterampilan

・ Pemberian Skill ・ Bank Skill

Keterampilan Normal ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Hantu Besar』

『Transformasi Tubuh Universal』

Keterampilan Memerangi ... 『Manipulasi Hukum』 ter Perubahan Elemen 』

『Kontrol Telepati』 『Clairvoyance』

Resistensi: Nullifikasi Serangan Fisik, Nullifikasi Elemen Alami,

Nullifikasi Status Abnormal, Nullifikasi Serangan Mental,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Hasilnya terlihat seperti ini.

Ini bukan pada tingkat hanya "menyegarkan".

Meskipun mengejutkan betapa acuh tak acuh dia mengeluarkan 『Wisdom Lord Raphael』, yang merupakan "tubuh" aslinya, itu semacam kulit yang kosong.

Bagi Ciel, tidak ada emosi yang dalam, dia hanya melanjutkan pekerjaannya tanpa sedikit pun perasaan sentimental.

Ketelitiannya sampai-sampai dia telah memecat setiap dan semua keterampilan yang tidak dibutuhkan.

Juga, gelar saya entah bagaimana menjadi "Raja Setan Besar"; Saya kehilangan Perlindungan Ilahi dan sebaliknya memiliki Berkat Ilahi.

Dari yang dilindungi, sampai yang memberi perlindungan tampaknya.

Sementara saya masih seorang Raja Iblis, saya berbagi perlindungan dan berkah dengan Veldora, tetapi sekarang, itu tidak mungkin lagi. [2]

Memiliki judul "Great Demon Lord" berarti saya memiliki banyak pengikut tingkat Demon Lord; ada perbedaan yang jelas dalam posisi kami.

Itu agak tertutup, tetapi saya diberitahu tentang perubahan judul oleh "Suara Dunia".

Selanjutnya, tentang kemampuan saya, itu benar-benar menjadi beberapa hal di luar dunia ini.

Jadi, pertama.

Mensintesis 『Dewa Kebijaksanaan Raphael』 dan 『Raja Kerakusan Beelzebuth』, 『Void God Azathoth』 lahir.

Tampaknya 『Storm King Veldora』 dan 『Scorch King Velgrynd』 dikeluarkan juga, dengan hanya kemampuan tertentu yang diwarisi.

Meskipun kemampuan memanggil hilang, saya tidak benar-benar memanfaatkannya karena mereka memiliki keterbatasan waktu, jadi itu bukan masalah besar. Sebagai gantinya, kemampuan Release ditingkatkan.

Transformasi Core Naga Sejati adalah, kata demi kata, kemampuan yang memanifestasikan Core Blade. Aku masih harus mendapatkan persetujuan dari orang yang sebenarnya (naga), tapi ini terlalu kuat untuk penggunaan normal.

Sebagai gantinya, saya sekarang dapat membuat Pseudo-core juga, yang dipermudah dan dibuang. Pada sekitar 5% dari output asli, bahkan itu sangat luar biasa, dan itu membuat mereka lebih dapat digunakan secara konvensional.

Juga, saya bisa menghasilkan core Pseudo-Scorch Velgrynd juga, tapi ....

Dimungkinkan juga untuk memanifestasikan Velgrynd sebagai Blade Core, tetapi mendapatkan persetujuannya kemungkinan besar tidak mungkin, jadi mendapatkan Pseudo-core juga agak sulit. [3]

Poin terpenting, adalah bahwa Pseudo-core tidak memengaruhi True Dragon Release. Saya bisa membuatnya kapan saja tanpa perlu persetujuan, ini membuatnya menjadi kemampuan yang sangat menarik.

Tapi, kemampuan terkait Naga Sejati bukanlah masalahnya.

Yang benar-benar jahat, adalah kemampuan utama yang disintesis untuk Void God Azathoth.

Konsumsi Jiwa ... Versi Predate yang ditingkatkan. Membutuhkan segalanya, termasuk jiwa target.

Turn Null ... Energi yang sangat merusak yang dihasilkan dari dimensi nuklir yang kacau. Dapat dikendalikan melalui Manas.

Imaginary Room ... Dimensi yang dibuat untuk mengisolasi semua target. Versi upgrade dari upgraded Perut 』＋『 Isolate 』.

Pengendalian Waktu Ruang ... Perjalanan sesaat dimungkinkan dengan kemauan saya sendiri.

Penghalang Multi Dimensi ... Penghalang yang selalu aktif dan berlapis-lapis. Pertahanan mutlak yang memanfaatkan celah dimensional.

Itulah, yang dijelaskan oleh Ciel-sensei.

Terus terang, saya tidak mengharapkan peningkatan tingkat ini ....

Kemana perginya Stellar Wind Lord Hastur! Aku bahkan tidak punya semangat untuk membuat "tusukan" itu.

Selama aku memiliki Void God Azathoth, kemampuan lain tidak diperlukan, pikirku.

Kedua, apa yang tampak seperti pot yang menerima keterampilan yang tersisa, adalah 『Harvest Lord Shub Niggurath』.

Ini hanyalah, keterampilan yang dibuat untuk pengikut saya.

Pembuatan Keterampilan ... Informasi yang telah dikumpulkan oleh 『Rantai Makanan』 dan 『Analisis』, digunakan untuk menciptakan keterampilan baru.

Duplikasi Keterampilan ... Kemampuan untuk membuat salinan keterampilan yang diperoleh.

Pemberian Skill ... Kemampuan untuk memberikan keterampilan yang disalin ke target. Bisa juga menghapus skill yang diberikan.

Bank Keterampilan ... Mengubah keterampilan yang telah diperoleh menjadi informasi dan menyimpannya, dapat mereproduksi keterampilan tersebut kapan saja.

Mengubah sejumlah besar keterampilan yang telah dikonsumsi menjadi informasi, sekarang semuanya tersimpan dengan baik.

Plus, mereka dapat direproduksi kapan saja. Nah, itu salah satu kemampuan yang absurd.

Memberikan Hadiah kepada pengikut saya, juga menjadi mungkin. Tetapi sehubungan dengan itu, ada kompatibilitas dari pengikut dll untuk dipertimbangkan.

Bukannya ada yang bisa menggunakan kemampuan yang dikuasai itu.

Detail seperti itu, aku bisa membiarkan Ciel menanganinya. Kebiasaannya "Renovasi" masih ada, tetapi dia tidak bisa melakukan hal yang mustahil.

2 keterampilan ini adalah apa yang diperoleh saat ini.

Apapun masalahnya, ini terlihat terlalu bertenaga dibandingkan dengan sebelum sintesis.

Saya memang berpikir ini berlebihan pada awalnya, namun, memikirkan konfrontasi masa depan dengan Angra Mainyu membuat saya untuk mengevaluasi kembali pikiran saya.

Saya ingin mengakhiri kekacauan ini dengan benar, dan melanjutkan menikmati hidup saya sepenuhnya di sini.

Jadi, sintesis kemampuan saya, milik Ciel-sensei, menyimpulkan.

Pada saat yang sama ketika sintesis kemampuan saya selesai, evolusi para Eksekutif juga menyimpulkan.

Mereka semua memiliki kompatibilitas mereka dipandu oleh Ciel-sensei, dan kemampuan mereka dioptimalkan.

Yah, itu sudah seperti yang diharapkan, sepertinya efek Gifting juga punya dampak di sana.

Sepertinya Shion adalah satu-satunya yang belum naik karena alasan tertentu, semua orang telah naik dengan aman.

Bagaimana mereka semua ternyata ....

Naik duluan, Benimaru.

Nama: Benimaru

Spesies: Flame Spirit Oni (Roh Rakasa Tingkat Tinggi Divine [4])

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Flare Lord (Raja Vermillion Rage)"

Sihir: 〈Sihir roh api〉

Keterampilan: Keterampilan Ultimate

『Dewa Matahari Amaterasu yang Terik』

　　　　 ... Akselerasi Pemikiran ・ Perintah Pemersatu

・ Kontrol Cahaya & Panas ・ Manipulasi Ruang

・ Penghalang Multi Layered

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Lord』

Keterampilan Bertempur ... Man Manipulasi Hukum (Panas) 』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan unsur alami,

Kekebalan Status Abnormal, Resistensi Serangan Mental,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Sepertinya dia berhasil bergaul dengan Momiji, dan telah naik dengan aman. [5]

Membuang tubuh fisiknya, ia telah sepenuhnya berkembang menjadi Bentuk Kehidupan Spiritual. Meskipun lebih rendah dari Naga Sejati, dia masihlah Roh Ilahi Elemental.

Jelas, statistiknya meningkat secara drastis, mengatakan kekuatannya lebih besar dari raja iblis yang terbangun tidak akan meremehkan.

Karena Zegion masih memiliki tubuh fisik, hanya dengan membandingkannya saja akan membuat Benimaru menjadi pemenang dalam pertempuran antara keduanya.

Faktanya adalah, Benimaru, Diablo, dan Zegion, telah mengamankan posisi 3 teratas dari apa yang terlihat.

Pindah, Souei.

Nama: Souei

Spesies: Dark Spirit Oni (Roh Monster Rakasa Tingkat Menengah)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Bayangan Dewa Flare

Judul: "Kegelapan (Tuan Gelap)"

Sihir: 〈Sihir Roh Gelap〉

Keahlian: Hadiah Tertinggi

『Shadow Moon Lord Tsukuyomi』

　　　　 ... Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Eye of the Moon

・ Bunuh Satu Hit ・ Gerakan Ultra Kecepatan

・ Keberadaan Paralel ・ Manipulasi Ruang

・ Penghalang Multi Layered

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Stealth』

Keterampilan Bertempur ... Man Manipulasi Hukum (Bayangan) 』『 Saraf Saraf 』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan unsur alami,

Kekebalan Status Abnormal, Imunitas Serangan Mental

Sebagai bayangan Benimaru, tampaknya mereka berdua memulai kenaikan mereka pada saat yang sama.

Berubah menjadi sesuatu yang berbeda dari rasnya yang unik, ia telah menjadi eksistensi yang menyaingi Benimaru.

Jika Anda hanya melihat Level Energi total, ia akan pucat dibandingkan dengan Benimaru, tetapi kekuatannya masih sangat tinggi.

Meskipun ia hanya menjadi Bentuk Kehidupan Setengah Spiritual, ia harus berakhir menjadi sama dengan Benimaru setelah menetap. [6]

Saya pikir, dia kemungkinan besar diperlakukan (oleh sistem) sebagai pengikut Benimaru.

Yah, sikapnya tidak benar-benar berubah, jadi itu bukan masalah besar.

Dari kemampuan yang ia peroleh, yang paling terkenal adalah "Eye of the Moon", yang merupakan kemampuan yang berspesialisasi dalam mengumpulkan informasi.

Tampaknya itu diperoleh dengan pengaruh dari kemampuan Benimaru, dan bantuan dari Ciel-sensei.

Kemampuannya, mirip dengan Magic Observation tingkat tinggi. Itu mampu mengamati di mana saja di dunia dengan opsi untuk menambahkan suara juga, dan informasi dapat diproses dan diubah menjadi video.

Seperti yang diharapkan, karena sepenuhnya terspesialisasi dalam kegiatan mata-mata, dia berubah menjadi pria yang cukup bisa diandalkan.

Sebagai orang yang menangkap semua informasi di Tempest, ia diberi gelar "Kegelapan (Master of the Dark)".

Ranga.

Nama: Ranga

Spesies: Serigala Angin Roh (Roh Rakasa Ilahi Tingkat Atas)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Star Lord (Stellar Wolf King)"

Sihir: 〈Sihir Roh Angin〉

Keterampilan: Keterampilan Ultimate

『Stellar Wind Lord Hastur』

　　　 　... Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Kontrol Cuaca

・ Kontrol Ruang ・ Penghalang Multi Layered

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Lord』

Keterampilan Pertempuran ... 『Manipulasi Hukum (Angin)』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan unsur alami,

Kekebalan Status Abnormal, Resistensi Serangan Mental,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Ah, aku bertanya-tanya ke mana perginya, 『Stellar Wind Lord Hastur』 diteruskan ke Ranga.

Keterampilan luar biasa yang memiliki kekuatan untuk mengendalikan cuaca. Itu benar-benar cocok Ranga ke T.

Dirilis dari belenggu ras serigala taring, ia telah naik ke Bentuk Kehidupan Setengah Spiritual dari tingkat Atas, tipe Roh Angin.

Hmm, bukankah ini berarti, bahwa ia menjadi sangat kuat?

Akankah Gobuta bisa bekerja dengan baik dengannya sekarang? Ini sedikit mengkhawatirkan.

Nama: Gabil

Spesies: Dragonewt (Naga Humanoid)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Drag Lord [7] (Heavenly Dragon King)" (EN: lol) (PN: Itu memunculkan citra mengerikan.)

Keahlian: Hadiah Tertinggi

『Bintang Pierrot (The Frivolous)』 (PN: Ini benar-benar berbicara tentang masa lalunya yang kelam.)

　　　 　... Akselerasi Pemikiran ・ Manipulasi Kecelakaan ・ Tulis Ulang Nasib

・ Manipulasi Ruang ・ Penghalang Multi Layered

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Sihir』 『Persepsi Panas』

『Uber Sense of Smell』 『Setan Haki Tuhan』

Keterampilan Pertempuran ... 『Manifest Dragon Scale Armor』

『Napas Api』 『Napas Guntur』

Resistensi: kekebalan kekebalan, kekebalan status abnormal,

Resistensi elemen alami,

Resistensi Serangan Fisik & Mental, Resistensi Serangan Hibrid

Mendapat dorongan besar dalam level Energi, kemampuan fisiknya tidak ada bandingannya dengan sebelumnya.

Melalui 『Manifest Dragon Scale Armor』, pertahanannya tidak bisa ditertawakan. Tapi kekuatan serangannya, adalah tempat dia benar-benar bersinar.

Namun, dia tidak dapat mencapai Keterampilan Ultimate sendiri.

Ya, jika itu gratisan mudah, itu akan menjadi Sistem yang benar-benar rusak.

Tapi .... Pierrot Star, ya.

Hanya namanya saja terdengar agak menyedihkan.

Manipulasi Mishap, tampaknya sengaja menyebabkan fenomena tak terduga untuk lawannya; Takdir Menulis Ulang dapat Membatalkan "Terjadi buruk" kepadanya sekali setiap hari; ini adalah keterampilan hi-spec yang luar biasa.

Tapi hei, ini Gabil.

Dia mungkin tidak akan dapat sepenuhnya memanfaatkannya, jika dia bisa, itu berarti dia memiliki potensi untuk memperoleh Keterampilan Ultimate.

Saya akan menantikan pertumbuhannya.

Nama: Gerudo

Spesies: Orc Tinggi

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Barrier Lord (King of Protection)" (akan bertanya guro setelah saya mengirim email)

Keahlian: Hadiah Tertinggi

『Gourmet King Beelzebub [8]』

　　　　 ... Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Devour ・ Perut

・ Mengisolasi ・ Pasokan ・ Permintaan ・ Mengorosi

・ Tembok Besi ・ Hibah Pertahanan ・ Sampul

・ Manipulasi Ruang ・ Penghalang Multi Layered

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Sihir』 『Uber Sense of Smell』

『Haki Setan Lord』 『Ultra Regenerasi』

Keterampilan Pertempuran ... 『Nafas busuk』 『Full Body Armor』

『Kontrol Telepati』

Resistensi: kekebalan kekebalan, kekebalan status abnormal,

Resistensi Unsur Alami, Perlawanan Serangan Fisik & Mental,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Sepertinya dia mendapatkan versi downgrade dari 『Gluttony King Beelzebuth』 saya, itu juga memiliki hal-hal tambahan lainnya yang ditambahkan.

Meskipun dia terutama defensif, kekuatan ofensifnya, melalui serangan tipe korosifnya, juga tinggi.

Gerudo juga menerima bimbingan dari Ciel-sensei. Yah, sebagian besar kemampuan disintesis, jika itu Gerudo, ia harus bisa memanfaatkan kemampuannya dengan tepat.

Sekarang dia telah naik, melawan lawan di tingkat Malaikat Jatuh yang baru-baru ini menyerang kita, dia tidak akan dikalahkan dalam pertempuran satu lawan satu. Jika dia hanya fokus pada bertahan, akan sulit bahkan dua Malaikat Jatuh untuk menjatuhkannya.

Dia menjadi semakin dapat diandalkan, saya akan terus bergantung padanya.

Sekarang Kumara,

Nama: Kumara

Spesies: Earth Spirit Beast (Roh Monster Monster Tingkat Tinggi)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Chimera Lord (Penguasa Binatang Mistis)"

Sihir: 〈Sihir Roh Bumi〉

Keterampilan: Keterampilan Ultimate

『Mythical Beast Lord Bahamut』

　　　　... Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Kontrol Gravitasi

・ Kontrol Ruang ・ Penghalang Multi Layered

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Lord』

『Setan Binatang Minion』

Keterampilan Bertempur ... Man Manipulasi Hukum (Bumi) 』

『Minion Fusion』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, resistensi status abnormal,

Resistensi Unsur Alami, Resistensi Serangan Mental,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Itu sepadan dengan waktu yang dibutuhkan.

Mendapatkan kekuatan yang akan memungkinkannya untuk mengganggu planet itu sendiri, ia telah menjadi Bentuk Kehidupan Setengah Spiritual dari tipe Roh Bumi Tingkat Atas.

Juga, dia dapat menggunakan kombinasi dari semua kekuatan anteknya, menjadikannya kekuatan besar yang tangguh.

Sendiri, ada 12 jenis antek yang berbeda, tetapi dengan semuanya digabungkan, ia akan dapat bersaing dengan atasan (Diablo dll).

Namun itu, hanya akan mungkin setelah dia mendapatkan lebih banyak pengalaman.

Hanya dengan melihat spesifikasinya , seseorang dapat melihat betapa menakjubkan prospek masa depannya.

Haruskah saya terkejut atau hanya diharapkan dari spesies langka, dia mencapai Keterampilan Ultimate hanya dengan naluri dan kecerdasannya.

Meskipun dia mendapat bantuan dari Ciel-sensei, itu mengesankan bahwa dia berhasil mendapatkannya sendiri.

Eksistensi terkuat di Labirin, Zegion.

Nama: Zegion

Spesies: Serangga Roh Air (Roh Rakasa Ilahi Tingkat Atas)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Mist Lord (Illusory King)"

Sihir: 〈Sihir Roh Air〉

Keterampilan: Keterampilan Ultimate

『Dewa Ilusi Mephisto』

　　　 　... Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Kontrol Waktu Antariksa

・ Penghalang Dimensi Multi Layered

・ Semua Ciptaan ・ Dominasi Mental ・ Dunia Ilusi

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Lord』

Keterampilan Pertempuran ... 『Manipulasi Hukum (Air)』 『Dominasi Haki』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan status abnormal,

Kekebalan Serangan Mental, Kekebalan Unsur Alami,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Ups, sepertinya saya tidak menyadarinya sampai Ciel memberi tahu saya, tetapi Zegion juga merupakan Bentuk Kehidupan Spiritual Tingkat Atas sekarang.

Dia adalah Bentuk Kehidupan Spiritual unsur air yang indah. Jadi apakah itu berarti bahwa tubuhnya tersusun dari molekul air yang terkumpul dari atmosfer di sekitarnya?

Yah, mereka mengatakan Hihiirokane adalah logam ilusi yang memiliki banyak Energi kental.

Dia masih menggunakan exoskeleton Adamantite dengan berharga, tampaknya.

Jika itu bukan sesuatu yang saya berikan kepadanya, dia mungkin akan membuangnya dan menjadi Bentuk Kehidupan Spiritual yang lengkap.

Untuk CQC [9] khusus Zegion, ia sangat kuat.

Tubuh manusia terdiri dari 60% air.

Karena ada juga kelembaban di atmosfer, dalam ruang terbatas tertentu, Zegion memiliki keunggulan besar.

Dengan Illusion World, ia mampu menciptakan situasi yang lebih menguntungkan bagi dirinya sendiri.

Jadi, tentu saja dia kuat.

Apa yang dia tunjukkan sampai sekarang, hanyalah puncak gunung es.

Omong-omong, saya kira itu cukup licik dari saya, dengan bebas mengkonfirmasi kemampuan pengikut saya.

Ngomong-ngomong, berbicara tentang Mist, itu seperti kabut seperti dalam kabut. Terdengar aneh.

Meskipun itu diberikan dengan relevansi dengan bagaimana "Ilusi" dia, itu juga cocok dengan elemennya. Raphael, tidak, jika Ciel-sensei menyadarinya, akan lebih baik jika dia bisa memberi tahu aku.

Mungkin, dia pikir saya telah memperhatikan dan memberinya gelar itu.

Omong-omong, bagaimana dengan Adalman?

Nama: Adalman

Spesies: Roh Kematian (Monster Roh Tingkat Menengah)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Gehenna Lord"

Sihir: 〈Sihir Mati〉 Magic Sihir Suci〉

Keahlian: Hadiah Tertinggi

『Kitab Sihir Necronomicon』

　　　 　... Akselerasi Pemikiran ・ Pembatalan Nyanyian ・ Pencari Kebenaran

・ Analisis Total ・ Semua Ciptaan ・ Penghancuran Mental

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Lord』

Keterampilan Pertempuran ... 『Pembalikan Suci-Iblis』

『Manipulasi Orang Mati』 『Kematian Instan』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan serangan mental,

Kekebalan Status Abnormal, Tahan Unsur Alami,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Jadi dia naik ke arah itu.

Orang yang paling "Setan Lord-ish", dari penampilan dan keterampilan, mungkin adalah Adalman.

Meskipun dia tidak cocok untuk CQC, dengan 『Kematian Instan』, dia dapat membunuh targetnya hanya dengan melihat.

Kegagalan untuk melawan, berarti kematian instan. Melawan tentara, dia adalah pengikutku yang paling efisien.

Yah, dia sendiri lebih dari seorang peneliti. Dengan sahabatnya, Gadra-roushi, mereka dengan senang hati melakukan penelitian tentang sihir bersama.

Oh benar, Gadra-roushi juga mendapatkan Hadiah Tertinggi 『Kitab Sihir Grimoire』.

Keduanya agak maniak tentang topik itu, pada waktunya, mereka mungkin akan menggali semua pengetahuan yang berhubungan dengan bidang tersebut.

Ajudan dan rekannya, Albert, sekarang telah sepenuhnya mengintegrasikan dirinya di bawah Adalman.

Karena itu, sebagai efek khusus, ia memperoleh Hadiah Tertinggi juga.

Apa yang dia dapatkan adalah, Hadiah Tertinggi 『Abadi Abadi』 ... (Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Total Kelahiran Kembali ・ Minal's Fealty).

Dengan jiwanya menjadi bagian dari Adalman, tubuh fisiknya tidak akan pernah bisa dihancurkan. Yah, jika Adalman mati, mereka akan mati bersama ...

Adalman sudah mati.

Karena dia sekarang dapat sepenuhnya menggunakan peralatan Tingkat Dewa, ada kemungkinan bahwa Albert dapat bertarung setara dengan Dino.

Dino tampaknya masih memiliki beberapa trik di lengan bajunya, jadi ini bukan perbandingan yang baik, tapi kami akan membiarkannya begitu.

Lalu, ada Diablo

Nama: Diablo

Spesies: Setan Dewa (Roh Iblis Tingkat Tertinggi)

Perlindungan Ilahi: Berkat Setan Besar dari Raja

Judul: "Raja Iblis (Raja Majin)" (TN: katakana * ADALAH * raja iblis, tidak ada jalan lain; ada juga 魔神 王 (majin ou), jadi ya ...)

Sihir: 〈Sihir Hitam〉, dll

Keterampilan: Keterampilan Ultimate

『Godaan Raja Azazel』

　　　　 ... Akselerasi Pikiran ・ Kontrol Waktu Antariksa

・ Penghalang Multi Dimensi ・ Semua Ciptaan

・ Dominasi Penalti ・ Dunia Pencobaan

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Haki Setan Lord』

Keterampilan Pertempuran ... 『Kontrol Fenomena』 『Dominasi Pesona』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan status abnormal,

Kekebalan Serangan Mental, Kekebalan Unsur Alami,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Yah, tidak peduli bagaimana Anda melihat ini, yang terkuat di antara pengikut saya, adalah Diablo.

Dia memiliki kekuatan luar biasa, yang menyaingi bahkan 『Kerakusan Raja Beelzebuth』 saya.

Dia memiliki sejumlah besar Energi, sangat "leveled", dan kemampuan berkualitas tinggi.

Dia adalah Iblis yang berpengetahuan luas dan cakap.

Menjadi semacam Battle Maniac adalah satu-satunya "cacatnya", tetapi dia bisa saja bertengkar sengit dengan Zegion untuk memuaskan kecenderungan itu.

Ini pasti akan menjadi pertempuran yang menarik. Juga, Benimaru juga (sebagai mitra pertempuran tiruan).

"Killer Lord" Testarossa ―― Keterampilan Utama 『Hell King Belial』 ――

"Pain Lord" Ultima ―― Keterampilan Utama 『Raja Racun Samael』 ――

"Ancaman Tuan" Carrera ―― Keterampilan Utama 『Kepunahan Raja Abaddon』 ――

3 Ini memanifestasikan kemampuan mereka selama pertempuran dengan Kekaisaran, selanjutnya menguasai mereka.

Jika tebakan saya benar, mereka menghabiskan stok pengalaman yang diselamatkan sepanjang hidup mereka, dan memperkuat diri mereka dalam sekali jalan.

Memiliki level dan Energi kelas tertinggi, jika mereka sepenuhnya menggunakan kemampuan ini, sebagian besar musuh tidak akan mendapat kesempatan.

Sebagai pengikut di bawah perintah langsung saya, mereka adalah kekuatan sekuat tenaga.

Ah benar, Veldora-san juga.

Nama: Veldora ・ Tempest

Spesies: Naga Sejati (Roh Rakasa Ilahi Tingkat Tertinggi)

Divine Blessing: Storm's Blessing

Judul: "Badai Naga"

Magic: 〈Magic jenis Naga Sejati〉

Keterampilan: Keterampilan Ultimate

『Chaos Lord Nyarlathotep』

　　　 　... Akselerasi Pemikiran ・ Penilaian

・ Semua Ciptaan ・ Manipulasi Kemungkinan

・ Keberadaan Paralel ・ Pencari Kebenaran

・ Kontrol Waktu Antariksa ・ Penghalang Multi Dimensi

Keterampilan Biasa ... 『Persepsi Universal』 『Dominasi Haki』

『Bentuk Manusia』

Resistensi: kekebalan serangan fisik, kekebalan unsur alami,

Kekebalan Status Abnormal, Kekebalan Serangan Mental,

Perlawanan Serangan Hibrid

Kemampuannya benar-benar berkembang.

Keberadaan Paralel, jenis yang paling terasa seperti cheat.

Meninggalkan hatinya (inti nukleat) di dalam tubuhku, dan membuat klon menggunakan Energi. Itu sekarang mungkin ......

Memikirkan pelatihannya di labirin, akan menunjukkan dirinya dengan cara ini.

Kembali ke topik, karena klonnya dibuat menggunakan Energi saya, membuat 2 tampaknya menjadi batasnya.

Jika dia benar-benar mendorongnya, saya pikir maksimal 4 dapat dibuat, tetapi Velgrynd perlu dipanggil kembali, dan saya akan kehabisan Energi yang dapat digunakan.

Jadi, hingga 2 klon adalah batas normal. Lebih tepatnya, itu sudah cukup bukan?

Dia sesumbar dia bisa menciptakan lebih banyak lagi jika dia menjatuhkan spesifikasi klon, dan aku katakan padanya, lakukan saja apa yang kau mau.

Dia mungkin akan menangis ketika dia menyadari betapa itu melemahkannya, tetapi karena tubuh utamanya akan berada di dalam diriku, Veldora-san akan aman dan sehat.

Itu buang-buang energi, jadi saya sangat berharap dia tidak berlebihan.

Dengan itu, kenaikan telah berakhir, dan Krishna juga akhirnya tiba.

Setelah menyelesaikan proses serah terima, kami kembali ke Tempest.

* * *

[1] Btw ini 虚無 崩 壊 yang secara harfiah berarti Ketiadaan Runtuh, kemampuan yang terlalu chuni. Setiap saran diterima.



[2] (TN: ia mendapat perlindungan dari Veldora sambil memberikan perlindungan kepada para pengikutnya)

[3] (TN: ini berarti bahwa Rimuru harus memanifestasikan yang asli terlebih dahulu sebelum ia dapat membuat yang semu)

[4] 上位 聖 魔 霊 Joui Hijiri Ma Rei = Roh Iblis / Monster Tingkat Tinggi

Serius aku benci 聖 魔, Ini bisa diterjemahkan sebagai Holy Demonic, yang berarti kedua atribut digabungkan.

[5] (TN: Benimaru benar-benar bekerja dengan cepat lol) (EN: Tunggu ... apakah itu berarti mereka tidak dapat melakukan doobie, tidak melakukan lagi?)

[6] (TN: jadi siapa yang akan menjadi pasangannya? Lol) (Guro: Saya memilih Souka (> ω <) ﾉ)

[7] Ini adalah pelecehan dari Penulis atau bukan XD. Alternatif lain untuk itu adalah Drac. Tetapi kemungkinan besar Author berarti Drag.

[8] Inilah alasan mengapa Sushi memilih Beelzebuth untuk Rimuru. Keterampilan katakana untuk Rimuru menggunakan ベ ル ゼ ビ ュ ー ト (Beruzebyuuto) Beelzebuth sementara katakana untuk keterampilan Gerudo menggunakan ベ ル ゼ バ (Beruzebabu) Beelzebub (ingat seri dengan bayi? Serial ini menggunakan katakana). Entah merujuk pada entitas yang sama.

[9] (EN: Close Quarters Combat)





Bab 192: Walpurgis


Serangkaian gangguan, yang dimulai selama proses mendapatkan Veldora kembali, akhirnya berakhir.

Integrasi kemampuan juga telah berakhir, jadi saya dipenuhi dengan ceria.

Itu tidak berarti bahwa saya akan membenamkan diri dalam perasaan menyenangkan itu juga.

Perasaan ingin bermain di labirin adalah keinginan saya yang sebenarnya, namun, saya harus menyelesaikan masalah berikutnya, pertama.

Saya harus mempersiapkan permainan dengan Angra Mainyu yang akan dimulai beberapa minggu dari sekarang.

Saya ingin membangun hubungan kolaborasi antara Raja Setan.

Untuk memulainya, saya pikir saya harus memegang Walpurgis.

Undangan untuk masing-masing pihak sudah dibuat.

Ketika saya menghubungi Ruminas, meskipun dia mengeluh dengan nada sengit, saya pikir dia mungkin akan berpartisipasi.

Ngomong-ngomong, aku juga menghubungi Guy dan mengirim undangan untuk Walpurgis.

Saya dapat dengan mudah mengumpulkan persetujuan dari tiga Raja Setan sekarang.

Juga, Ramiris bangun,

「Dino itu, aku benar-benar akan menghancurkannya!」

Dia sangat marah. Namun, karena dia energik segera setelah dia aman, itu agak lucu.

Mendapatkan persetujuan dari anak seperti itu mudah.

「Oh well, makan ini dan bergembiralah. Ah, benar juga. Bisakah Anda memberikan persetujuan untuk ini? 」

"Ah! Ini benar puding! Aku bisa makan semuanya !? Maka semuanya baik-baik saja! 」

Yah, saya dengan mudah membuatnya memasang segel sihirnya [1] sementara matanya telah direnggut oleh puding.

Sangat mudah untuk berurusan dengannya, itu menyelamatkan saya dari beberapa masalah.

Saya mendapat persetujuan dari Ruminas, yang menjadi marah setelah dia mengetahui bahwa persiapan yang telah dia lakukan terhadap tentara Kekaisaran sia-sia karena Veldora.

Ngomong-ngomong, saya juga memberi tahu Leon dan dia dengan sukarela memberikan persetujuannya.

Karena Milim tidak diizinkan bermain hari ini, ketidakpuasannya tampaknya telah menumpuk,

「Lalu, bagaimana kalau Anda datang ke sini untuk bermain dengan alasan menghadiri konferensi?」

Dia mengagumi gagasan saya ini.

「Seperti yang diharapkan dari Anda! Rimuru sangat bijak seperti biasanya! 」

Dia senang dengan kondisi itu dan tampaknya segera pergi untuk membujuk Frey.

Karena saya bisa menerima persetujuannya dengan mudah, mari kita siapkan puding, yang populer dengan Ramiris juga, ketika dia datang ke Tempest untuk bermain.

Jadi, sama seperti itu, saya telah mengumpulkan persetujuan dari 5 Raja Setan (termasuk saya).

Ketika saya melakukan sintesis keterampilan di Kekaisaran, pembicaraan selesai dengan cepat karena saya telah membuat beberapa pengaturan awal.

Selain berbagi informasi, ada kebutuhan untuk mempersiapkan Perang Besar yang akan terjadi.

Dengan demikian, memegang Walpurgis sesegera mungkin adalah hasil yang disukai.

Lima hari telah berlalu dan saya kembali ke Tempest, hari berikutnya adalah Walpurgis.

Karena Krishna telah tiba sesuai jadwal, saya dapat menahan Walpurgis tanpa masalah.

Dengan pengkhianatan Dino, Octogram telah menjadi tujuh sekarang.

Namun, semua anggota, selain Ramiris, dibangunkan kelas Demon Lord, yang belum pernah terlihat sampai sekarang.

Semua level mereka terlalu tinggi, yang sebaliknya membuatnya sehingga kata "terbangun" telah kehilangan nilainya.

Oh well, itu mungkin hal yang baik.

Bagaimanapun, persiapan adalah segalanya.

Milim tampaknya akan tiba di pagi hari, jadi kami bersiap untuk menyambutnya.

Setelah Walpurgis berakhir, dia akan tinggal di sini selama tiga hari tambahan.

Karena saya berharap akan sibuk dengan persiapan, saya ragu apakah saya akan punya waktu untuk bermain-main, tetapi hanya sedikit yang akan baik-baik saja.

Dia sepertinya berharap untuk bersama Veldora dan Ramiris, mungkin ide yang baik untuk meminta yang lain untuk mengabaikannya.

Lalu, sebuah pertanyaan tiba-tiba muncul.

Berpikir tentang itu, Milim selalu bepergian dengan terbang.

Meskipun, karena Frey juga datang ke sini dengan menerbangkannya, itu tidak menjadi pertanyaan sebelumnya, tapi kurasa aku belum pernah melihat Milim berkunjung melalui gerbang warp.

Mungkin, dia tidak bisa menggunakan transfer (teleportasi)?

Oh well, karena dia sangat cepat, dengan kecepatan maksimum Frey, jarak perjalanan satu arah dapat ditempuh dalam waktu sekitar lima jam.

Untuk berada pada kecepatan subsonik selama lima jam, jaraknya cukup jauh. Saya pikir rasa jarak saya menjadi sedikit aneh.

Tidak, dalam hal indra saya saat ini, saya kira itu mungkin cocok ... betapa rumitnya.

Saya pikir ini adalah perasaan saya sejak saya masih manusia, meskipun itu tidak bisa dihindari. Selain itu, mungkin normal untuk bawahan saya.

Saya akan bertanya kepada Milim apakah dia bisa menggunakan teleportasi atau tidak ketika dia tiba.

Jika dia tidak bisa, maka pertama-tama aku harus menginstal formasi sihir untuk teleportasi dan membiarkannya menggunakannya kapan saja.

Oh well, if Milim flies with all her might, she can arrive here without taking more than 30 minutes.

Well then.

Milim arrived without any problems and went over to the Walpurgis’ meeting place.

As we were waiting and relaxing by ourselves whilst enjoying a chat in the room, like the last time, Mizari and Hirari came to pick us up.

『Demon Lord Rimuru-sama, for employing the “Secret Method of Evolution” on us, thank you very much!』

Apparently, they completed their evolution and that’s why they had thanked me.

Though they were both bowing their heads, it really was not such a big deal. However, they might think it is because only I can use it.

「N? “Secret Method of Evolution”, what’s that?」

Milim seemed to be interested in the topic, however, I deceived her with cake.

Because Milim has a child-like personality, similar to Ramiris, it’s easy.

After I deceived Milim, we passed through the gate, created by Mizari, entering into the meeting hall.

My attendants are Shion and Diablo.

Milim has Frey as her chaperon.

Ramiris is sitting on Beretta’s shoulder.

At this timing, I take a look at Beretta’s abilities,

Name: Beretta

Race: Chaos Metalloid (High Rank Divine Monster Spirit)

Divine Protection: Divine Protection of the Labyrinth.

Title: Ramiris’s Guardian

Magic:〈Darkness Magic〉

Skills: Ultimate Gift

　　　『Machine Doll Lord Deus Ex Machina』

　　　　　…Thought Acceleration・Condition Control・Mineral Manipulation

　　　　　　Space Manipulation・Multiple Barrier



Normal Skills…『Omnipotent Perception』『Demon Lord’s Haki』

Combat Skills…『Law Manipulation（Earth）』『Holy Demonic Fusion』

Resistance: Physical Attack Nullification, Status Change Nullification,

Spiritual Attack Nullification, Natural Effects Nullification,

Holy-Demonic(Hybrid) Attack Resistance

Those were the results.

My oh my. He seems to be able to create minerals freely. It goes without saying though, raw materials are still needed.

An ability to manipulate elements, something like that, I guess?

Next would be his Condition Control, it is simply intriguing. The state of the mineral――no, let’s stop calling it with such troublesome wording.

Simply put, it is an ability that makes it so that he can freely manipulate metal.

He can act like a certain guy with tough liquid metal who appeared in a movie[2], such a thing could be possible.

His regular form is like that of a high-class work of art, with globe joints, kind of like a doll. However, he can freely manipulate Adamantite, so of course, he can change his figure as he pleases and bring out weapons of various shapes. Also, he seems to be able to absorb objects, like a slime, if he comes into contact with them.

He has evolved into a terrifying metal life form that is similar to a Spiritual Life form.

The doll I had made on a whim for a demon i summoned has achieved a surprising evolution.

The seven of us entered the hall, led by the guide.

Alrighty then.

Because I have business with Guy, first, I urge Milim and the others to sit down on their seats.

They seem to want to ask me a question, but they obeyed nonetheless, which helped greatly. Maybe because I said there will be cake later.

I left behind Milim and Ramiris, having Mizari lead me to Guy.

Actually, Chloe had come to meet me last night.

We were relaxing and sitting in the parlor while having a talk about the current situation.

Because I don’t need sleep, in the end we had a long conversation till the break of dawn.

I was able to slowly hear her story, of her leaping into the past, as well as about Hinata’s soul after she had parted with me.

「Sensei――have I become strong?」

‘Ah, you have became strong.’

Yes, Chloe is shouldering a hardship that can’t easily be described with words.

As she appreciates my consolation and words, it would be rude if I thoughtlessly said that.

Therefore,

「Hah! You are still weak. Still not good, not good at all.

Such a thing, as showing your weaknesses to a Demon Lord, is out of the question if you are a “Hero”.

Well, I admit that you have done your best.

――Therefore, endure a bit longer.」

I said as such, it was irritating that I had no choice but to put on airs to deceive her.

Chloe seemed to be happy, to be relieved, I saw her making such expressions.

Afterwards, I had a match with Chloe.

I checked out the ability of the strongest “Hero” to ascertain whether she could face Guy or not.

Two practice swords were prepared, we decided to use them.

「Sensei, you became taller right? Somehow, your vibes resemble Shizu-sensei」

While saying those words, Chloe received the practice sword.

Do I resemble her? Because she was the origin of my human form, I might have inherited her vibes as well.

There was no referee. It was a test of strength to the end.

I threw a coin into the air, and when it hit the ground, it would signal for the start of the match.

As we faced each other calmly, I lightly threw the coin.

The coin drew a parabola curve while rotating. It revolved in the air before falling. The coin gave a clear ‘ting’ as it hit the ground.

Chloe and I moved at the same time.

Opposing Chloe’s Ultimate Skill『Space-Time Lord Yogg-Sothoth』was my Ultimate Skill『Void God Azathoth』.

The match was in a stalemate, during which, I read a momentary gap in Chloe’s defense with『Future Prediction』.

As I was going to swing my practice sword aiming for that, I noticed that I had become the side receiving an attack..

A blade approached right in front of my eyes.

「Ehehe. It’s my win right!?」

Is this for real!?

I was dumbfounded when I heard Chloe’s voice.

This is far from checking whether she can face Guy or not, it had become an easy defeat for me.

《Master, the ability of Time Control has been unleashed》

I use my ability as I was being led to by the voice.

Though I didn’t know what it was, I felt like I could manage, somehow, if I used it.

The world stopped when I used the ability.

I understood that the world had stop moving, like it was suspended, because my cognition had been enhanced by 1 million times.

Not just my cognition but also my movement, to the point I can move at the speed of 1 million times normal speed. In other words, by controlling the flow of time, it is possible to accelerate myself.

It is a superpower[3] that is different from super acceleration[4], in principle. Due to the backlash of this ability, I can’t cause any physical effects at all.

Being able to move under the rules of this ability was only me――no, there’s one other person who can.

That person is Chloe.

(Awawa. As expected of Rimuru-sensei! You can exist[5] in this “Suspended World”.)

(Skip it! Something like this, for a Demon Lord like me, such a thing is easy, you know!)

Although I hadn’t intended to show off, I answered like that.

I mustn’t display weakness to my student, even if she was just my student for a few months.

If compared to the months and years that Chloe has lived, it would just be a few trifling months.

――No. For me, those few months (daily lives) were a treasure surpassing everything else――

Was it an auditory hallucination?

It felt like I heard something.

My match with Chloe ended in a draw.

Chloe’s swordsmanship, that has reached the peak, is formidable indeed. I believe that, if compared with my subordinates, her skill is beyond Albert and Agera.

There will be no threats to her when she combines her swordsmanship and her time stopping ability.

The use of emission type power is impossible inside the “Suspended World”, so magic can’t be invoked. Well, I might be able to do it if I become accustomed to it, but it seems to be very difficult.

Also,『Future Prediction』 cannot be used due to the activation of “Suspended World”. I could only depend on pure technique and physical ability. Although, an ability that activates through touch seems to be usable.

So, if someone who is a master swordsman, like Chloe, did have such an ability, they could easily become the strongest.

Oh well, I don’t think there are many people who can move inside the “Suspended World” anyway.

Diablo, Benimaru and Zegion, only these three among my subordinates, seem likely to become able to do it.

Naturally, it is impossible for them to do under the current conditions. With some kind of chance, it is on the scale of one to ten thousand. Even though they could receive this ability as a gift, they wouldn’t be able to use it.

Chloe’s purpose might be, to let me experience “Suspended World” and see whether I could acquire it or not.

I thought all of a sudden.

If that is so, did I meet Chloe’s expectation?

Because I promised that I would, in one way or another, defeat Yuuki and free Chloe, so she doesn’t need to worry.

Defeat is not allowed. I should show it with my results.

After the match, we conversed for a little longer.

Chloe seems to have seen when Dino’s colleagues had attacked the town and had wanted to help. However, there was no need for Chloe’s help, as she told me that my followers are strong.

I’m a bit embarrassed, but I’m glad that my subordinates were praised.

We talked about such topics for a while, and in the end Chloe said this,

「Sensei. When the Great War begins, I will challenge Demon Lord Guy Crimson for a match.

The order given to me is to stop Guy.

So, if Demon Lord Guy Crimson doesn’t participate in the Great War, there will be no need to fight an unnecessary battle.

If it’s possible, with Sensei’s persuasion, please somehow stop Guy.

As I will be looking for the way to remove the curse, somehow――」

「Ok. Guy is unexpectedly a reasonable guy, I will talk to him and try to get his consent.

You seem to get along with Leon, you should ask for his help as well.」

「Okay! I’m going to go meet Leon Onii-chan then.」

「Oh. Then, take care~」

As I say so, I pat Chloe’s head.

「Ehehe」

Chloe laughed and smiled happily, then she lifted her head after she bowed to me.

Her expression was dignified and tense, there was none of the childishness that she had shown but a moment ago.

「Well then, Sensei….. May fortune be with you in war!」

Leaving those words behind, Chloe left.

………

……

…

I met Guy,

「That’s why, just a bit more, until Chloe’s release!」

And I emphasized that.

What kind of reaction will i get from Guy? I wonder.

However, I am not concerned.

Chloe’s release is the most important thing to me, Guy’s circumstances don’t matter to me.

Chloe is extremely strong, but Guy is just as strong. Honestly, no one can imagine what is going to happen if those two fight each other.

After all, both of them seem to have concealed their true strength.

「You also, so suddenly…… However, I understand the story.

If it’s the “Hero”, there is no lack for an opponent.

Moreover, she is the strongest among the awakened Heroes who's been called names like “The Nameless Hero” and “Jet Black Hero”.

However, she is the person Leon was searching for as well as Ruminas’ loved one, what a small world right?…..

Oh well. I will at least accompany her in this farce. She is an adequate opponent.

If it is such a situation, it is a foolish action to be exhausted at this point.」

Unexpectedly, Guy agreed to it easily.

He seems to feel a bit indebted to me since I awakened his subordinates last time.

No….. he might just be looking forward to his fight with Chloe.

Although, I don’t think that there will be any problem for Chloe’s safety, as I got both of their consent to not use all of their power and keep it down to the degree of a skirmish….. I am still a little worried.

Guy is a battle maniac as well, it would be good if it doesn’t become a serious and fired up battle.

Such matters, I will let nature take its course.

However, I am glad that I have a good relationship with Guy.

Because it used to be common sense that fellow Demon Lords don’t get along, Yuuki hasn’t seemed to notice that we are making connections in the back.

If he knew, the order he gave to Chloe would be different.

Oh well, although Dino knows it, to some degree, I’m sure he didn’t hear the whole story of when Guy came here.

He has leaked something along the lines of Milim coming to play.

About Ruminas coming to the research facility, so he might have figured out the cooperation between me and Ruminas.

However, as I refrained from contacting Leon, I don’t think that Dino noticed our alliance.

Dino is not a hard worker, because of that, he is trustworthy in the things that he doesn’t know.

Thinking that I and Guy are not close, I believe that his objective will be to strike down both Guy and Chloe.

No, if I think about it, in contrast to Yuuki, either result might be good for Angra Mainyu.

If his aim is to take them down together, he would order Chloe to fight to the death, instead the instruction is only to keep Guy busy, his main purpose might be to make a situation where Guy can’t participate in the war?

《I believe his main purpose is to decrease the degree of his ruling influence.

If he strengthens his control over Chloe, it will become impossible for him to let out all of his ability.

You can think of it as this; by giving a loose order to Chloe, the ruling influence will be lost.

The current Angra Mainyu (Yuuki) is in the condition to use 100% of his power.

And there’s another.

While the purpose of Yuuki and Angra Mainyuu are the same, the methods they use are completely different.》

I see.

In other words, he judged that it is more strategic and meaningful to use Chloe loosely, so that he can fight with all of his power.

Certainly, when using the strongest yet complicated force, it can’t be helped that he would try to keep it close at hand.

It’s about how to use that fighting potential.

If it was Yuuki, he would not be able to effectively utilize it. But Angra Mainyu would make sure to use everything.

――It looks like it’s going to be tough.

He is pretentious, like Yuuki, the type that doesn’t take detours.

For his goal, he will make the optimal operation. Such an opponent is very troublesome.

I must brace myself so that I can handle it carefully.

Having finished my negotiations with Guy, we returned to the meeting hall.

All of the members are already present at the round table except for me and Guy.

No, wait, Dino isn’t here. In a sense, he’d be a big shot if he did come.

The meeting began the instant Guy sat down in his seat.

First of all, a status report from me. I distributed the document which I had made, and showed them the analysis of the war with the empire.

At the same time, I declared that the Empire’s territory has become my territory, for which I received each of the other Demon Lords’ approval.

Usually, interruptions will come at this point and it would become a quarrel, which was the common pattern.

However, for this time, no one objected and so I got the territory with a one-sided game (one-sided landslide victory).

I’m not in a situation where I’m weak and could be beaten.

Rather I got a lot stronger and haven’t weakened whatsoever.

Anyway, I believe that there isn’t anyone who would complain against me among the current Demon Lords.

They didn’t oppose my interest as there is no merit in being hostile against me.

And so, the war report was finished and we moved into the explanation of the current flow of the situation.

After I finished a general explanation,

「Did Dino betray us?……」

Dagruel murmured in a small voice.

Guy was not surprised as he seems to have had some presumption on it. But one might need to think from Dagruel’s perceptive, as he was close to Dino.

「Rather than betraying us, it seems he was on the other side from the beginning.

I mean, I get the feeling that he would be close to a guy with a laid back personality, like Yuuki.」

With my nonchalant words, Dagruel and Guy stopped moving.

「That’s right. That guy (Dino), what’s he so frolic about, he came to kill me, you see!

He said some reason that I didn’t understand, like how I became an obstacle for that person or something, it seemed to be an old acquaintance of his.」

Ramiris supplemented my words, and it seems to be the clincher.

「No way.」

Guy mutters,

「It’s impossible. But maybe……」

Dagruel was thinking about something with a difficult face.

It seems something is bothering him.

After that, the meeting progressed without a hitch.

Guy stays put, as he promised me.

However, he entrusted everything to his subordinate Mizari, preparing so that she can deal with anything that may happen.

Hirari will devoted herself as Guy’s personal bodyguard, to provide for any contingency. Because the prideful Guy would never arrange it, it is probably her own decision.

By evolving, Mizari and Hirari have likely begun to moved by their own free will to a greater extent.

Ruminas will be maintaining the status quo.

As she had prepared armaments in preparation for the Empire’s invasion and was ready to go to the war, I asked her to maintain her current state.

We should be cautious, since it is uncertain when the army of angels will strike.

Since Angra Mainyu’s purpose is world annihilation, he will not hesitate to invade the western countries.

Both Leon and Dagruel each possess their own army.

In the case of Milim, Karion is in the middle of organizing the newly created army.

Of course, as is appropriate for the name of Demon Lord, the army didn’t seem to miss any combat training even during peacetime.

It is the proper duty for a Demon Lord to protect their domain.

So they will defend their own territory. Because humans can’t live in the territory ruled by Guy, it has nothing to do with the current situation, so his land is unrelated.

Certainly, there shouldn’t be any problems even if I didn’t move.

However, Guy’s subordinates will actually be the defense of the western countries as a reserve force under Mizari’s command.

Having misread the relations between us, Angra Mainyu’s calculation would go amiss. It could be said that this is thanks to Dino, with his irresponsible investigation.

With that, I don’t think the situation is bad.

Next, it would be great if the enemy forces doesn’t become more powerful than our expectations......

Oh well, making preparations for such a situation is the main reason of today’s conference.

We adjusted our plans so that we can smoothly perform a mutual cooperative system and made some detailed arrangements.

The conference was finished just like that, without any problem.

Each of us were preparing for the decisive battle with the angel army and we will immediately contact each other in case of an emergency.

If it is possible, we arranged an agreement to help when we can, and it had become a significant matter.

In case of emergency, it seems I needed to visit Milim’s country and Dagruel’s country.

I installed the magic formations for teleportation, I want to make sure I can come and go.

In the end, after the conference, I had Mizari take me to various places and recorded the location information.

At that time, I confirmed that Milim and Dagruel are unable to use teleportation. Of course, Ramiris too.

「Well, I’m no good at such things.」

「Me too, I hate doing such troublesome and detailed calculations.

Rather, it’s alright if I can fly!」

Certainly, the magic of the teleportation series can only jump to the point of a predestined location.

If there is the image of the present location and the destination it is possible for the Spatial Transfer (Teleport) series, but there’s still a need to calculate the correlation of the positional information correctly.

It seems to be easy, but it’s an unexpectedly difficult skill.

As for Milim, she is someone who acts instinctively with her inborn intuition, however, she seems to be weak at deliberate calculation.

Dagruel is obviously a muscle brain. As for Ramiris, oh well you know.

It might be considerably useful to construct facilities for teleportation usage.

Using this opportunity, I got the approval for my plan to install the teleportation magic formations at their places.

At the parting,

「I entrust Chloe to you」

I was reminded as such by Leon.

Not saying anything, I nod to say “leave it to me”.

Leon seems to have understood, he returned a nod and left.

As usual, it’s a secret that I thought he’s a pompous, attractive man.

Thus, receiving the information beforehand, though the preparation period is short, there was approximately 3-4 weeks of time.

The Demon Lords return to their territories and began to prepare for the Great War.

* * *

[1] A Custom popular in Ancient World and in modern East Asia Countries, where instead of a hand signature, people gave their seal to mark documents.

[2] *dum*dum*dum*dum*dum* Insert Terminator theme*

[3] 超能力 Chounouryoku, super power or the more used term for it are ESP, supernatural power.

[4] Like flash step and the like. Those accelerate the speed of the user, while Rimuru's (Chloe's) ability is stoping the time.

[5] Also can be interpreted as move, enter.





Chapter 193: To Each Preparations


Through Walpurgis, I have safely secured the aid of the other Demon Lords.

Well, it's not like the Demon Lords won't be affected by the crisis.

So, to properly state, I have safely given spoken warnings about the upcoming great war; Yes, that would be the better way of putting it.

There’s little time left until the game begins.

The other Demon Lords frantically began their preparations.

I too, gave many orders to Gerudo for our preparations.

The revived empire army's reorganization was complete, 300 thousand would defend their capital while the remaining 400 thousand are being integrated into their respective positions.

After confirming our communications with the high orc villages, a massive industrial construction force was formed.

Next was a force made to communicate with all the differing villages in the Great Jura Forest.

The force will be responsible for overall circulation of goods, which was a gigantic trade hub.

With Gerudo in command, each force was given their objectives and they moved out respectively. Even if we set the rails right away, the train itself won't be completed for a while. So, what should be done now, is clearing out the relevant sections of the forest and laying down roads instead. The trees we would chop down end up as lumber anyway, which would then get transported to the other planned construction sites.

A massive project which would normally take many years to complete, was now started up.

The Great Jura Forest, was instantly filled with life.

Among all that work, the number one priority was setting up Transit Gates.

I prioritized the production and setup of such Transit Gates so I’m able to dispatch the entire troops of soldiers during emergencies,.

The longer the distance, the smaller the amount of mass could be transported. I had plans for the foreseeable future to let those who couldn't hand the usage of magic power use the gates, this would be done with magic stones to store up magic essence.

But, in terms of preparations for the coming Great War, such precision wasn't required yet. In preparation for the future, of course the gates would need to be reusable, but perfection was second fiddle for the moment.

Setting up the relevant location information would be enough to travel to a destination. Usage of the gate depletes some of user's magic essence, but that's obviously normal. Even if someone was to travel an excessively long distance, death by over usage of magic essence wasn't a thing so no fatalities there.

Regular soldiers won't be travelling around anyway, only the elites would need to travel around.

With this design focus, although it looks quite plain, one gate was set up in each major city.

Thus, with the help of the empire's veteran magicians, a strict order was given to get the gate in cities governed by the Demon Lords at least up to working standards.

Though I feel bad for Gerudo as there was much rushed work, having mutual help during emergencies was beneficial, so the gates were absolutely key.

Gerudo himself was elated simply by getting orders from me, he didn't look the least bit unhappy.

More like, he was working happily and with great zeal.

About 100 individuals directly under Gerudo had their Stomachs expanded, so there were few problems transporting materials; They worked at a pace which would make modern technologies pale in comparison.

If it was possible to observe the Great Jura Forest via satellite imaging, you would see visible changes daily. With that thought, I saved images of the progress in a Recording Orb, from a bird's POV. This would be useful for future use as research materials.

The current Status quo proved Gerudo to be a great asset.

Adalman and Gadra-roushi were helping out with Gerudo. As the two of them are specialists in the field of magic, setting up the magic formations was moving along efficiently.

At the pace they are going, it looks like we'll make it in time to set up the gates in major cities.

One point of worry though, was that Adalman was an undead and his appearance was that of a skeleton, was it ok for him to casually work outside?

Of course it looks like he's using Illusions to cover up his appearance, but is that really ok? Well, it won't help if I worry. As they are working just dandy, there shouldn't be any problems.

And so, construction efforts continued for our current crisis.

The other officers, were familiarizing themselves with their subordinates' abilities, and reorganizing their forces.

The demons were mostly standing by around me, elegant and relaxed. But, their minions were thrown into the labyrinth, to let them get combat training.

I felt their way of using the labyrinth was kinda weird, but I decided not to think too much about it.

It all started when Diablo threw Venom into the labyrinth.....

Then the other demons also started doing it. Venom was currently getting his ass handed to him by Zegion's follower, Apito.

Seems like Apito is usually the one dishing out the pain. As expected of one of the Labyrinth's Top Ten.

Well, Albert let him slip past, so he ended up reaching Apito's floor. Albert was enjoying his bout with Agera.

Agera was, despite being low on the nobility hierarchy, noticeably stronger than others of her level. Her ability to handle a blade was on an amazingly high level.

Add Hakurou into the mix, and you get an exhibit of blademasters.

Those who have interest in the way of the blade all train at that level, it has become common knowledge for all who make use of the labyrinth as training grounds.

Even I was thinking of secretly making use of it.

Back to the original topic, it seems as though the idea of holding back or letting someone win don't exist for Apito.

Frankly, she's so thorough it's scary. I could only hope the demons there work their hardest.

By the way, Apito's status look like this.

Name: Apito

Species: Insect Model Devil

Divine Protection: Great Demon Lord's Blessing

Title: "Insect Queen"

Ability: Ultimate Gift

　　　『Queen of Worship Valkyrie』

Thought Acceleration・Demon Insect Birthing・Demon Insect Domination・

Ultra Speed Movement・Space Control・Multi-Layered Barrier

　　　Regular Skills...『Magic Perception』『Heat Perception』

　　　Combat Skills...『Swarm Command』『Lethal Attack』

Resistances: Pain Immunity, Physical Attack Resistance, Natural Elements Resistance, Abnormal Status Resistance, Mental Attack Resistance

This looks impossible to defeat for normal adventurers.

A powerhouse who can easily defeat the old school demon lords, such is Apito.

Benimaru, saying he wanted to re-evaluate his abilities, had a room made for him in the labyrinth, and seems to be sparring with Souei.

It won't be a surprise if he's undergoing enhanced intensive training, under Ciel-sensei's guidance.

Ranga looks to be working well with Gobuta. Ranga was wagging his tail, and seems to be very happy, but, is this just my imagination, or does Gobuta looks real worn out every day?

Nope, must be my imagination. I shall believe they are getting along well, and warmly watch over them.

Gobuta, may you find happiness!

Gabil was focusing on training his High Speed Flight and High Speed Movement abilities with his fellow Wyverns.

The teamwork among them has improved, plus he can now supply magic essence to them to give them a power up too.

Soon, they will show unity on a whole other level.

Now this is surprising, for the frivolous one to be so cautious. But I'll give him credit, for thinking of ways to counteract all the scenarios he could think of, and putting all of that into their training.

As our enemies are the Angels, battles in the air will definitely happen. I shall look forward to the results of Gabil's hard work.

Kumara has pushed her way into Zegion's place, and is challenging him.

Although she defends the 90th floor, her being inferior to Zegion who guards the 80th floor has her somewhat triggered.

Sadly, she isn't holding up well.

Besides that Zegion is, frankly, something more of a guardian overseer[1].

Leaving the 80th floor to Apito, his position is now to oversee the entire labyrinth.

When the great war begins, there will be a need to defend Ramiris, as the strongest piece, she should be in the most important part of the labyrinth.

With Beretta as Ramiris' adjutant, there's no worries about administration.

What's left is would be who to put in charge of the labyrinth's defenders.

There is Zegion as the guardian overseer, and Beretta as Ramiris' personal guard.

Among the 12 Guardian Lords, having multiple of them on the same floor is kind of a waste.

But well, our true "Citadel" is the labyrinth. So, being able to react to all situations flexibly is a good thing.

In light of the coming battle, all the other residents are making their own preparations.

That was what it looked like for those preparing. Me? If you were to ask what I was doing at this time.....

I was going through trial and error for some stuff.

I also accepted guidance on swordsmanship from Agera at the 70th floor.

Albert's sword techniques, make use of "hacking" attacks, with a sword and shield as his main focus.

In comparison, Hakurou and Agera are Blade users, with their focus on using a Katana. Forgoing a shield, and balancing offense and defense with just a Katana in hand. The logic was fundamentally different, when compared to what was used in martial schooling.

As my weapon of choice was a Katana, though i kinda feel bad for Albert, he isn't suitable to be my Teacher.

Taking sword strikes, and having my attacks parried, I learned the techniques with my body.

There was no other way than repetition for this. With the optimal movement, getting my body to react reflexively, I forcefully learned all of the known forms.

Sounds easy, but is bat shit crazy hard. Although, I actually enjoyed the training.

After that, while resting my body, I contemplated about『Void God Azathoth』.

This ability has it's risky parts. In my mock battle with Chloe earlier, only the activation of "Suspended World" was used.

For abilities that controlled time, it affects every being regardless of who activates the ability. If a being had the capability to move while "Suspended World" was active, that being would be able to react even if it didn't activate the ability itself.

In other words, if two beings that are able to move while time is stopped are battling, activating such an ability is kinda pointless.

Since both can move, it didn't matter if you stop time or not, the situation won't change. Now, according to Ciel's analysis, Chloe can only stop time for some seconds at most. But, there's a high chance she has an ability similar to future sight.

After experiencing an "Event" once, she can turn the clock back to any moment before said "Event", did I understand that correctly? I find it hard to understand this type of ability.

If she used this ability, I wouldn't have any way to counter it. If she uses it, that is. It's not like I intend to defeat Chloe, but the requirements to activate this ability, is "Flowing Time". Which means, if I wanted to block that ability, all I had to do was to stop time.

As long as "Suspended World" is active, Chloe's ability's requirement of "Flowing Time" is not met.

Also, though Chloe can only stop time for some seconds, I can stop time for quite a long duration; A total of roughly 30 minutes in one day.

This part I totally couldn't understand, but according to Ciel, even when within "Suspended World", activating other abilities is possible.

By incorporating the energy that is released within the law of suspension, it's possible to make said energy unrestricted by time halting effects.

Of course, none of that is possible without Ciel's support. Because it's impossible to recognize what flowing time "looks" like.

Which means, to me who wields this ability, it can be said with absolute confidence that other beings which are unable to "exist" within "Suspended World" will not be able to defeat me.

Up to this point, all the information and predictions that have been obtained are from the mock battle with Chloe and testing, after which I and had the information compiled. And now, I'm thinking about another matter.

Why Ciel didn't interfere in my mock battle with Chloe. Most likely, it was because she was incapable of holding back.

To explain what that meant, I would need to talk about『Void God Azathoth』, which was in essence an overwhelmingly condensed cluster of Energy.

"Turn Null" generated Energy of absolute destruction.

Channeling this Energy was exceptionally difficult even for Ciel-sensei.

This ability, it wasn't the kind which would let you hold back, it was all or nothing.

At first, activation of magic with this Energy was tested out. Basic magic which only created a simple flame, caused a massive explosion.

As the test was conducted in an experiment room in the labyrinth, it didn't cause any nasty accidents, but this led to my understanding that I couldn't take experimenting with it lightly.

Ciel is happily analyzing it currently.

That's why, though it has been awhile, I am running simulations in my mind. As of now, I have a 90% chance of victory in a battle against Chloe. Though, that's hoping she was fighting seriously in our mock battle.

But, I took her predicted movements, and increased them a fair bit more, then I did the battle simulations. The exception, was if I fought with only swordplay, chances of victory drop below 30%.

For that, I felt that I still had much training ahead of me.

As for Guy, there was a lack of information. If even once, I could have a look at him battling seriously, some predictions could be done, but....

Such chances don't just fall out of the sky.

Incidentally, if Chloe went against Diablo, Zegion and Benimaru in a 1v3, there was a 90% chance of victory for my side.

In the end, it's only the result of a simulation. If they went against her head on, it's a 100% defeat.

There's no such thing as "fair and square" or "dirty" in a fight, only by utilizing everything they had could they improve their odds to 90%.

Looking at it the other way, just how strong is Chloe?!

There was a chance that she may be even stronger than Guy.

Well, that's only assuming Guy isn't able to move within the "Suspended World".

This was what I’ve been doing, during our preparations for the upcoming battle.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Dagruel was looking over his country.

Until yesterday Demon Lord Rimuru's subordinates were setting up the magic formation of the transit gate.

They sure work hard, he thought as he admired their diligent work. Just this morning, reporting that the construction is complete, the commander by the name of Gerudo and his engineer followers all left.

Dagruel looked at the completed magic formation with far-sighted eyes, transporting soldiers on a larger scale was now possible, as he thought in amazement.

The base looked to be made from stone, if the stone lid was removed, what looked to be a empty space for further processing was set up as well.

Although they only did what was needed to complete the gate, in Dagruel's eyes, this was already plenty an amazing piece of work.

(To let anybody be able to use this was… Just how far into the future has Demon Lord Rimuru envisioned...?)

What that meant, he was honestly amazed, this Demon Lord called Rimuru thought of something he himself couldn't even have come up with.

But, a sudden voice from behind expelled Dagruel's feelings.

With no indication whatsoever, the being that suddenly appeared behind him said

「Sup, Dagruel. It's been awhile. I'm glad you seem to be fine.

Now then, I don't have much time anyways, so I'll get to the point.

But before that, I need confirmation....

Are you still one of my servants?」

Hearing that voice, Dagruel thought, "Ahh, as I have expected", and came to terms with his heart.

He had a faint inkling that this might have been the case from the moment Dino betrayed the Octagram.

That idiot Dino would never have made the decision to betray of his own volition in the first place.

Following that train of thought, if there was anyone who could order Dino around, he could only think of one such being.

That being was exalted as a god among them――

「Yes! Of course, my Master!

This Dagruel, have been patiently waiting for your return!!」

He turned, and knelt. Without facing up, Dagruel gave his respects to the being who has suddenly appeared, and was now sitting on Dagruel's throne.

That was what he truly felt. He was only slightly fond of his current position.

「Un. If it was you, I had faith that you would say that, Dagruel.」

This being, Velda, was quietly looking at Dagruel as he matter-of-factly nodded.

「Now then, I'm going to remove your seal, as I have lots of work for you to help me with.

By now you should be able to control the power more or less.

I'm looking forward to your achievements, "Titan (Tyrant Gigant)" Dagruel.」

As he was saying such, he put his hand on Dagruel's head who still looking downwards. In the past age of gods, the ferocious Gigant, had once challenged "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava and was sealed.

An atrocious king, who spread destruction on earth. With his overwhelmingly supernatural strength, multiple countries were reduced to dust.

The feared god of destruction, who drove many ancient magic countries to the pits of despair.

Even in the present, with his abilities sealed by "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava, the scene of his rage earned him the title "Earthquake".

Because of his great power, the devastation wrought when he loses his reasoning was unfathomable.

That was about to be released again.

(Ahh, to be of use to "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava-sama, this is great.)

Thoughts of his 3 sons passed by in his mind.

Their absence in his country now, is it a good or a bad thing…… Can't help much thinking about it now.

「Gunuu!! I AM, "TITAN" DAGRUEL!!

With this body of mine, I am the being who disposes of all who oppose your Excellency!

I await, your orders!!」

He bellows, in a show of his atrocious might.

Velda looked at him gleefully, and gave him a multitude of orders.

* * *

[1] Male Albedo??? XD





Chapter 194: World Rumbling


On that day, the declaration of war was announced to all people who lived in the world.

A huge image was projected in the sky.

The boy with blue eyes in the projection opened his mouth dignifiedly.

『My name is Velda. The one who brings destruction to this world.

Today, on this day and at this time, I declare a war to the residents of the entire world.

Life or death.

All of you should fight as hard as possible. Well then, shall we begin? Armageddon (The Final War)!』

Those words became the signal of the start.

From the huge gate that appeared in the sky, armies of angels spring out in succession.

The world was immediately wrapped in chaos.

Oh dear, we received a preemptive strike.

By the oath from Velda, the former Angra Mainyu, thus the game begins.

However, Velda huh.

Angra Mainyu having that name means that there is no trace of Yuuki’s personality anymore.

Though I don’t know what kind of effect it had, I did comprehend that a completely different plan was put into motion.

「I don’t care whether it is Velda or something else, I will beat him speechless!」

「Yeah that’s right. There is no reason to trouble Rimuru-sama.」

「Yes. Considering that I want to go out and see places I never seen, wishing for world destruction is unacceptable.」

Ul, Testa and Carrera are talking as they please.

If it’s me, I would be more careful of Yuuki, though I feel this is not an easy task.

I wonder from where did these three’s confidence come from.

The situation of each country is projected by my surveillance magic on several large screens which I installed in the control room, which is in the Joint Operations Headquarters.

The situation is not good, yet it is not the worst either. Due to prior communications, the governing body of each country were able to expect this situation.

Though with limited time, the arrangements for the evacuation instructions to the people were put in order. The problem is the chaos that will occur due to the prolonged war and food shortage.

Hinata is also cooperating in leading the people, so the evacuation was finished by yesterday. The people who were doubting it before, are now quiet.

I wonder till when this status will keep.

Right now, people who were confused by fear and people who complained because of their anxiety are few. However, such people will increase as time passes.

The people in the capital cities, where the evacuation is completed, only have enough food for about a week.

Because the help hasn’t reached the people of the rural areas, only a warning was conveyed. Later, under the command of the local government, in the current situation, each of them will cope with it by themselves.

I think that a considerable amount of effort will be needed just to maintain the current state.

Because The Great War has occurred every 500 years, only the shelters are prepared.

In each country’s capital, the shelter for the citizens is prepared inside a cavern in the nearby mountains or underground.

Although some, more or less, preserved food is stored, it is unable to satisfy all of the citizens whom exceed tens of thousands.

According to the record of the Great Wars up til now, the number of angels seemed to increase in a single week. As such, it is unclear what will happen this time.

Although preparation was greater than in the past, I expect that riots will occur in the case that The Great War is prolonged.

It only depends on the circumstances, but it was depressing to think that, in the worst case, I might need to use soldiers to suppress the riots.

How will the angels move? That’s the main problem.

Different from what has happened in the past, now that the angels have a will of their own, what will be the main focus of their armies’ attacks?

Will they focus on us, the opposing forces? Or, in order to bring us together, will they focus their attacks at the human nations?

My surveillance magic is effective in verifying that.

And so, I could observe all of the important locations by projecting images of them.

The preparation was complete, I can instantly grasp the angels’ movements.

The “Palace of White Ice” on the ice continent where Guy resides.

The magic city that Leon rules, “El Dorado”.

The Holy Empire Ruberios where Ruminas has concealed herself.

The Palace Reaching Heaven[1], the castle of the giants’ kingdom which Dagruel rules.

Every capital city and major city of the western countries.

Every big city that exists as important locations as well as the East Empire’s capital.

And near the center of the land with the vast abundant harvests that spreads through the south of Great Jura Forest, a castle with white walls, built by the people who admired Milim, stood there elegantly, it was the castle of Milim, the “Destroyer”.

Every place was projected clearly on the large screens.

Immediately after the war declaration was done, the army of angels sprung forth from the huge gate that appeared in the sky.

However, it was primarily a bluff.

Their focus was concentrated on four points.

First of all, Guy was excluded because Chloe was sent to deal with him instead.

With this, as expected, there was no need for additional forces.

Then, the problem are the 4 places in question……

First of all is “El Dorado”. An army of 200.000 angels of different sizes and qualities had invaded it.

The next is Holy Empire Ruberios. An army of 200.000 is also attacking this place.

The third place is Milim’s castle, the White Wall Castle. An army of 200.000 also appeared there.

And the last place is right overhead, the outside of the Labyrinth.

In other words, our country, an army of 400.000 angels are attacking here.

Hey, why is it that only my place got twice the number?

I wish that the forces went to Dagruel-ossan’s place too. In that case, we could crush them with a swift attack.

I thought about such a naïve thing, but the situation doesn’t seem like it will be so convenient.

“Let’s gather all of the Demon Lords in one place, everyone can defeat them, right!” so I insisted, but the scene of me being looked at by everyone with cold eyes, is still fresh in my memory.

The reason for it is because it is against the aesthetics! Or something like that.

I don’t care about aesthetics, I only want to settle the problem quickly……

Somehow, the only thing that they consented to was aid during emergencies.

I had prepared the transfer magic formation, with much effort, for the plan I had in mind, however I failed in the persuasion.

I consulted with Ciel and agreed that there’s a margin of flexibility in it, unfortunately this plan was still rejected.

If we had executed that plan, we could have been predominantly advantageous when the angel army dispersed…… sadly it can’t be helped.

Oh well, the Demon Lords are not my subordinates, and not colleagues that can be trusted either.

It’s something like a miracle that they can cooperate with each other. So, I’m okay with such a result.

The progress of the war is hardly satisfactory, the enemy is good enough to divide the forces that could deal with our side.

If they had spared some of their forces towards Dagruel, then it is likely that the angels will still have an even force against us though.

The angel forces seem to be moving into a slightly advantageous situation. It’s as if they had counted our forces……

《As expected, I concluded that there is a betrayer among the Demon Lords》

Suddenly, Ciel give me a warning.

Although Ciel had pointed it out some time ago, I said that I disagree with the timing when Dino showed his true nature.

I didn’t think about Dino to that extent, so I laughed it off……

In any case, since the war has begun now, it is unnatural if they don’t attack when there is an opportunity to do so, or so Ciel insisted.

However, there’s no definite evidence, and each Demon Lord doesn’t have any motive for it either.

They spent the trump card that is Chloe to block the intervention of Guy, therefore Guy is out of question.

I can exclude Leon and Ruminas because of their ties to Chloe too.

Ramiris and Milim are out of question.

That only leaves Dagruel, however, his upright character as a soldier makes him the number one unlikeliest to be the betrayer.

It is certain that he was close to Dino, but he has continued to fight against the angels since the ancient times and didn’t seem to betray in those times.

Also, his three sons are being worked hard by Shion, and are training here. If he intended to betray us, surely he wouldn’t entrust his sons to the enemy.

This side didn’t suggest it either, it was a request from him.

As such I had rejected the opinion, and believed that Ciel was just thinking too much.

(Dagruel is the betrayer?)

《Dagruel has the highest probability of being the betrayer.

Yet I cannot throw away the possibility that Ruminas is the one either.

If Dagruel moves, his betrayal will be confirmed.

If Ruminas asks for help without moving, Ruminas is the betrayer.》

There seems to be a possibility that Dagruel is not the betrayer.

Is that so? Currently, An army of 200.000 angels are against Ruminas. Additionally, Ruminas has her own troops. If reinforcements went there, without a doubt they would be annihilated, huh?

Even if there were no reinforcements, at least in the current situation, Ruminas would have a hard fight, yet surely she wouldn’t defeated.

The battle might be hanging in the balance, but it won’t be one-sided. In that case, the proud-hearted vampire princess would not request for help.

But even so, in the case that Dagruel moves to aid Ruminas even when she doesn’t request for help……

Dagruel’s troops would turn their fangs towards Ruminas.

I see.

Certainly, in that case the betrayer would become known.

They not only divided their forces, they allocated it in a way that could deal with us, with the intention to crush each and every Demon Lord.

Each Demon Lord does not have much in the way of surplus troops and it might have been anticipated that there are not enough spare troops to be sent as reinforcements.

And it will be uncertain which one is telling the truth if I check the situation with only telepathic communication.

Distrust will rise among us and our cooperation will collapse as well. After I saw through this plan, I realized that it is a cunning strategy.

They had Dino betray us once so as get our guards down, in the expectation that we would deem that there would be no further betrayals. To be honest, if Ciel-sensei was not here, I’m certain that I would have gotten caught in that plan.

That would only be in the case that she was not here, as that plan has already been completely seen through.

With surveillance magic, I can perfectly grasp the placement of the enemy forces. It is the enemy’s miscalculation, the chances of victory seems to be in our favor.

Although I made the transfer magic formation with much effort, it is not a thing which can be activated by every army.

So, I will not need to be so afraid even if someone defects. As it is not possible to transfer to inside the labyrinth with the magic formation.

I only would only tell each Demon Lord to seal the power of the transfer formation once the matter of the betrayer is settled.

(Okay, keep investigating the situation without stopping!)

《Yes, understood, Master!》

Saying that there is a betrayer from the very beginning of the war is not pleasant.

Truly, it is an omen that it’ll become a few nasty battles.

At the time that I was gloomily thinking such, I hardly believed my eyes when I saw a harder to believe scene.

Milim’s army is being pushed back.

Impossible! The former Demon Lords, Karion and Frey are over there, and yet……

At that moment, there was a change to Milim’s castle which was projected on the screen. In a section of the castle, an explosion occurred.

It seems the situation has become worse than I expected.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

When the gate appeared in the sky, and angels had begun to pour out from it, Milim had been warming up for the war in high spirits.

A mob of angels is not a worthy foe for Milim.

She can rely on the subordinates whom she trained herself, and there’s Karion who received the position of general.

「Hmm, in that case, I’m going out for a bit.」

Saying such, lightly, Karion stands up.

‘Let’s go, all you rascals!!’ When Karion issued his command, he gets on his griffon and proceeds to intercept the enemy.

Milim watched the situation while getting excited.

But the situation changed completely with the appearance of a single man.

「Yours truly is one of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Vega! All you small fries don’t even pass the qualifications to be food for this great me.

Stop your useless resistance and quickly be eaten by me!」

The man shouted such with a loud voice and began to slaughter Karion’s beastman subordinates.

Even the most earliest soldiers who have been following Karion since the period of the Beast Kingdom “Yuurazania”, all turned pale at the man’s dreadful power.

Milim’s currently assembled troops have been assembled through the reorganization of the forces of her area.

The command of the whole army is left to Karion who took the position of general.

Their total number is 300.000.

At the center of them was the 3.000 units titled “Flying Beast Knight Order”.

3.000 griffons of “Sky Queen” Frey’s forces and mounted on their back are the specially picked beastmen of “Beast King” Karion’s subordinates.

They’re merely 3.000 people but they are warriors who exceed A rank who are able to easily do high speed air battle as one effective body.

In this world, this is the largest force composed only of people who exceed A rank.

Even the Empire’s magic beast corps was composed of “A-“ rank, so it could be easily to comprehend that they are a significant forces.

Griffons are originally magic beasts with “B+” rank.

But, with the result of the training given by Karion, their ability was raised to “A-“ rank.

As with the A rank beastmen who rode them, their ability became equivalent to A rank.

The Flying Beast Knight Order is the strongest subordinates who were trained by Karion in both name and reality.

The rest are the devils, mercenaries and Clayman’s former subordinates. It is a combined force consisting of various people.

Even the people who usually take part in maintaining the public order were roped into the war.

Opposing the angel forces of 200.000 is Milim’s army of 300.000.

Milim’s army has the advantage in number but they are somewhat disadvantaged as their ability quality is average.

Even so, there is the effect of increasing their ability due to Karion’s courageous shout, therefore in the beginning they held the superiority in the battle, but……

Due to the appearance of the man named; Vega of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, the situation has completely changed.

「Humph! Useless, useless, utterly useless! None of you small fries can injure me!」

He shouted such as he swung around the Sky Piercing Halberd[2] that he held in his hand.

With just one swing, a mountain of corpses is made in the surroundings.

‘Grr!’ So Karion ground his teeth as he glared at the provocative Vega.

With just a glance, Karion understood that Vega is different from the other angels. Even if he fights with that man, or even if he deployed the entirety of his treasured “Flying Beast Knight Order”, they would probably get annihilated.

Along with Milim, Frey and her aides, “Harpy” are waiting.

The dirty work is for himself to deal with, the rest he may entrust to Frey.

「Hey, I’m going to fight that cocky bastard Vega.

And so, I entrust the command of the entire army to you, take care of the rest!」

Which is what he told his aide, the tiger beastman Baum.

「 Karion-sama, that guy is……

Shouldn’t I be that guy’s first opponent so that you can check his weaknesses, even if just a little?」

Karion shook his head at Baum’s idea.

In the case of the angel’s army, they have no unity, they are only attacking at random.

If it is so, although his own army is inferior on average, they are advantageous with their numbers, which exceed the number of enemies, and their united command.

In this situation, such folly like ‘the commander is not around’ cannot be permitted to happen. In case a Baum weakens Vega’s power and Karion delivers the finishing blow, that strategy would be worth consideration. Unfortunately, Baum wouldn’t even slow that man down.

His intuition from his battle experience as the Beast King told him that the man named Vega is not an ordinary person.

「No Baum, you wouldn’t even buy any time. It’d be a big loss if there isn’t someone giving orders.

While I fight that guy one on one, you defeat the angels!」

Baum realized, the enemy who calls himself Vega has an unprecedented amount of strength, from Karion’s expression.

For Karion who has an optimistic and frank character, that strained expression is similar to the expression Karion showed before his fight with Milim sometime ago.

「Of course, a person who can only talk, won’t be a threat if it’s Karion-sama.

You can leave the command of the army to me! However, please refrain from the behavior of leaving the work to Frey-sama.」

「Oh crap. If you owe a debt to Frey, it’ll be harsh when she comes to collect the debt.」

The two, both joking with each other, then part ways.

‘Don’t leave the work to Frey’, in other words, he meant ‘Please don’t die’.

Worrying about Karion, who is the strongest Beast King, is something that an aide should never do.

That strength is absolute, the name of “Beast King” is not just for show.

As the general, who is the right hand of the strongest Demon Lord Milim, Karion needs to continue his reign.

(What a thing to say, even though I lost as the Lion Mask.)

Karion recalled his defeat at the hands of Diablo during the Tournament in Tempest.

That country there, is abnormal.

Because even that Diablo who defeated him, was defeated in the finals.

It had taught him that there is always someone better, his self-conceit was finally shattered. After that he endured grueling training and obtained strength greater than he had during his Demon Lord time.

It will be a hard fight, but Karion doesn’t have any intention to be defeated whatsoever.

(That reminds me, Gobuta…… I wonder if he’s doing well ――）

The face of his friend who trained together with him came to mind.

When he remembers that genius who even Karion admits to having abnormal talent that surpasses his own race, he feels happy.

(At best, not getting laughed at by that guy might be the proof that I became strong!)

When Karion sprouted a fearless smile, he charged towards Vega.

When Karion clashed with Vega, a fierce battle began.

Frey pacified Milim who struggled to go there herself.

If Milim, who can’t go easy on anyone, is rampaging seriously, it will not only be the town around the castle that vanishes, but there’ll also be casualties among the ally troops as well.

The current situation, it seems there is a dangerous guy from the enemy side, but Frey believes that Karion can deal with it.

In the case that Karion is defeated, then, and only then, would it be Milim’s turn. Therefore, right now, she needs to watch the way Karion fights, deciding that she needs to analyze the abilities of the enemy.

As Karion’s aide, she was going to do so and have Karion work hard for Milim’s sake.

Frey is cold-hearted and calculating, but that doesn’t mean that she has never trusted Karion. Rather, because she believed that Karion might defeat Vega which would prevent Milim going out.

After all, Frey cannot imagine a battle maniac like him having a hard fight with a person whom she has never heard the name of.

Frey who is not specialized in combat was not able to see the truth of Vega’s terror.

She thought that they could win without having a hard time, even if by any chance Karion had a hard time, so long as Milim analyzed the enemy's power.

But she will immediately notice that her thinking was naïve.

If Milim, who is the leader, can defeat the enemy without a problem, a small sacrifice may be unavoidable.

That is what Frey thought, when Milim was watching Karion’s fight.

That is, until Milim turned around with a fierce expression.

This presence is not an ordinary one, of course Frey, and even the “Harpy” are alerted.

Besides Frey, the others don’t sense anything like an unidentified presence, but Milim’s intuition cannot be mistaken.

「Who are you?」

When Milim asked that, the space mutated it’s color slowly, and a woman appeared.

A woman with beautiful silver hair, similar to Milim.

A “matchless in beauty” woman who seems like an adult version of Milim.

Her white skin and the gaze of her almond-shaped eyes.

Frey gasped. The appearance is too beautiful, and reminds her of her beloved master.

There is a sign that lets you feel that the two resemble each other closely, as if there is blood connection between the two.

Four pure white angels kneel in the rear, to protect the woman.

Their aura are overwhelming and each of them has power equivalent to an awakened Demon Lord, Frey was able to feel it too.

「Nice to meet you, Milim Nava-sama.

I am the one who holds the name, “Lucia”.

This time I have visited to meet you.

Your father is waiting for you. Please, let us go together.」

The woman who introduced herself as Lucia greets and bows to Milim respectfully.

And then she let out those shocking words.

A shock ran through them.

If you are talking about Milim’s father, it would be the late “Stellar Dragon King” Veldanava.

A little while ago, the person who was shown on the image that appeared in the sky had introduced himself as Velda, it couldn’t be……

When Frey thought so,

「Don’t be silly! My father is already dead. If you keep saying this nonsense, I will end your life!」

Frey heard Milim’s enraged voice.

Of course. For Milim, the topic of her family is taboo.

「No, it is the truth. Milim-sama.」

Immediately after the woman said that, a thunderous roar resounded in front of the of the woman who introduced herself as Lucia.

It’s Milim’s fist that went towards Lucia’s face, yet was stopped as if it was blocked by an invisible wall.

Frey was able to tell, Milim threw her fist with all her power and she did not stop it to threaten the woman.

Seeing Lucia who remained calm, even after receiving a full power blow from Milim, it made Frey feel shivers run down her back.

Even if she’s going easy on someone, her title as the “Destroyer” is not for show.

It’s impossible to completely block it, even if using Multiple Barriers.

The reason why is because when Milim attacks, the power is dispersed and not to the extent of killing the opponent. In other words, Milim who threw out the attack with a calculated power in order to break the target’s barrier and yet not kill the target.

For her to remain calm, it’s nothing but that she had exceeded Milim’s assumptions.

Such a thing was something that couldn’t happen as far as Frey knows.

After all, Milim is the strongest Demon Lord, rivaling Guy Crimson――

「It is useless, Milim-sama. Attacks toward me will not be effective whatsoever.

What is more important is that your father is waiting.

“In the new world, let us live together!” is what he said.

Please come with me.」

Although she is beautiful, Lucia repeats the same words like a machine.

Her voice resounding coldly, without any emotion that could be felt from it, it painted Frey’s mind with uneasiness.

(Return immediately, Karion! Milim-sama may be in danger.)

(What did you say!? But, I’m sorry…… I may not be able come back――）

Unlike Frey’s expectations, the man who Karion was fighting against seems to be a more powerful person than she had expected.

For Karion who is a confident person to have no time to spare, Frey was able to understand that he is having a hard fight.

This is bad! As Frey thinks so,

「Kill her!」

She gave an order to the “Harpy” without waiting for Milim’s approval.

Frey had merely judged that it would be dangerous for Milim, if she let this woman keep on doing as she likes.

Because their beloved Master is too gentle to the extent that could be fatal.

If she really tried to kill her opponent then she wouldn’t have a hard fight regardless who the opponent is, but she didn’t fight seriously because she is trying not kill to her opponent. As far as Frey knows, the last time Milim fought seriously was a long time ago. Frey had just been born around that time, Milim destroyed a country and then clashed with Guy.

Because Milim is such a gentle master, Frey wishes to keep her away from as much danger as much as she can.

「Fool.」

One of the kneeling angels stood up and materialized a war hammer.

And then,

「You insects who cling to Milim-sama should know your place!

Die! Lightning Bomber!!」

The angel swung down the war hammer and a destructive lightning which exhibited a tremendous amount of power struck towards Frey and the others.

Frey prepared for her death when she saw the despair-inducing, destructive electric discharge that was released from the war hammer.

The released lightning ran through Frey’s body.

At the same time, the “Harpies” who began an attack towards Lucia were also annihilated with only that single blow.

Though it was an overkill attack that struck Frey and the others, they seemed to barely avoid their deaths, somehow.

Frey mustered her strength to stay conscious in her injured body that could break any moment as she confirmed the cause.

Milim’s left arm had caught the war hammer that was swung down toward Frey and the others.

Thanks to Milim, they had barely survived.

(Ah, Milim is so kind. As I expected, you are not really cut out to kill.)

Thus she thought so.

And at the same time, she froze when she saw Milim’s expression.

It was an expression of rage.

Milim flew into a rage as Frey and the others, who are her subordinates, were injured.

「I will not forgive you. To injure my subordinates, I will never forgive this!!」

So Milim shouts.

And then, light is released from Milim’s body and wrap her in it.

She wore the God class armor on her body as she switched to Battle Mode.

She carries the power of a “True Dragon” in her body, and Milim who had become the incarnation of destruction let loose that power.

The heaven trembles, the earth shatters.

By the anger of an ancient Demon Lord, the world rumbled.

Frey was astonished as she realized the enemy’s aim.

It is good if Milim accepts the invitation. In the case where she declines it…… make her fly into a rage that deprives her of her senses.

And like now……

(Not good! Don’t do it, Milim!!)

Frey who tried to stop Milim with a soundless voice. However, her voice couldn’t reach Milim.

The world will once again be exposed to the wrath of the ultimate dragonoid.

* * *

[1] 天通閣 Tsutenkaku, there’s also a tower with the same name and it's a well-known landmark of Osaka. 閣 can mean tower or palace

[2] 方天戟 Houtengeki, the famous weapon used by warlord Lu Bu in the "Three Kingdoms" period in China.





Chapter 195: Chaos and Counter-moves


This is bad....

Really bad.

From the video that was being projected on the big screen, Milim was enraged, and looked as though she has lost all reasoning.

If Milim seriously ran amok now, just who would stop her.

By some freak chance, Ramiris had managed to calm her down when she clashed with Guy in the distant past.... It doesn't look like we can depend on Ramiris this time.

「Oi, Ramiris....

Just asking, if I were to hold Milim down, would you be able to bring her back to her senses?」

「Wha-! Are you trying to get me killed!?」

As I thought.

Though I didn't expect anything in the first place, for the midget that Ramiris is now, this is too big of an undertaking for her.

「Well, I kinda expected your answer. But, to think their strategy would involve angering Milim....」

As I murmured, I started thinking.

Honestly, this was unexpected.

Here, I was thinking, the being that calls itself Velda would be the only one using『Justice King Michael』.

That said, I was negligent to think only Velda would be able to defeat Milim.

If Velda were to be on the frontlines himself, the plan was to teleport and confront him immediately. You can't really call this underhanded, leaving just enough to maintain our defense lines, the idea to go at him with everything we have is a good idea.

That beauty who I have never seen before, protected by『Justice King Michael』's "Castle Guard", was taunting Milim.

Though having no offensive power whatsoever, she was protected by the absolute defense of "Castle Guard". Even with Milim's nonsensical destructive power, that defense couldn't be penetrated.

In fact, she was making use of that destructive energy to cause damage to the surroundings. Having it turn out like this, Milim's rage would only intensify, and that would be just what the enemy wants.

Distributing abilities, Ultimate Skills which were like trump cards, to his subordinates; this was unexpected.

Yuuki was someone who had the tendency to hoard everything, thus, this was a thought process totally different from the original. What a troublesome opponent.

「That looks bad. If we don't stop Milim, her actions are gonna end up overshadowing those who are destroying the world.」

「Looks that way.... What should we do, Rimuru?」

Ramiris agreed, and looked at me.

Shit happened right after the war began.

So, what should our choice be....

While we contemplate our choices, the situation isn't going to wait for us.

Before I could make my decision, more problems began.

Diablo by himself would have a hard time as Milim's opponent.

At the very least, I would need to send 3 of my followers of Guardian Level or the odds would be bad.

I already need to send that many to handle Milim alone. Then there's the rampaging Vega and that mysterious silver haired female, plus another 4 seraphim class opponents; I'm going to need to send a big portion of my forces already.

The 4 angels who are standing by behind the silver haired female don't look like those mass produced weaklings.

Looking at the present situation, the destruction of Tempest seems to be unavoidable.

From the very start defense of the city was given up, with the aim to rebuild it. All important facilities were moved into the labyrinth, along with all of our guests.

It's sad but all the buildings that have been constructed will be discarded. Thanks to that, there’s no need to defend the city, so it’s possible to maintain our stance of total resistance.

Using the buildings as shields, the 300 thousand ex-empire soldiers were out in the field as our defense force.

Split into 3 combat teams, they’ll coordinate with each other, and confront enemy attacks.

There was a 4th combat team, comprised of combat specialised elites that were summoned previously, still standing by; in actual fact it was a big defense force of 400 thousand strong.

But, there were 400 thousand on the angel side too, so we’re even on numbers.

The remaining 100 thousand ex-empire soldiers, were employed as a peacekeeping force in the Great Jura Forest. They ensure the villages and settlements don't get attacked by angels that were scattered from the frontlines or rouge/deviant angels; they coordinate their efforts and maintain our *other* defenses.

Finally, the volunteer forces which comprised of roughly 30 thousand adventurers, was led by Masayuki, and have headed out to the defense of the western countries.

It was an all out confrontation.

"Drag Lord" Gabil and "Barrier Lord" Gerudo are at the frontlines taking command.

Oh, let's not be forgetting about Gobuta. Though he himself isn't on the level of the other Guardians, he's also working hard at the frontlines.

The battle is at a stalemate.

Of the angel army that's invading Tempest, while they have the numbers they lack capable officers.

They have Dino as the Highest Command for the invasion, but because of his promise with me, he himself won't be taking to the field.

The two fallen angels that tagged along with him, are now in one on one battles against Gabil and Gerudo. Previously Gerudo got pretty beaten up against the two of them, now's the time for his revenge match.

Both of them looked even in terms of power, but since neither are serious yet, the result of their match can't be predicted yet.

Gabil was holding his own against the other, locked in an aerial battle. This side looks even too. I figured it was okay to leave this to them.

Though I wanted to send reinforcements to help them, as we still have no idea how much remained of their invasion force, it wasn't a good idea to show so much of our hand just yet.

I would take action if it looks bad, but I'll have to hold back for now.

With the situation at Tempest currently a stalemate, I shall turn my attention elsewhere.

The problems, were in the other countries.

I now know who the traitor is.

It's Dagruel.

Even though there was no word from Ruminas, he is mobilizing his army.

Along with 200 thousand of the angel army[estimated B rank], plus 100 thousand of Dagruel's Chain Giant army[estimated B+ rank], Ruminas' forces definitely can't hold against them.

Looks like their main target is Ruminas.

Their aim is to crush one pillar of the Demon Lords first, "Queen of Nightmare" Ruminas Valentine.

Ruberios was, in fact, the lynchpin in the defenses of the western countries.

If it were to fall, the enemy would gain a foothold over the western countries, and would probably get their momentum going.

As the angel army was flight capable, if they used the extra large transit gate they would be able to spread their forces rapidly.

It was easily predicted that the inhabitants of the western countries would be unable to fend off a pincer attack, and would get ravaged by the giant army advancing from their west, let alone the angel army coming down from the skies.

Ruminas' personal forces, comprised of:

300 Holy Knights and 400 Bloody Knights [Both estimated at A rank].

As the commanding officers, the 7 greater nobles.

Plus, a handful of Holy Knights led by Arno.

The main force consisted of 100 thousand members of the Holy Scripture Knights[estimated B+ rank], the Saint Church's believers, Lesser Vampires and other similar Majin under Ruminas comprised most of these units.

In addition, was 100 thousand knights[estimated C+ rank], that were sent from the remaining western countries.

That was all.

It was a great force of over 200 thousand, but they were already struggling against the angel army.

Among the elites who were directly under Dagruel, there are A rank Majin class Giants, this meant Ruminas would be outnumbered and outclassed.

Ruminas and Dagruel house the two largest factions among the Demon Lords, their forces were equal. But, counting in the number of reinforcements, and their quality, there’ll be a distinct gap now.

If at this point in time, Ruminas were to fall, the collapse of the western countries would take but an instant.

In less than a month, the western countries would be totally ravaged. This must definitely be prevented.

That means, I'm going to have to send in reinforcements.

Dagruel's strength is still unknown to me. It is said he has the beef to back up getting into fights with Veldora in the past, so it's a bad idea to underestimate him.

Even if he gets into a 1 on 1 fight with Ruminas, it was difficult to predict who would have the upper hand.

As Ruminas wields an Ultimate Skill of the Sin series, i don't think she'll be defeated that easily....

In any case, there's a need for me to send reinforcements.

There are problems elsewhere too.

Against the forces of Leon's Magic City Country, the 200 thousand strong angel army is too much for them to handle.

Currently, with the use of a Defensive Emplacement, and focusing on city defense, his forces are still holding on. But, the moment the defenses are broken through, the flow of the battle is likely to shift.

Leon's forces, was comprised of only 10 thousand Magic Knights[estimated A rank].

They were an elite band of capable knights, which I caught a glimpse of during my visit.

But, the difference in power is too vast for them to be able to cover their handicap in numbers.

Although the angels are estimated to be B rank in combat prowess, the abilities differ for those who are reincarnators. In other words, it's different depending on their willpower.

The mass produced angels are not a threat, but the angels who have a will of their own show obvious increases in strength.

As the race that mirrors the demons, it is better to assume that they too, become stronger the longer they exist.

Additionally, there are reincarnators who were formerly from Yuuki's hybrid forces, it is predicted that there are other hidden commander types and the like.

Then there is also the placement of the upper tier angels, the details are still unconfirmed as of now. They seem to be hiding their true abilities, and blending into the horde of regular angels.

Though there were a few who stood out, there's simply too few in number at this point.

There should be roughly 100 thousand reincarnators from the ex-hybrid forces. There's a need to be wary of them.

With just Leon's forces, he's not going to hold out against 200 thousand angels.

A massive reading has been confirmed in "El Dorado's” airspace.

With Souei's Tsukuyomi, that was analyzed and confirmed using "Eye of the Moon".

It was a reading similar to Vega who was currently attacking Milim's forces.

I think she called herself one of the "Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders".

That would mean, the one who's going to confront Leon is likely Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders Kagali/Kazaream.

The strength of an Awakened Demon Lord. No, if we aren't careful, she might have powered up even more than that.

Leon's plenty strong sure, but since we have no idea just how powerful Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders Kagali is now, being overconfident is a bad idea.

She still seems to be observing, meaning the stalemate will hold, but the situation will change the moment she makes her move.

Until then, I'll need to make my move too.

For now, that's what the overall situation looks like for the other fronts.

Such a bad outlook shortly after the battle began.

Ciel's all fine and dandy as she has completed her predictions and whatnot, it's just a boatload of headaches for me.

After sorting out the issues,

The biggest problem is still Milim.

Next, would be that against the rampaging Vega, Karion alone doesn't have enough to clinch the victory.

Then it’s Ruminas' pinch, from Dagruel's betrayal.

Finally we’ve got to handle reinforcements for Leon.

Would be how it looks.

Also, regarding Leon's case, I won't butt in unless he calls for help.

Though I kinda feel bad for Leon, even if "El Dorado" falls, it's not going to affect the other sides. The destruction of a city in that remote a location, among the many that exist, isn't going to affect an overall victory.

The exception, is if by any chance Leon is defeated, I would want to mount a counteroffensive against Kagali. Co-op with Leon would be the ideal situation though....

Even if I don't make a move, since he's Leon's ally, Guy's forces would move in to assist, that was Ciel's prediction.

It doesn't look like the angel army is moving to attack Guy's side anyways, with Misery as the commander, his forces will move to Leon's aid.

This looks like the best choice.

Guy has his own information network. So he definitely knows that his ally is in danger.

With a powerful army comprised of thousands of Greater Demons[estimated A rank], I'd want to believe that they can close the gap in numbers.

I'll be leaving Leon's problem to Guy for now, until there's a call for help I'm going to leave him be.

「What shall be our move, Rimuru-sama? If we are to stop Milim-sama, we will need to send a large portion of our forces....」

Benimaru asked.

I cut off Thought Acceleration, and put my conclusion into words.

「Although that's also important, you've noticed haven't you?

Dagruel's betrayal――」

「Yes....」

「Eh!?」

「....」

「「!?」」

Benimaru and Diablo, have noticed as expected, while the remainder don't seem to have noticed.

There was a wave of unrest in the command room.

Well, this isn't surprising. Considering that our greatest asset, one pillar among the demon lords, has betrayed us, it's normal to be disturbed by such news.

Though it's important to stop Milim, this was also a problem that couldn't be left unattended to.

「Luckily, they have yet to make their move.

Therefore, we will be sending reinforcements to Ruminas via the Transit Gate, while contacting her at the same time.

The ones to be dispatched are....」

The question is, who should I be sending.

Whoever I send will be up against an army, so someone who can handle such situations. My choice should be――

「Rimuru-sama! I would like to make a selfish request――

Please, send me out to the battlefield!!」

Shion stood up, and spoke her piece while looking straight at me.

Is the responsibility of being the guardian for Dagruel's sons a part of this?

《There should be no problems》

(But, isn't there a chance the sons would betray us too?)

《The possibility is actually fairly low.

Except, it would be unwise to send only Shion. I'd suggest sending Adalman and Albert along too.》

I too, thought of sending Adalman as they'll be up against large numbers of enemies.

He seems to be research buddies with Ruminas too, they should have fairly friendly relations.

There shouldn't be any problems so long as Zegion is in the labyrinth.

「Alright, Shion. Go for it.

You're bringing your squad along with you right? Don't get complacent.」

「Hahah! Many thanks!」

Shion vacated her position in high spirits, gave me a bow and left the room.

I don't think Shion can stand up against Dagruel as she is now. But, with support from Ruminas, her Immortal properties can be put to good use.

With Ruminas' 『Day and Night Inversion』, and Adalman's 『Holy-Demonic Inversion』.

They'll be able to handle the giant army which has many different elemental specialists.

「Adalman, you're heading out too.

Though you'll be leaving the labyrinth, go forth and assist Shion and Ruminas!」

「Understood!! As one who was granted life, I feel nothing but gratitude.

I shall definitely show that I am able to meet your expectations!!」

Adalman took off, with Albert and Wenti in tow.

Using the Dead Spirit series of summoning magic, he is capable of summoning undead knights within his labyrinth territory, he can easily whip out a dependable mobile force.

Albert also looks to have gotten used to his Gods class equipment, while Wenti was all excited as it has been awhile since she had the chance to rampage in the outside world.

For now, let's see what happens with such measures.

Next, to choose who is going to be Vega's opponent.

Let's not think about getting rid of him for now, we need to send reinforcements soon, else Milim's forces are gonna take massive casualties.

It looks like Karion has been sent to face him, but it's going to be tough for him alone.

「Now then, as for who is going to help out Karion who is facing Vega....

I'm thinking of sending Gobuta.

Your thoughts, Ranga.」

「(hngh)! Master, does that mean, that it's ok for me to head out too?」

「Ahh, that's right.」

「!! Gobuta is a genius. Our synchro rate, has already reached over 80%.

If we were to gain combat experience with a superior foe, he is definitely going to grasp the knack(for their synchro) in no time!」

As expected of Gobuta.

He's getting praised a whole lot. More like, the Goblin Genius, how's that?

Ranga was wagging his tail, looks like he's looking forward to getting some of the action.

Though it looks like he's exaggerating somewhat because he wants to head out too, his words are true to a certain extent.

I shall believe him then.

「Alright. If it's Gobuta, he can teleport to where Karion is.

Go forth, Ranga! Go, together with Gobuta, and kick that Vega's butt!」

「Understood!!」

At the same time he replied, Ranga disappeared into the shadows.

Ranga's all pumped up about it. What about Gobuta?

He wasn't all too enthusiastic, saying,「Wha-! Why'd you have to choose to fight that scaryasheck fella!!」.

Well, Gobuta'll be fine.

He'll put in the relevant amount of effort. Let's leave it at that for now.

Lastly, our main problem with Milim.

「As for Milim, I'll head out to deal with her.」

The moment I said that, the surroundings became silent.

Well duh. The leader himself is making a move, this is nothing but a bad move under normal circumstances.

But, rather than sending large numbers against Milim, I judged that there was a need for a more flexible response.

Ciel also agrees, as in her calculations, the death of one of my Guardian class followers is a possibility that couldn't be overlooked.

It's not like we're going to face Milim with the intent to kill, but shit can still happen even if we’re only trying to stop her.

This scenario calls for me to step in.

「Kufufufufu. Then, I shall be accompanying Rimuru-sama.

There will be the need to get rid of those annoying bugs(angels) that are flitting around when confronting Milim-sama.」(Diablo)

「And of course, we'll be going too!」(Testa)

「Un! Imma go too」(Ultima)

「Without a doubt」(Carrera)

My most powerful assets, the officers of the Black Numbers, all spoke in unison.

Oh well.

I'll leave the regular Black Numbers members behind then, since I can summon them anytime I want to.

Even if the silver-haired angel who's facing Milim has no attack power whatsoever, there's 4 other angels of the awakened demon lord class too, we can't be getting complacent.

Now that Shion has left for her battle, my "bodyguards" end up being these 4 pillars, doesn't give me much of a choice but to bring them along with me.

Though the situation looking like the enemy's plot to draw me out isn't out of the question, me not moving now is only going to invite an even bigger disaster to follow.

It is imperative to stop Milim from destroying her own country.

Our help would be in vain if she really ends up doing it.

「Also――There's that lower lifeform Vega, who stole my thunder.

If Gobuta doesn't finish him off, I'll need to be there for the finishing touches.」

Carrera declares, while showing an awfully scary smile.

Ahh, he's the one who interrupted her battle with [what was his rank again?] Kondo. I can understand that much.

Guess I can let her move in to "support" Gobuta, after the extra nuisances have been taken care of.

Thinking back, can Gobuta actually win this time?

Though I gave the order because Gobuta was able to get there almost instantly, his synchro rate with Ranga being only 80% is kinda bugging me.

It's not like it would be a definite win at 100%, even with Karion, Gobuta & Ranga, emerging victorious against Vega is going to be a real feat even in Ciel's calculations.

That "man" Vega, just how much has he grown.

He also seems to be absorbing the dead bodies around him, slowly increasing his power.

If we don't get rid of him soon, he can become a real threat to us.

「Alright, it's decided then.

Carrera, you shall head to assist Gobuta and co. after getting rid of those higher class angels.

Diablo, you'll be supporting me. I'll be counting on you all.」

「「Understood!!」」

With this our objectives have been laid down.

「Rimuru, I leave Milim to you!!」

「Ahh, leave it to me!」

To the uneasy Ramiris, I smiled and promised to save Milim.

Against Milim who can be said to be one of the strongest demon lords, half baked actions won't cut it.

If her anger can be suppressed, she'll probably come back to her senses.

But, it's plain suicidal, to try doing that while holding back. It'll only be possible for me to do this.

It's gonna be one heck of a task to keep that easily enraged Milim in check, but i still gotta do it.

「Benimaru, I'm entrusting the rest to you.」

「You can leave the rest to me without worries!」

Command is now passed to Benimaru.

There's also the preparations for the time when demon lord Leon requests for our aid, Benimaru understands what needs to be done.

「On the off chance, Leon comes to us seeking our aid――」

「If that time comes, I'll do something about it. Fret not!」

I'll leave it to him then.

As I hold command over the Black Numbers, I told him to contact me if there ever was the need to.

For this demon army which can move anywhere via teleportation, they need to be ready to move out at a moment's notice.

Even if we were to not take them into account, Tempest still has forces in reserve.

There's Benimaru and Souei.

Zegion and Kumara.

Along with the 4 dragon kings under Ramiris, and Beretta too.

They'll be able to handle any problems, when the need arises.

After handing over command to Benimaru, I headed out with Diablo and the others.

I need to bring Milim back to her senses posthaste.

(Wait for me, Milim! Don't go all out just yet!)

I teleported in great haste, with the objective of bringing Milim back to her senses before it's too late.





Chapter 196: Lion King vs The Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders’ Vega


If you think about it, a strategy where all of the Demon Lords gather in one place and fight the enemy together would never work.

This is because it would be a decision that would disregard the people who have faith in their Demon Lords.

It would be a reliable way if all we wanted was to win the Great war, but if this plan went badly then it could lead to a worse result where the majority of the population would be lost.

If the goal is just defeating Velda, this plan could be considered as the best plan, but it seems that the Octagram cannot ignore one of the Four Fiends who introduced himself as Vega and those who have the same rank as him.

No, it might be difficult even for the Octagram.

If we take on this monster along with all the members, it would end quickly without any problem, but the domain we rule would very likely be ruined if we did so.

That is the reason why Ciel-san said that the Demon Lords won’t give their consent.

Oh well, it isn’t even guaranteed, that if the Octagram stayed together, that the victory would be certain.

Because once we defeated all of them and went around the places that got attacked, with the gate, one by one, the last country would probably be destroyed.

The part that we misread is the mass of the enemy forces.

That is because Ciel made her predictions based on Vega and Kagali from before they absorbed and mastered the power of the seraphim.

The ability of Vega of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders has exceeded Ciel’s expectations.

It is expected that his ability will break through his limit if he continues his rampage on the surface as he is.

In addition, as the number of the Seraphim is unknown, it would be fatal if we can’t predict the force of an enemy who has the strength of awakened Demon Lord class.

Oh well, I expected that there would be at most 10 of them, but currently they still can’t be considered as a threat.

I think that those of my Guardian Lord class, would be able to deal with them perfectly.

The problem is the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders.

Because he said four, there is probably four of them.

Of course they wouldn’t mention Four Fiends if their members are more than four.

That would be great.

By the prediction, Vega and Kagali is confirmed. Another one seems to be Dino, the problem is the last person.

I believe that the last one is probably Dagruel.

Dagruel who is one of the Octagram as well as Ruminas.

I think both of them are equal. But they only became equal because Ruminas had obtained an Ultimate Skill.

Dagruel is a Demon Lord who has an abnormal power. The scale of his powers cannot be understood completely.

If in contest of strength, it is certain that he would overpower Ruminas.

Guessing from Vega’s power, I’m able to expect that Ruminas won’t be able to win against Dagruel.

That’s why I sent over Shion and Adalman, two of the Guardian Lords, but......

I still have this bad feeling that I can’t shake off.

I think that forcing me to fight Milim is not to buy time.

I’m relieved that Benimaru and Zegion will remain in Tempest, but I should not be careless.

In the worst case, I need to prepare to make a move but a slight uneasiness passed through my mind.

The next is that there is a question about Leon’s confidence.

I’m certain that Kagali of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders went towards Leon’s place.

Kagali and Leon also have a connection and I think that Kagali bears a grudge against Leon.

The problem is the extent of Kagali’s power.

Vega’s power exceeds Ruminas’.

When compared to Leon, depending on the situation, I think that Leon would be defeated by Vega too.

Vega has become abnormally strong to such a degree.

If I assume that Kagali, who is on the same rank as Vega, became equally strong as him, Leon’s victory will become questionable.

Before the reinforcement request comes, thinking about some kind of countermeasures sounds good.

I floated in the sky after I teleported and decided to watch the battle on the ground.

Vega is fighting against Karion, but the situation is that Vega is overwhelmingly superior to Karion.

I think there is a need to greatly revise the ability analysis result of the so called Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Vega and Kagali.

As I expected, there is a difference in obtaining information by seeing the fight directly versus from seeing it on the screen.

For caution’s sake, I contacted Guy with telepathy.

I told him the current situation. Next I let him decide what he wants to do, let’s believe that he will move appropriately.

The time when Chloe and Guy meet is soon, let’s have him do what he can currently.

Just like that, when I finished all of the preparations, I calmly began to descend.

It might be making me uneasy by letting other people handle everything, but I should believe in my subordinates.

Using all of the cards I can use, even Ciel says that there is no other better strategies besides that.

Under the present situation, there is nothing else that I can do.

Then I’ll do my work.

The most important task in this place is to eliminate the person who is trying to manipulate Milim.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

At the moment when Rimuru arrived in the sky and gazed down with his eyes.

Karion was in a hopeless battle.

「Guhaahhahahahaha!! Is the power of the Lion King only this much?

It is so weak that I’m speechless!

You don’t even reach my, this Vega-sama’s feet, the true Beast King!

How is it? I might make you a subordinate of mine if you kneel down and beg for your life.」

「Hha! Don’t make fun of me! This Karion has dedicated his loyalty to Milim-sama.

I need not lower my head to be your petty underling!」

「How cheeky.

Just like Milim, you’re just a fang-less pet dog!

Although I would spare your life if you served this great me, Vega-sama…...

You better regret the stupidity of your decision in the next world!」

Vega shouted such.

And a compressed aura bullet of a 50 cm diameter surged up.

‘I can’t receive that’. Karion’s instincts, which could be called super instincts, perceived the danger of the destructive power that aura bullet has.

Even if he promptly evaded it, Vega seems like he will not allow him to do so.

Aiming at Karion, Vega continuously shoots the aura bullets.

「Damn itーーー!!」

As he shouts, Karion put all of his magic power into the deployed Aura Shield in front of him.

Of course, he understands that he would die if it hit him directly. He adds some angle on the Aura Shield with repelling the aura bullets in mind.

Because of Milim’s intensive training, the means of dealing with an enemy who has more destructive and stronger power than him had been hammered into him more than needed.

Rather, he doesn’t have any memories of it stopping no matter how much he shouted for it to stop.

Milim laughed, but she didn’t stop……

The result of that special training saves Karion now.

His magic power is depleted greatly but he has somehow managed to survive. The repelled aura bullets, transforming the surroundings’ terrain with their destructive power.

Karion believes that just the fact that he was able to endure them somehow, is praiseworthy.

Under the cover of the smoke caused by the explosions, he slipped into a newly created crater. He hid himself in the shadow and suppressed his breath.

(Good grief, what the heck is with that power……

If Milim was not my opponent during the combat training, I might already be done for right now ――)

He thought about such things.

At the same time, he remembered his friend who trained together with him.

(Wait! You’ll die-ssu! If you take more than this, you’ll seriously die-ssu!!)

That guy had always been next to him and had yelled that.

And even though that guy said ‘I’m at my limit, it’s impossible’, he kept Karion company until the end of the training while being lively.

(Damn! I’m still okay. I will get laughed at by that guy if I admit my defeat here!)

Karion grinned widely and laughed.

Karion’s power, which had risen greatly as a result of Milim’s training, is clearly shown during the fight.

He remembered Milim’s words, “The most important thing is, don’t die!”.

Just like that, he is now able to understand what Milim said.

When fighting against a stronger opponent, first ascertain the enemy’s strength, then prioritize survival over everything else.

Fortunately, his subordinates seem to have left the vicinity of this area in accordance with his aide’s orders. Afraid of getting involved in the battle, the angels also didn’t approach this area.

Vega didn’t manage the angels in a skillful manner, if he was smart, he would make them surround and annihilate Karion and he would be dead by now.

But Vega hasn’t given any orders to his subordinates because he is confident with his own strength.

(There might be a chance for victory. Anyways, I need to endure. And then, wait for my chanceーー)

Karion doesn’t give up.

He need to draw out the enemy’s forces and expose their power, giving Milim the advantage.

He will leave the rest to Milim, who is the leader.

He was anxious because of what Frey said, but he needs to do what he can do right now with all of his effort.

「Tch! How sly!! You’re just a coward who only has hiding in your brain.

What is with the title ‘Lion King’? Rat is a more appropriate title for a coward like you!!」

「Shut up!

It’s a strategy, strategy. You who are dumb may not be able to understand it!」

Karion shouted back to Vega’s provocation.

He won’t get provoked.

Making use of the echo, Karion used tricks so Vega can’t know where he is.

Baited by the voice, Vega shot a series of magic bullets at the places that had nothing.

Compared to the simple aura bullet from a while ago, the power was higher. The surrounding terrain wasn’t just altered, but hollowed and annihilated.

It seems very unlikely for Karion to be able to endure many of them if he received them directly, because of the power they have.

Vega just threw them without accumulating them, yet they have the power to alter the landscape.

It was more than the kneaded magic bullets. If he face it upright, his magic power will be run out in a moment.

If it goes badly, he fears that he will receive an attack which won’t leave him any chance to recover.

He could feel the pressure in the hand which wield the Byakko-Seiryuu Lance. Because it seemed the situation will become worse if he lost his composure here.

He’s considering using his trump card,『Beastification[1]』.

At the same time of this ability activation, all the damage he received from before that would be completely restored, and all of his energy would also be restored.

Then with the large rise of his fighting power, it’s possible for him to raise the limit of his abilities.

During Milim’s special training, Karion acquired the Unique Skill 『Lion Heart』.

This ability increases his power against a person stronger than him and gives his attacks penetration effect.

And using it together with『Beastification』, results as an Original Skill『Dragon Body[2]』.

An indomitable heart and an unyielding body.

He had acquired a strong and unparalleled power.

However......

(In order to win against this guy, I have no other choice than to use Original Skill『Dragon Body』, but it’s time limit is a mere 10 minutes......)

That’s right.

It is an incomparable ability that can be thought to be an invincible power, but after 10 minutes passes and all of the magic power runs out, the transformation would come undone.

In the current situation, he would be defeated overwhelmingly if he only using Unique Skill『Lion Heart』. Karion wants to refrain from using『Beastification』until he receives a big damage, but once he uses it, he won’t be able to use the Unique Skill『Lion Heart』.

He would be defeated in the case that he doesn’t defeat Vega during the 10 minutes of him using it.

Because without the correction effect against a stronger opponent of Unique Skill『Lion Heart』 he might not be able to fight back with only the strengthening of『Beastification』.

He has confirmed that Vega has a super-regeneration ability.

Is he sure he can win? So long as he doesn’t see Vega’s weakness, he can’t use his trump card. However, losing without fighting back, he judged that he must dodge for it to happen.

「Strategy, strategy you said? Fuhahahahaha, you make me laugh.

A small fry like you should know your place and stop thinking for nothing!!

Well…… It’s easy to kill you, but should I teach you what despair is?

This yours truly hasn’t used any abilities yet. Do you understand what that means?

Because you may not be able to understand it, I will show you.」

Saying as much, Vega put one of his hands to the front.

The corpses which had fallen down to the ground began gathering and uniting, as they transformed into a decaying wicked life-form.

Then, it easily shot down the angels who are flying in the sky, as they became the prey to the life-form which was just born.

This is the moment where a horrifying creature was born into this world.

The wings of raptors[3] grew on the wriggling wicked humanoid form.

However, it lacks the light of intellect in its eyes. Because, in the first place, it has no head. But, it seems to possess『Magic Power Perception』and be able to grasp the surroundings accurately.

If it was named, it should be called an Evil Dragon Beast.

Vega activated the ultimate power that he himself got, the Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』.

「Guhaahhahahahaha!! How is it, this lovely pet of mine!!

It’s a waste to use this kind of fighting power against small fries like you all. All of you should fully enjoy it!!」

Vega laughed loudly.

In total, there were four evil dragon beasts that were born.

They ate the angels and took their power, although they are distorted creatures, their combat ability is high.

「Hey hey…... are you serious…..」

Karion’s super instincts rings an alarm.

His instincts tells him that they might be just as strong as Clayman who was a former Demon Lord just like him.

However, Vega who created such creatures didn’t seem to have his power decreased.

It’s unknown how many of them Vega can create, but they might get increased later. Just like the angels.

The adjutant had splendidly taken command so there were not many casualties and thus it only produced 4 enemies.

(These wicked fiends, I need to quickly annihilate them, how can I let my subordinates see such things!?)

Karion shuddered, their repulsiveness made him nauseous as anger filled his heart. He said something like he had room to spare, and didn’t seem too unwilling.

「Go!! Lure the rat who’s hiding and trying to run!! 」

In accordance to the order, they started acting at a terrific speed.

The ground was kicked, the air fluttered, and the surrounding smoke was blown away.

When it came to this, it was only a matter of time that they would notice Karion, who is hiding in a hollow.

‘Tch!’ so he clicked his tongue. Karion condensing his own magic power and let out a Beast Roar (Beast Magic Particle Cannon) at one of them, which was approaching him from the front.

He judged that if such fiends were mass-produced, if he tried to buy more time, even more distant he will be from his advantageous situation.

It is not the time to be asking for chance.

One of the evil dragon beasts was burnt up by the Beast Roar that Karion let out.

The terrific destructive power of the magic particle cannon didn’t lose it’s might even after burning the evil dragon beast, it continues straight on towards Vega.

It is as Karion planned. As it’s a attack from a blind spot, it will be a direct hit.

However, the distance was slightly too far.

The power was reduced by half at around 300m, so it’s better to shoot it from more of a point-blank range.

As Karion became stronger than before, the beast roar became a perfected, highly effective, special move. So, the distance he is able to shoot from increased, and he can also shorten the preparation time for it’s firing, but the range hasn’t increased.

Right now, the power doesn’t decline until 200m but the power deteriorates no matter what when it reaches the 300m mark.

Even so, there’s no complaint from him as it has improved greatly as a result of the special training but…… it’s unlikely for it to be a telling blow in the current situation.

「Guwaahhahahahaha!! How crafty! Is this your strategy?

Yours truly doesn’t even feel any particular pain or itch from such an attack!!」

While laughing, Vega provoked Karion.

However, the area which received the direct hit suffered a major burn, to say that he didn’t receive damage, it doesn’t seem like it.

「Ha! Don’t pretend to endure it! If it’s painful, you can cry you know?」

Karion dashed quickly while returning the provocation with a provocation.

Towards the second evil dragon beast who notices Karion and was coming closer, he shot a beast roar with his left hand and dealt the killing blow with the Byakko-Seiryuu Lance loaded with kneaded aura.

The evil dragon beast whose stance was broken to evade the beast roar was destroyed without being able to react.

(Next is the other two of them!)

In Karion’s field of vision, he was able to see that two of them were coming together at a run.

If Karion was the apex of a triangle. The two beasts formed the tips of the sides, and Vega was in the center of the base[4].

If he adjusted his position, his special skill would get an even line of fire.

The length of the side is around 100m, Vega is letting his guard down as he was underestimating Karion.

It’s a chance.

(Eureka!![5])

Karion condensed all of his magic power while thanking for the good luck, and refined his demonic fighting aura[6].

While concentrating so that the power wouldn’t leak out, Karion poured it all into his Byakko-Seiryuu Lance. He waited until the demonic fighting aura was refined to its limit, he chose to gather it to the tip of his Byakko-Seiryuu Lance and turned it into a terrific power.

「Uoooooooo!! Take this! Diffusion Roar[7]!!」

The flash divided into nine and ran through.

Each target was to be pierced by three lights. Although it’s power is equal to the single shot Beast Roar, as it was spread out, it was a sure kill attack that shoots through the target from various angles.

The convergence of the three lights slightly exceed the power of the single shot Beast Roar because of its synergy. This is the true special move that Karion created.

「Hha! Serves you right. Because you looked down on someone, you will suffer like this!」

Karion spat those words out towards Vega.

The two evil dragon beasts seemed to be annihilated, but Vega seems to have stopped the attack.

Karion needed to step in to finish him off.

Both Vega’s arms were blown off and his whole body suffered a severe burn, there was also a large hole in both of his flanks.

Normally it would be a fatal wound, but for such a troublesome monster like him, it would be fine, so long as he still has a piece of his cell.

Thinking as much, Karion gathered up his remaining magic power and was going to shoot a Beast Roar as the finisher.

However――

The evil dragon beast which should have been bisected drew near, unnoticed, from Karion’s rear and attacked him.

The evil dragon beast must also have a dreadful regenerative ability.

Give it a little time and it will revive even when bisected into two.

In addition,

「Guhaahhahahahaha!! Did I say it was crafty?

Someone like you are not an opponent for me but……

It was troublesome when you were sneaking and hiding.

I lured you out with me as the decoy!

How is it? This is a strategy you know!!」

Grrrhhh…..!!

Despair struck Karion.

Vega showed a supercilious smile to Karion.

And then, his injuries were restored in but a moment, the traces of the serious injury was nowhere to be found.

From the beginning, he was not hurt.

(Damn it! I was had by this guy……!)

Though it was frustrating, Karion couldn’t help but to admit that Vega’s abilities are far stronger than he expected.

At Karion, who Vega was looking down on like he was looking at trash, he shot a large magic bullet.

He intended to get rid of Karion, without minding the evil dragon beast who was pinning Karion down from behind rear.

The moment the magic bullet was shot, Karion desperately mustered his strength to take evasive action.

He managed to avoided a direct hit, but he did lose the left side of his body.

He is alive, barely.

As Karion is the king of the beastmen, he has a high vitality. He won’t die to this degree.

However, he believes it would be hard to make a comeback from this situation.

(Damn…… is this the end, huh?)

He wanted to think that he would survive till the end, but he doesn’t seem to have any other choice.

The rest he can only gamble for with his last resort.

For the remaining 10 minutes, he will perform his full offensive attack.

‘I have no choice but to fight using my Original Skill 『Dragon Body』.’

He thought so.

All of his injuries will be completely heal and his magic power will be restored too. However, all left is defeat.

But, he will die regardless as things are now, there is no choice but to do it.

Karion resolved himself.

And,

「Don’t underestimate me! I will show you a man’s way of life!!」

So he shouted.

Vega was smirking and making an unpleasant jeer, his eyes were as if he was looking down at a defeated dog.

Such looks filled Karion with anger and he was able to forget the pain.

At the moment he was about to activate his ability,

「Wai~ttt, please wait-ssu! Hero is the one who always comes late-ssu!!」

A stupid voice was heard.

A dear friend of his, who was so out of place to the extent of the ridiculous.

What jumped out of Karion’s shadow is one Hobgoblin.

Without any mistake, it’s his dear friend, he, the genius (best friend) who Karion acknowledges.

That person’s name is Gobuta.

He is the 13th man who can dissolve this critical situation.

* * *

[1] Actually the ability is written as 獣魔人化 (Juu Majin Ka) which can be translate as Beast Majin/Devil Transformation, also 獣魔人 is the race of Karion’s aide which I left as beastman before, also about Milim being the Ultimate Dragonoid from the chapters before it used majin too (Ryuumajin) like the one from Dai no Daibouken. Well majin is a bit hard to translate actually~

Should I keep it as it now or changed them?

Any suggestions are welcome.

[2] Written as 獅子竜身, Dragonic Lion Body but was read as Dragon Body.

[3] No, it’s not the dinosaur one. It’s a term for Bird of Prey, in case someone will misunderstand this.

[4] Illustration for it:

[5] = I got this

[6] Oh kay. It’s Matouki combination of magic power and fighting spirit/aura combined.

If any of you got a better one, please comment.

[7] The Kanji for it’s 拡散獣魔粒子咆, Scattering/Spreading/Diffusion Beast Magic Particle Cannon but read as Diffusion Roar.





Chapter 197: Demon vs Angel


As I was observing the battle between Milim and the Silver Haired Angel from the skies, I began to think that something was amiss.

The Silver Haired Angel is definitely using『Justice King Michael』's "Castle Guard".

Confident that she’ll be unaffected, she guides Milim's attacks into causing damage to the surroundings.

This is a major problem of course. But despite that, visually, the damage caused seems to be less than expected.

(Hey, if Milim were dishing out Full Power Attacks, wouldn't there be far more damage than what we're seeing now?)

《Affirmative. If it was a "real" attack by Milim・Nava, she would reduce her castle to ashes in an instant.

Of the predicted possibilities, the damage may have been reduced from the effects of "Castle Guard".

Or, Milim・Nava still retains her sanity, and is controlling her output.》

Fumu.

So that's it huh.

Although she is emanating waves of anger that are enough to cause the atmosphere to shudder, there were no signs of her unleashing ultra high output attacks.

Only the castle tower was blown away at the start of the battle. It would be best to assume she still hasn't lost her sanity, and is suppressing her rage.

Which is also why,『Justice King Michael』's domination abilities have not been activated.

If Milim were to have totally lost her sanity due to her rage, she would have been dominated almost immediately.

「Diablo!」

「Ha! I am here」

From my summons, Diablo appeared behind me, ready to respond.

Kneeling behind him, were the 3 remaining devil lords.

「Diablo. You guys, go and get rid of the other 4 angels.

After that's done, go defeat Vega.

Though I sent Gobuta, just him alone is kinda worrying.

Also, one of you shall stay and be my support.」

「Understood. We will finish up shortly, and move to support Rimuru-sama!」

The representative Diablo answered, Testarossa and co. also nodded in unison.

Though those angels are on par with awakened demon lords, the demons are the more combat oriented ones among my guardian class followers. It'll be fine to leave this to them.

They are even in numbers, and Diablo is around too. I can believe they’ll succeed.

「I'll leave that to you guys then!」

After saying so, I began flying towards Milim.

As for the ones left behind, they seem to have begun arguing about who is going to be my support, it was fortunate that I didn't notice this.

Whoever won the spot, is really of little importance.

Among the ones who remained, a winner emerged from their "peaceful" discussion.

Diablo showed a gentlemanly smile, as he glares at the others.

Tch! And the like could be heard from the others, but the 3 of them didn't openly protest.

「Kufufufufu. As expected, this went smoothly all thanks to your prudence.」

A highly satisfied Diablo was smiling.

Then, with a glance, he turned his attention to the 4 angels with disinterest.

Velda's minions, 4 of the "Apostles of the End".

They were known as the Executioners(7 Angels of Crucifixion), and were the combat team in charge of close quarters combat.

This time, they were dispatched under Lucia's direct command.

As long as she had "Castle Guard", Lucia's safety is assured. They were around as a form of insurance.

But, their main aim, was to be Lucia's "sword".

The Ultimate Skill『Justice King Michael』has almost no means of directly attacking.

In other words, the Executioners are to be Lucia's hands and feet, weapons for the purpose of destroying enemies.

Michael's will, which has now became Lucia's ego, chose them for this purpose.

Toruneoto, who wields a Warhammer imbued with the lightning element, is a hulking muscular man.

Aria, who wields a Great Axe imbued with the fire element, has the looks of a small framed girl.

Oruca, who wields a Trident imbued with the water element, is a pretty lady with a slim and prim body.

Priscilla, who wields the Nine Tail. An item imbued with the wind element. Is average in build and height, has a prominent large bosom. Though her semi-closed eyes leave an impression, she gives off an "androgynous" air.[1]

The four of them, were calm and composed even when Diablo and co. suddenly appeared.

What that showed, was the confidence of the absolute strongest beings.

Their pride, as beings that have attained the powers of the highest class, Seraphims.

The demons and angels sized each other up, and quietly looked at one another.

「Fumu. We have no time for games. Let's end this quickly.」

The first to speak, was Diablo.

Testa, Ul and Carrera agreed.

「End this quickly, you say? Don't make me laugh puny demons.

There's no way you demons who have restricted evolutions, are able to reach us Seraphims, the highest of the angels.

For us who have been granted the powers of Seraphims from Velda-sama, we are the strongest existences, vastly superior to the mass produced army.

We easily outclass you lot.

Though it seems you bunch have become demon lord class, in the end your evolutions are still incomplete.

You shouldn't be letting your arrogance get to your heads simply because you’ve been upgraded to demon lords from arc demons!」

Toruneoto bellowed.

To his words, Diablo felt something was amiss.

Does the opposing boss Velda, not know that they have reached the Devil Lord class?

This would be a joke, if that was the case. If it was their master Rimuru, he would have identified them in one glance.

Unless....

(Information has not been shared amongst them, that seems to be the case.

Because of his absolute confidence in himself, he was lax in doing a matter as trivial as sharing information.

The ego of the strong, huh.

On that point, Rimuru-sama has his bases covered. As expected. Kufufufufufufu――)

Diablo was thoroughly ecstatic, as he thought of their master, who meticulously worked to set up a network to disseminate and share information, no matter the kind of information.

As his mood has greatly improved, Diablo's eyes turned "gentle", towards the fools before him.

「Hey, Diablo. Why you’re so happy? Didn't we just get dissed by the other side....?」(Ultima)

「Kufufufufu. It's because of such matters, that you still have a ways to go.

Even from the words of those foolish beings, we can pick out points that show us how great our master is.」

「Eh?」

「Ufufufufu. That's right, as expected, you seem to have noticed too, Diablo.」

「Of course, Testarossa. I shall leave those beings in your merciful hands.

If I were to do it, I'd cause them to suffer.... You'd be able to purge them with no such pains.」

「Ara, are you sure about that?」

「Wa- wait a sec! I still don't really get what you two are talking about!?」

「.... What this means, is that Diablo is saying he'll let us have his share.」

Testarossa very kindly, began explaining to Ultima.

About how their master Great Demon Lord Rimuru, puts great faith into his subordinates.

After listening to the explanation, Ultima's eyes sparkled and exclaimed loudly,

「So that's it!! So what you're saying, is that Rimuru-sama is way "higher class" than them!」

Testa nodded satisfied.

Though she also noticed that Ultima's understanding is slightly off, it's not a problem as of now.

As she has reaffirmed the greatness of their master Great Demon Lord Rimuru, it is satisfactory for now.

「Hold up!! What's this bullshit you bunch are spouting!

Haaan? You pathetic demons, do what to us highest class angels?

Purge us without suffering? Don't make me laugh!」

Due to the insulting words from the demons, Aria screamed as she was totally pissed.

She unholstered her Great Axe, a weapon that didn't seem to fit her small build, and assumed a stance while gripping it.

With a burning anger lit in her eyes, while her hair was standing on end.

「It's a taunt. Calm down, Aria.」

The slim beauty Oruca, cut in on Aria while she glared at the demons with her cold eyes.

But, the Trident she was holding had aqua coloured waves swirling about intensely from within.

Though her thoughts were calm, on the inside she was just as furious.

「Ufufufufu. It seems that punishment for some naughty kids is needed from big sis here.」

Priscilla declared with a smile.

Though it wasn't particularly planned, the one sided words from the demons have succeeded in angering the easygoing Priscilla too.

Seeing that his comrades have also been angered, Toruneoto made his move and took a step forward.

Lightning raged across his body, showing his anger for him.

「Well wait up a little. I just had the best idea. You want to hear it don't you?」

Before the angered angels, was Carrera who spoke out without a care for the mood.

「Frankly, I got no interest in you guys at all.

There's that fool named Vega who's rampaging about over at that side, I got some business with him.

So, I'm going pass on you guys as well.」

Speaking as though this has already been accepted, was Carrera's suggestion.

To what Carrera has proposed,

「Ara? Are you sure about that, Carrera?」(Testa)

「Eh!? Then, does that mean we each get two of em?」(Ultima)

Were the jovial responses from Testa and Ul.

In contrast to that,

「Don't be underestimating us, lowly demon filth!!」

「Kill. Imma definitely kill you all!!」

「Fumu, looks like there's no other choice. I shall have to carve the painful truth into your bodies.」

「That just now, it got big sis all fired up.」

The members of the Executioners, were all painted red in anger.

Even among the heavenly armies, they were considered the most powerful existences, as members of the "Apostles of the End", and part of the combat specialized Executioners.

To be looked down upon to this level, was unexpected for them.

Even in their previous life as members under Yuuki's direct command, they were already the most capable members then.

Though they were not part of the rank battles in the empire, they had the confidence to be able to go toe to toe against the Royal Knights.

Having attained the powers of a Seraphim now, each of them have awakened to the Ultimate Skill『Master Weapon[2]』, and are confident that no being that walks the lands could be a worthy foe.

The weapons they each wield, is proof of their abilities.

A weapon said to be more powerful than any physically existing God class weapon. With that pride on the line, they have no intention of giving any quarter to the demons

「We bestow upon you all, death. That, is the wish of our creator, Velda-sama!!」

Together with Toruneoto's battle cry, the other members all moved in unison.

With their weapons on hand, they take their stance.

On the other hand, the demons....

「Awwright, the Axe and Spear for me!」

「Ara, is that so. Well, I don't really mind any of them.」

As though a child picking which toy to have fun with, Ultima voiced out who she intends to face.

She was fine so long as she gets someone to battle against, was Testarossa's reaction.

Though it is their attitude that is angering the angel side thus, this is but the norm for the demons.

「Kufufufufu. Now then, if you girls really get in a pinch, do call for help.

You poor girls will not be abandoned.」

「Like that'd ever happen!」

「Hmm, right. It seems there's a real need to settle things with you some day, Diablo.」

After the brief exchange, Diablo took off towards Rimuru without looking back.

As for Carrera,

「Kay then, I'll be making my move too. There won't be a need to leave your share right?」

「Yea. We'll make do with these fellas here.」(Testa)

「Un! Carrera, if you don't hurry, Gobuta's gonna end up getting all the best stuff ya know?」(Ultima)

「I'm fairly worried about that too. No matter what's said and done, you can't underestimate that guy.」

Carrera nods, while frowning.

Just as Ultima said, her reason for forgoing the angels was because worried Gobuta might end up actually defeating Vega.

Though her thoughts have been slightly revealed, there’s nothing she can do about it for the moment.

Vega has defiled her sacred duel. To Carrera that was something totally unforgivable.

Though it can't be helped if Gobuta really does defeat him, there's the part of her(Carrera) that wants to make him(Vega) pay back in spades for.

For that reason, Carrera left the current area promptly.

Similar to Diablo, she had totally no worries for her colleagues. As the ruling class of the Demons, she had the utmost confidence that victory will not elude them.

And thus――

Testarossa vs Toruneoto & Priscilla

Ultima vs Aria & Oruca

These two battles began.

………

……

…

The victor was decided almost instantly.

Letting his anger propel him, Toruneoto unleashed his most powerful attack『Lightning Bomber』.

But, that location was already under Testarossa's Ultimate Skill『Hell King Belial』's territory.

Lording over life and death, a Death Blade appeared in Testarossa's hand, and Toruneoto was split in two.

The『Lightning Bomber』attack from the War Hammer that was swung down, was caught by Testa's left hand, and was changing into a shining clump of energy.

But, Testa gripped the energy clump without any problems, and mixed in some of her own Magic.

Towards the crumpling remains of Toruneoto,

「You can have this back.」

She tossed that energy, which has turned into Superheated Plasma, with those parting words.

Flashes of light, compression, destruction.

Toruneoto perished, with next to nothing left of his former body.

Having lost her window to attack as Priscilla's timing was off, she was shocked at what happened.

「H-hiii!!」

She let out an involuntary scream.

Impossible. What just happened shouldn't have been possible.

The total Energy levels of both sides, though their Magical and Spiritual Power were of different natures, should have been at similar levels.

Despite that fact, the jarring difference in their battle prowess, just seemed downright absurd.

If there was little difference in total Energy levels, the side with a higher evolution should have the upper hand. Plus, they were battling 2 to 1 in their favour, thoughts of defeat never crossed their minds.

Priscilla's judgement of the situation was flipped over instantly.

In an overpowering display by the woman before her.

「Ara, what's wrong? Do come at me too.

I shall be your "gentle" opponent.」

The demon named Testarossa, slowly walked towards Priscilla, with a smile on her face.

「S-stop! Don't come any closer!! Big sis here apologizes. I'm apologizing alright?!」

「Ara? Weren't you the one who said something about punishment for bad kids?」

「I'm sorry, it was improper on my part!! Big sis here, was getting ahead of herself!![3]」

As Priscilla became frenzied, she broke down sobbing and screamed.

Her fighting spirit was broken at light speed.

One's calm thoughts halt in the face of monsters of unimaginable proportions.

Toruneoto was a reliable companion. He would be the one standing at the frontlines, giving his allies the support of a unyielding shield, no matter what kind of battle it was.

Even he, who was already so reliable, attained an "Angel's power", and has supposedly became incomparable to his past self....

Priscilla herself was no slouch and showed pride as one who is capable, but even she herself has noticed that she wasn't able to match Toruneoto, even if she battled with everything she had.

That strong companion Toruneoto, was insta-killed without any proper retaliation, right in front of her; it wasn't surprising Priscilla would fall into a state of panic.

「Ara ara. This makes it look like I'm bullying you doesn't it.

Now now, I promised to finish you all without suffering did I not?

It's really okay to be more reassured.」

At that moment, Priscilla could be considered lucky, as Testarossa was in a really good mood.

「P-please forgive me!! I promise to not go against your greatness anymore!

If you let me go, I'll give you anything, anything other than my life!!」

She looks down on Priscilla, who was truly begging for her life, sunk by her own fear; and made her decision.

「In that case, I'll take it then. Your "Angel's power", that is.

I shall let you go, in exchange for that.

Your emotions of fear, are absolutely delectable too.」

As amazingly rare as it is, Testarossa let Priscilla go, as she herself said.

What that showed, was simply her not dirtying her own hands, and couldn't care less whatever happened to Priscilla after this.

(The power of a Seraphim, this might turn out to be useful for Rimuru-sama.)

Having decided as such, she robs Priscilla of her "Angel's power", and left her be.

What was unexpected for Testa, was that she ended up getting the Ultimate Skill『Master Weapon』, which was supposed to be part of the "Angel's power".

The skill was then unified into『Hell King Belial』, and becomes the base for her to materialize a "Death Whip".

For Testarossa, who conducts herself as though a "Queen", this weapon was a great fit for her.

And so, the battle of, Testarossa vs Toruneoto & Priscilla, came to its end.

Priscilla was inelegantly crawling away, and left the battlefield.

At that time, what was unlucky for Priscilla, was her choice to meet up with Vega.

Now that she has lost her powers, she has decided on a course of action that could give her protection. Sadly, Vega was giving his attention to his battle, and checking who was his allies or enemies was the least of his priorities.

The result, was that Priscilla ended up getting devoured by Vega and perished, but that was something that was unrelated Testarossa's actions.

Similarly for Ultima, her battle ended quick and easy.

Using one hand to parry away Aria's flame clad Great Axe, she pierced Aria with a Bloody Bite.

That attack alone was fatal, and Aria perishes.

Oruca, who was shocked at what happened, lost sight of Ultima for a brief moment, and then suddenly from behind her,

「And, done!!」

Was what she heard.

At the same time, she felt a burning pain in her chest,

(Wha-? Eh!? Just when did she....!?)

And that, was Oruca's last thoughts.

The 2 of them, were slaughtered by the little girl Ultima, unable to even retaliate.

As there was no conversation whatsoever, she finished up even faster than Testarossa did.

For the 2 of them who were killed, having died without feeling any pain or fear could be said to be the only silver lining, if you could call it one.

Ultima unintentionally ended up doing what Diablo wanted.

The battle of, Ultima vs Aria & Oruca, ended near instantly after it began.

Moments later.

「Ya know, those fellas, weren't they too weak despite their Energy levels?」

「You're right. But, all this has been expected by Rimuru-sama.

Just having attained power, doesn't mean much as it is. We have just experienced that ourselves.

The thought that Angels would become more proficient given the time, is likely to be true.

.... But, just how much time that would take, is another matter altogether.」

「I know right! The difference between us and them can't be bridged that easily, coz we lived real long and got lots of experience!」

Such was the conversation between the two.

As predicted by Ciel, angels begin their growth after gaining their lost ego.

But, expectedly, tangible growth in short periods of time is impossible.

Even if they do gain human-like levels of ego, there will always be limits to individual souls.

Plus, the level of experience, would almost always pale in comparison to the demons.

The soul of a mere mortal, would never be able to bring out the true power of an angel, much less the highest Seraphim.

If it were at least a Saint, who has gained a fair amount of experience from being a mortal, then things would have been different....

Thus, the demons' battles end, Testa and Ul then began moving towards the next objective of defeating Vega.

* * *

[1] TN (Sushi): why'd the author describe her so much lol

[2] Guro: this chapter give us how to read the skill name, Kanji is Weapon Lord.

[3] TN (Sushi): imagines dogeza





Chapter 198: Gobuta & Karion vs The Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders’ Vega


“I’m going to die-ssu! That one just now was considerably dangerous you know-ssu!!”

Karion let out a deep sigh while sending a sidelong glance at Gobuta who was running, trying to escape while screaming.

‘This guy, he’s clearly doing it intentionally!’ so Karion thought, as Gobuta repeatedly evaded Vega’s attacks at the last moment.

Yes certainly, if he was late by one beat, Gobuta would be hit by the magic bullets and die. There’s no doubt about it.

But, that’s only the case if he’s hit.

『Karion-san, take a half step to the right, and then jump slightly-ssu!』

Karion receives Gobuta’s instructions and followed them without hesitation.

He carried it out obediently without asking questions. This action hasn’t changed since the their special training with Milim.

Soon after moving according to those instructions, magic bullets hit the spot he was standing before, and the ground was gouged out by the magic bullets which bombarded his feet. Thankfully, there was no effect on Karion as he moved according to Gobuta’s instructions.

(As I expected, this guy is really a genius)

Karion cannot see it.

Even the aura bullet from before came flying faster than the speed of sound. The magic bullet was much quicker after being shot, despite it needing some time to knead magic power into the aura.

Evading them with sight is difficult. Karion thought not just that it might be impossible to dodge himself, but even more to give instructions to other people.

If was communicated using voice, then it would be impossible. Because before someone understood the content of the instructions, they would’ve received a direct hit from the attack.

That’s why Karion and Gobuta converse with『Telepathy』but......

How fast does someone have to think to be able to see through the enemy’s attack, movement, ascertain the kind of attack being used, then predicting the timing and the location of impact.

Karion was interested in how far Gobuta had forseen, as he could barely respond with super instinct ability that was beyond his imagination.

He remember the conversation happened when Gobuta arrived a little while ago.

「Karion-san, it will be bad if you are still like that-ssu. Can’t you use『Beastification[1]』just for a moment and immediately cancel it-ssu?」

He said such a thing.

Karion understood that he was in a dangerous situation as he more or less lost half of his body. However, he couldn’t understand the meaning of Gobuta’s words.

「Huh? You, what are you saying……?」

「It’s easy, you know-ssu. You just need to activate『Beastification』 and immediately tell your mind to cancel it-ssu!」

Although he didn’t understand the meaning, he carried it out just as Gobuta had said.

Because Gobuta is his bestie, he did it and matched Gobuta’s timing.

And then, an unbelievable thing happened.

In a moment, his ability rose tremendously and his body regenerated due to the effect of super restoration.

And, he should have transformed, but 『Beastification』 didn’t activated because he cancelled it.

In other words, only the recovery effect was activated. With the added bonus of his energy recovering about half by taking in the surroundings’ magic essence.

(Haaaaaa!? What the hell is this!!)

Karion was astonished.

He didn’t clearly understand what happened, but was certain he was able to recover while keeping『Beastification』.

「Wow, as expected from Karion-san, you’re able to do it in one try-ssu!

In case you failed I had a Full Potion-ssu, but with potions-su your energy wouldn’t restore right-ssu.

How is it, convenient right? I also taught this to Gabil-san, I’m overjoyed-ssu!」

Gobuta said those words.

In other words, it’s possible for people who possess transformation type abilities to receive the complete recovery effect by canceling the transformation at the right time.

‘How can you know this without a transformation ability!!’ so Karion wanted to ask Gobuta, but he needed to act rationally now and strongly endured it.

Anyway, right now it’s time for him to defeat Vega.

(Actually, that guy looks like a bad joke……)

While Karion thought so, he kept avoiding Vega’s attacks by following Gobutas’ instructions.

Vega felt that he had never before been made a fool by a Hobgoblin, who impudently came to support his opponent.

It’s so weak to the extent that it would die if I hit it with one bullet.

His opponent is only a small and weak devil class with a meager amount of magic power whose barely surpass A rank.

His attacks couldn’t hit this opponent.

(Shit! Stop messing around!!)

He violently throws out the aura bullets without refining them against the ground.

The aura bullets explode on the ground, blowing the earth and sand to the sky.

(Humph! With this I’ve deprived them of their sight. You insolent trash!!)

Hidden by the raised dust, Vega molds an extra-large magic bullet. And then, against his targets who have their sight deprived from them, he releases his sure kill attack.

The large magic bullet goes on while blowing away the dust.

However, he notices that the presence of his targets disappeared right before the large magic bullet hit them.

（――！？）

Vega’s question was answered by a short sword stabbing his flank.

「Waa! It’s so tough-ssu. My hand that tried to stab him became numb-ssu!」

That damn impudent goblin seems to have sensed the place where magic power was refined beyond the blockage of the dust and at the same time tried to stop it.

Gobuta didn’t immediately utilize the smokescreen and attack. Instead, he completely suppressed his presence and slipped into Vega’s bosom under the cover of the earth and sand.

「Don’t make fun of me, you lowly goblin!!」

Vega who’s enraged, shouts so.

But, Gobuta without panicking,

「Ooh, you have mistaken-ssu. I’m a Hobgoblin-ssu!」

So, Gobuta corrected Vega’s statement in a cheerful manner.

Vega’s mind is boiling with anger due to Gobuta making fun of him

But, that state of mind is a reaction that Gobuta expected...... Karion who had been forgotten by Vega, who can’t think straight because of anger, is getting closer to Vega while suppressing his presence.

Then,

「Die, Beast Roar!」

Vega who nearly attacked Gobuta at that moment received a direct hit from Karion without being able to react.

Gobuta splendidly made Vega dance in his palm.

It’s a deadly blow from the Lion King Karion, not just surface-grazing power. Half of Vega’s body had been blown off by the magic particle cannon.

However, even in such conditions, this isn’t a serious problem for Vega.

Because his auto-recovery ability activates immediately, his body simply starts regenerating.

The problem was the inferior race, a hobgoblin, who was currently leading him around by the nose for no good.

「Damnnnnn!! I will not forgive this, you inferior insect trashhhh!!」

So Vega shouted.

He’s already wanting to smash it with all of his power.

His eyes burn with anger, there’s no longer any fragment of his pride to prevent him from doing things seriously, or make him underestimate weak opponents.

Vega, for the first time, recognized Gobuta as his opponent.

At the same time Vega recognized Gobuta as an enemy, he regained his calm train of thought.

He changed his thoughts, ‘If it was an enemy he himself recognized then he was not made a fool of, it’s just a great opponent’.

「Kukkuku. Is that so? That’s right. Yours truly wouldn’t have much trouble against a mere goblin.

You’re pretending to be a goblin, but you’re not actually an ordinary one, something like that right?!」

Vega revealed a thought that he himself agreed with, while laughing.

Karion looked on with eyes that said ‘What is this guy talking about?” and ignored him, Vega then continues.

「But…… Yours truly doesn’t have a bad eyes. Your true abilities have been seen through easily!!

Well now! You should reveal your true colors quickly! Yours truly will destroy you!!」

Saying so, he pointed his finger at Gobuta.

To Vega, who said such a thing,

「Huu, good grief-ssu. If it’s been seen through then there’s no other choice-ssu.

Okay-ssu. I will show you-ssu! My true form!!」

Gobuta’s playing along well.

And while acting like that,

『Well then, without any delay. Karion-san, get behind him and fire another one-ssu!』

Gobuta gave out the most cowardly instructions to Karion.

Even so, Karion didn’t have any reason to object to it.

He left Gobuta, who was saying his catchphrase and for some reason taking a strange pose, to sneak around behind Vega.

「 “Star Lord” Ranga, it’s your turn-ssu! Activated『Star Wolf Summon』!!

『Right now-ssu!!』

See this carefully! “Transform”!!」

Gobuta shouts, and in an instant, Ranga jumps out of the shadow.

(Well well, I’m tired of waiting you know, Gobuta)

(Well~ it takes time to reach the climax you know-ssu!)

Vega hadn’t imagined such exchanges happening.

Vega looked at Gobuta, with a surprised and delighted expression, as Gobuta was wrapped in light and the appearance of a huge amount of magic power was fused with him.

Karion, who had done with his preparations, fired out a Beast Roar at Vega’s back.

Alas, it has no effect on Vega even though he had already been hit by it many times. Even the holes in his body got healed in an instant.

He shoots it with the maximum power, but even the 1 decimeter wide flash didn’t seem to burn Vega completely.

It’d be the same even if he did it with Diffusion Roar.

He’s able to understand that the result wouldn’t change, even if 9 magic particle cannons were fired at the same time, it wouldn’t stop Vega from recovering.

He understood it now.

Vega wasn’t really doing things seriously.

Karion shot his technique according to Gobuta’s instructions, Vega already received more than three direct hits as he was careless due to the smokescreen and his aura bullets.

Thanks to that, Karion’s energy was about to run out. Because the timing for the skill he learnt a while ago was difficult, restoration wasn’t an option, it has a low success rate so it can’t be expected much.

Above all,

「It cannot be used many times-ssu. Because it is absorbing the magic essence from the surroundings-ssu, the concentration of the magic essence will get thinner and eventually the restoration won’t happen-ssu.

If someone powerful like Rimuru-sama or Veldora-san did it, who have much of their own magic power, such worry is not needed…..」

Because of that.

Karion could certainly understand that it’s not a technique that could be abused.

Meanwhile, what’s the purpose of attacking so many times while knowing that it’s useless?

At first even Karion questioned it, he was able to understand the purpose a bit now.

Vega was looking down on them and never going seriously. With that, his weaknesses can be analyzed by attacking him from various angles and positions.

And Gobuta wonderfully provoked the self-conceit Vega by showing off that weakness and taking the role as the decoy.

(Splendid, As expected of Gobuta……

If we used full power from the start, then we wouldn’t have been able to draw information smoothly up to now……)

Karion praises Gobuta’s strategy honestly.

But, the result was only this dangerous feeling he got, that was, Vega didn’t have a weakness.

Vega had taken root in the ground and absorbed the nourishment from it.

And he’d take in the organic matters such as corpses and plants to made up his body. The only saving grace was how it seems he’s unable to use inorganic substance for his body.

The battlefield continued spreading, and so new corpses are being mass-produced on the ground.

It was possible for Vega to restore his body near limitlessly.

Karion bit his mouth and thought unpleasantly, as he saw that the wound he just gave to Vega was quickly restored.

However, in front of Karion and Vega, the light which came from Gobuta became jet black fog that was cladding Gobuta inside it.

‘Transform!’ so Gobuta’s voice reached Karion’s ears.

Then――

What appeared was the figure that Karion had witnessed several times during their special training before.

This is the combined state of Gobuta and the Black Storm Star Wolf, Ranga, in this form Gobuta has energy levels comparable to an awakened Demon Lord[2].

In other words, gathering the information was done. From now on, it was the real performance.

『Karion-san, please move back and refine your aura-ssu!

I request one big shot-ssu, on my signal!』

『But, I’m already out of energy.

Unfortunately, I can’t shoot anymore……』

『What are you saying! You still have『Dragon Body』don’t you-ssu?

With that, please pour all your magic power in that one shot–ssu!』

Karion steels himself.

It’s his trump card, but it will not mean anything if he didn’t use it.

If not right now, then when will he use it?

『Understood. I will use it, but it only has a 10 minute duration, is that good?』

『Ehh!? Wasn’t it 3 minutes before-ssu!? As expected from you-ssu!

But, I intend to end this battle with a huge one.

Don’t worry about what happens later, let’s go with a bang-ssu!』

Gobuta, cheery to the end, said it with a carefree tone like he wasn’t worried about anything at all.

Karion can’t help but smile wryly to Gobuta’s cheerfulness, which blew away even his worries.

『Gotcha. I’ll leave it to you!!』

The conversation ended with Karion’s reply as the last.

And with Vega, who became serious, Gobuta’s true battle has begun.

A Vega who became serious, was strong.

「Guhaahhahahaha!!

For yours truly to play seriously, you should feel honored!」

「Ehhh, that’s my line-ssu!!」

Both of them clashed.

With just that, they made the surroundings’ air vibrate and made explosions occur.

It’s a clash of pure energy

It was an exchange of supernatural powers beyond Karion’s imagination.

Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』 possessed the ability to manipulate organic matter.

He constitutes his body with an aggregation of very small bacteria. Thus, he can freely regenerate himself.

Even acquiring new abilities by predation thanks to imitating the structure of his prey, this he can freely use too.

He was an existence that should be called an Imitation Slime (Pseudo-Artificial man-made Slime) which Yuuki created.

He had taken the characteristic of various creatures and added improvements to the original, allowing him to use it efficiently.

What he let out on the surface was only a small part of him which transformed into a humanoid form, while his main body stays hidden.

In other words, beyond what’s standing on the surface, everything is connected to the ground, so it’s possible to replenish himself without limit.

And, not only his detached kin whom he give a simple order like the evil dragon beasts from before, he can create several clones of himself.

His clones have all of his abilities.

But, because there’s a limit to his ability to control a person, they have the weakness that they can’t perform a complicated action even if he commanded them at the same time.

Vega knew this well, so he was only using the ability to regenerate himself and stopped making evil dragon beasts which could only take simple orders.

However, this usage of the ability didn’t make use of the true capabilities of『Evil Dragon Beast Azi Dahaka』.

Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Beast Azi Dahaka』

　　…Thought Acceleration, Parallel Thought, Organic Matter Control

Duplication Mass Produce, Ability Absorption, Space Control, Multidimensional Barrier.

Those are the full contents of this ability.

A dreadful ability, with very high performance .

It was an ability that could be strengthened to the utmost if someone could master it.

If someone could master it……

Unfortunately Vega didn’t have many experiences after he was born.

He grew up at a dreadful speed and his capability rose, but he didn’t get to master his abilities.

If he was able to master Parallel Thought, he might be able to control two or more main bodies, even if there was a restriction of standing on the surface.

Such threat would be unimaginable, but that was just an assumption.

In the reality, Vega couldn’t master it.

And so, Gobuta saw it through accurately.

He used his own body as a decoy, making Vega careless, and succeed in landing several strikes on Vega.

Knowing the ability of the enemy when fighting with full power; will directly connect to a life or death situation.

Gobuta had been taught that he should use his trump card only after he’s finished analyzing the enemy’s power as much as possible.

―― The combat experience of the absolute master who Gobuta respected, the Great Demon Lord Rimuru, was the proof for this.

As the most senior subordinate, Gobuta always witnessed Rimuru’s fights.

It was carved in his heart, that what was most important, above anything else, was information.

Therefore――

With Karion’s cooperation, He judged that he had gathered enough information.

With Vega’s characteristics, which were informed by Rimuru, and the sensation that he felt when he fought him before.

The answer went out naturally as he compared and matched the details.

The memory and ego seem to transferred to the main body even if the part seen on the surface was erased. His regeneration is near infinite as long as he’s connected with the ground.

But when the temporary main body disappears and disconnected with the ground, there was some time lag that occurred during the memory and consciousness transfer.

In other words, Vega’s true main body is in the ground. No, he thought that there’s a possibility that Vega would not be able to transfer the memory and consciousness if he vanishes at a place separated from the ground.

(What a troublesome opponent-ssu. Even so, he’s not invincible-ssu!)

He finished analyzing most of the enemy’s abilities, Gobuta was convinced of victory.

「Then, I’m going-ssu!!」

He spoke to encourage himself and Ranga, so Gobuta went full power combat mode.

Vega admired the high fighting power of Gobuta.

Much like when he guessed before that this goblin was not an ordinary one, Vega trembled with joy.

Vega was defeated overwhelmingly in a contest of speed.

The power is on par with him, no, it seems to surpass him slightly.

But, Vega was still able to continue thanks to his marvelous recovery power.

He steadily amplifies his power. If he could steal his enemies abilities, his power would rise sharply in an instant.

Therefore, the stronger the enemy is, the stronger he can be.

He was convinced that the Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』that he obtained was certainly the ultimate invincible ability.

「Guhaahahahahaha!! You’re pretty good. As expected from the man recognized by yours truly!」

Gobuta ignored Vega’s praises.

(Ranga-san, be ready for it soon, please your help-ssu!)

(Kukukku. Very well, I understand!)

That is because it’s almost over.

Vega got cocky before he himself recognized the real threat, he now understood that he needed to fight seriously.

And he was correct.

「Vega-san, unfortunately-ssu, it’s my victory-ssu!」

「As if, for a goblin, no I admit that you’re strong and I can’t think of you as a goblin.

But, yours truly is still the strongest, you still have a long way to go――」

「Is that so-ssu? Then, is it okay for those to be your last words-ssu?

Oh yeah, I will correct you once again Vega-san before you die-ssu, I’m a Hobgoblin you know-ssu!」

「――what!?」

Gobuta and Vega locked onto each other.

Vega’s bacteria began its corrosion effect attack and preyed on Gobuta, but all of it was blocked by the Demon Wind Barrier of Ranga which clad Gobuta’s body.

The magic power of the wind has deadly corrosion and decaying effects which destroyed Vega’s bacteria.

Gobuta declared the end to Vega who was irritated he couldn’t eat him.

Immediately after that, Gobuta and Vega soared up into the sky due to the wind’s power.

All the corpses and vegetations on the ground were rolled up to the sky.

It’s the effect of Ranga’s power which allow him to freely manipulate the atmosphere. The ground became a cleared surface due to the corrosion effect of the wind, all of the germs crawling on the ground and all of organic matter were ejected to the sky.

「Yo, you! It, it can’t be, yours truly’s ability is――!?」

「Ohhh, seeing you panic so much, did I hit the bull’s-eye-ssu?」

“Death Heralding Wind” included both “Storm of Destruction” and “Lightning of Destruction”.

「Guoooooooo!! Damn you, stop it!! Stop it right now!!」

Vega shouts, but Gobuta didn’t stop.

Because he has no reason to stop.

「It’s a joke, I only gathering Vega-san’s existence-ssu!」

He lightly gathered up all of organic matter into a big sphere.

A huge black storm sphere is completed, and Vega who is inside is being shredded to small pieces by the blades of wind and by the small thunder balls made of lightning.

He was gave in to flow of the winds.

「Karion-san, are you ready-ssu?」

「Yes, sorry for the wait!『Dragon Body』!!」

At Gobuta’s signal, Karion activated his ability.

And,

「I only need to shoot a huge one at that sphere right?」

「That’s right-ssu, please-ssu!!」

Karion noded.

For the perfect setting, a smile appeared on his lips.

(As expected from Gobuta. I’m really glad that he’s an ally.)

And he poured all of the magic power he refined into his Byakko-Seiryuu Lance.

Then, imagining the figure of his master, Milim.

Her overwhelming destructive power which destroyed the sacred mountain of the Beast Kingdom “Yuurazania”, his homeland, that――

「Stop it, you damn insects!! Stop――」

「Here I go! Eat this!! Dragon Roar!!」

A massive flash of light pierces the black storm ball which Gobuta controls.

The destructive energy is devastating.

It was an ultimate secret technique that Karion invented while thinking of mimicking Milim’s Dragon Nova.

The direct hit of the Dragon Roar set off the small thunder balls inside the black storm sphere with a chain reaction of explosions.

And then, it became one huge explosion sphere.

The super-high temperature of the discharged plasma burnt all of Vega’s bacteria into nothing.

Only a vast empty land remained later.

It was a landslide victory thanks to the combined technique of Gobuta & Karion.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Faraway, where the black storm ball explosion could barely be seen, a person slowly begins to get up.

That person is the Vega who should have been destroyed just now.

「That was dangerous, really dangerous……

But, in the end it’s my victory.

Yours truly still can be stronger. As long as there’s『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』, I’m invincible!!」

Vega smiled with a broad grin and laughed.

While thinking that it was the right decision to have left a clone as an insurance.

It was possible for him to transfer his memory and consciousness at the last second to the clone he had left behind.

He hasn’t been able to master his ability yet, but there’s no doubt that he will become the strongest existence when he finally masters his ability.

That’s right, he believes that even the “Stellar Dragon King” Veldanava would kneel on his feet soon.

「You seemed to enjoy yourself―――― I found you.

It’s as what Rimuru-sama had said.

He thought that a coward like you would surely do this.」

Vega didn’t doubt his evolution or his being the strongest, until he heard a cold voice from behind.

But reality wouldn’t permit him that.

Vega begun to feel himself floating.

It’s too late, when he finally noticed he was up in the air far from the ground.

Vega was already trapped and isolated from the surrounding ground by a huge barrier.

「Die, you lowlife!! “Abyss Annihilation”!!」

Exceeding the explosion from before, the energy of destruction trampled upon the inside of the barrier.

「――Gyaa, pulisuhu shopu――――――」

This honest plead for mercy, the first time in his life Vega had let out, didn’t reach Carrera.

As if she had heard something filthy from a lowlife, Carrera annihilated everything without mercy.

Like this, Vega, one of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, received his complete “death”.

* * *

[1] I’ll go with Beastification for it.

[2] Well, Ranga is a Demon Lord after all XD





Chapter 199: Rimuru Disappearance[1]


After leaving Diablo and Co. behind, I blitzed towards where Milim was.

Milim's furious attacks, rained down upon the silver haired angel.

Each and every one of those attacks were deflected away by the shield of "Castle Guard".

Thinking back, when Rudra used the ability, I don't seem to recall it being able to deflect or reflect attacks....

《It is possible that the ability was originally meant to be a "commander" type skill.

As it was a skill used by someone who didn't need to directly attack, there was no need for that effects.

Chances are, alterations are being made to the skill by that person.

Making changes as required by the situation, you could think of it as something more "flexible" now.》

(Hmm? You mean, she has an ability that’s similar to yours?)

《――mmm.

Though there's no way to say for sure, the possibility that it may be an evolved skill cannot be denied either.》

Fumu.

If it really is an evolved skill then this isn't all too unbelievable.

But if that's the case, the silver haired angel would be the avatar of 『Justice King Michael』's ego.

If Rudra losing control really was caused by intervention from Justice King Michael, this might not be impossible after all.

The problem now, would be how capable it is.

If it had calculation power and freedom that is on par with Ciel, it would make for a pretty nasty opponent to deal with.

(What do you think? Is it an existence on the same level as you?)

《Fu. As if.》

Woah!?

Did Ciel-sensei just totally deny that statement?

Plus, that haughtiness. Makes me wonder where she learned how to show such expressions.

Also she seems to be somehow giving off an air of belittling the opposition. It kinda feels like the aura of some bigshot.

Somehow, that feels mighty reassuring.

Well, I understood what Ciel was trying to say. "Don't lump me in together with 'that'!" would be it.

(Does that mean, you know how to neutralize opponents that have "Castle Guard"?)

I tried probing without expectations,

《Of course. Regarding that, I have put together a plan.》

She nonchalantly replies, quite matter of factly.

I had no words for how amazing she is.

Could it be, that I'm actually kinda unneeded? Though such thoughts ran through the back of my head, that is definitely not the case.

This is where I need to protect my dignity, and humbly accept the facts.

(I wouldn't expect any less. I believed! Always believed you'd easily crack this "Castle Guard" problem!)

Regardless of what I "believed", this was an ability that Velda would have had anyway, which we would be able to overcome by eliminating Velda's underlings. That was what I thought anyway.... At this point, it's not much of an issue now.

Since we can neutralize her, it's a good idea to quickly restrain that silver haired angel.

Trusting Ciel, I went ahead and landed right in front of the silver haired angel, a.k.a Lucia.

At the moment I stood before her, she turned her attention to me.

Showing perfect composure, even while she's being attacked by Milim.

「My my, if it isn't demon lord Rimuru. I have been notified of your existence.

The fool who dares oppose Velda-sama.

Also, the nuisance of a demon lord, who dares to get in my way.」

「Hmm? That's an honour. Now then, just what are you?

An angel, or.... Justice King Michael's ego?」

It was fine if she didn't answer, I only asked as a "formality" of sorts.

It was on the level of getting some information, depending on how she reacts.

「Seems like a self introduction would be proper.

I, I am the one who has been bestowed the name "Lucia" from Velda-sama.

As you have guessed, I was borne from Ultimate Skill『Justice King Michael』.

Perhaps you would understand if I were to call myself "Manas"....

Let's just say, an ultimate existence of sorts.」

She showed a mysterious smile from her beautiful face, as she said her piece.

So the silver haired angel's identity, is Manas: Lucia.

But Manas, huh....

I was honestly surprised, that Manas other than Ciel-sensei were born.

《This is unpleasant. So this is the emotion of "displeasure".》

Ciel mumbled, seemingly in a bad mood.

Maybe she is feeling unhappy about the fact that there is another existence which could possibly be equal to herself.

But looking at her, she's really starting to understand how emotions work now. I guess this is something amazing, but I don't really get the point.

Well, there's no doubt it would be pretty amusing to have a conversation with her now.

Just as I was thinking that,

《How dare she look down on Master, that lowly Manas!》

That's what you're concerned about!?

I almost took a jab at her out of reflex there.

Also, "that lowly Manas", aren't you one yourself!?

She seems to be ignoring that fact, and feels like she has passed the point of being displeased to being fairly pissed, at Lucia.

「Lucia, huh. So, what are you up to?

Are you enraging Milim, so as to dominate her?」

「Fufufu, so you have the minimal ability to understand that much.

That is exactly it. Milim-sama, is the great Velda-sama's daughter.

After the destruction of the world with her "cooperation", she is the being most suited to become the "Mother of the New World"!

For that purpose, her trifle memories are unneeded.

Those filthy memories of this world, should be returned to nothingness.

And you, are the greatest representative of this "filth". An existence that should be cleansed.

I should give you credit though, for noticing what was happening here.

But, it is already too late.

――this should be about enough now.

Time for you to perish, vile demon lord.

Destroy that demon lord, Milim-sama! Regalia Dominion!!」

Fumu.

So that, really was what they were aiming for. Just as predicted by Ciel.

Milim, who was clobbering Lucia's "Castle Guard" with fists enchanted with unreal amounts of magic, took a direct hit from "King's Rule" and froze in place.

――or so that's what it looked like.

(Hey, isn't that just an act?)

《No doubts about that. From what has been analyzed earlier, Milim・Nava is still in total control of her emotions.》

Though it looks pretty realistic, it's kinda obvious that it's all an act.

She looked pretty happy when she saw me too, she also removed the Dragon Knuckles that I gave her as a present, so as not to damage them....

The best evidence, would be that if she really has lost her sanity, she'd attack us too without provocation, which hasn't happened at all.

On that point, she's a really bad actor.

Though she seems really confident that she hasn't been found out, that's still pretty naive for her.

But, this is where I should play along with her ploy.

「Ge, geh!! Milim just got dominated!!」

《....that, is just too exaggerated, Master――》

I got penalized by Ciel for that.

Seems like I'm not much of a better actor myself.

Seeing as I was going to have to deal with someone who had inherited Justice King Michael's abilities anyway, I went ahead and prepared some measures against domination type abilities beforehand.

Which naturally, has been disseminated to not just Milim, but all of the other demon lords as well.

This is pretty obvious already, as this ain't a game of chess we're playing here, having our fallen allies become enemies is really annoying to deal with.

As a countermeasure, I went and got Guy to teach us the『Mind Power』technique.

What this『Mind Power』does, is that it simply lets us awakened demon lord class beings resist abilities such as "King's Rule" as long as the being in question isn't under heavy pressure; this even has Ciel's seal of approval.

This technique has an almost equal level of performance as Ciel's “Mind Protect”.

That was why, if it was under normal circumstances there wouldn't even be a need to worry.... But if Milim really did lose her sanity, things would obviously be different.

Here I was expecting the worst and hurried over.

Only to be needlessly worrying myself.

It seems like Milim has a plan of some sort, and I’ve no need to worry that she's going to fall under the control of "King's Rule".

I'll listen to what she is planning to do later, time to decide how to deal with Lucia.

Ciel did say she has a plan to get around that "Castle Guard", seems like things will end without too much trouble.

Those were my intentions when I began "hostilities" with Milim....

But that Milim, came at me for real. As I could see she was grinning, I knew that she was doing this purposefully.

She may have wanted to fight me for real.

How "troublesome" this has become.

Milim drew her sword, and began her assault unto me, I too drew my katana and received her attack.

Sparks flew as we furiously exchanged blows. I couldn't even see her movements in the past, so I was honestly surprised with myself now that I have breathing space.

If it was the old me, I would have been left numb from just receiving a single attack, which would have also greatly drained my stamina.

Now there was no difference in the level of our weapons, and I have simply powered up physically. As expected of a body that is similar to that of a "True Dragon".

I have now become able to battle evenly, even against Milim's absurdly violent strength.

For a bystander looking at us, our furious exchanges would look as though we are going at it seriously.

But, I could tell.

That even Milim hasn't put in any real effort, not yet.

Just as I have one, Milim too, has what you would call a "Magic Generator" that can be used as a Status Booster.

For me, it would be the void energies of『Void God Azathoth』's “Turn Null”. Said energy would be regulated from within the void space, it is then possible to "inject" that energy into my body.

As my body is mostly made up of Magic Essence, that means I would power up if there was more Energy.

It works similarly for Milim.

Having reached a similar level, I now felt like I could understand the secrets to what was previously seen as unreasonable.

Well that should be the gist of it, and as we were battling it out with our techniques....

『Are we connected now, I wonder.... Hey Rimuru, can you hear me?』

I received a telepathic message suddenly.

Seems like, Milim has been trying to establish a “Secret Telepathy” connection with me, all while still in combat with me.

That is another form of telepathic communication, as Milim wasn't connected to me via the "Soul Corridor", she needed to "run a line through" so to speak, if she wanted to use it.

It was also possible with the normal directional telepathic messaging, but the danger of the message being heard by unwanted third parties would increase.

To summarize, if you wanted to make use of “Secret Telepathy”, it would take some time and preparation.

It seems like Milim has been pretty cautious for awhile now, so as not to let her movements be picked up by our enemies.

This is all still under the pretext that she was dominated, and also still very enraged.

『Yep I can hear you. So how long should I keep up with this act of yours?』

『Wahahahaha! As expected of Rimuru, so you noticed.

When you went「Ge,geh!! Milim just got dominated!!」just now, I got real worried that you actually thought I was dominated you know!』

Ouu....

That exaggerated reaction of mine was taken for real it seems.

Looks like I really underestimated how simple Milim is.

『That ain't it! Wasn't it really obvious, and very purposeful!?』

『Eh!? Ah, right. That's right, I totally noticed that yea!

――anyways, enough of that.

Back to business, I got a favor to ask. Frey and her underlings went and got beaten by Lucia's flunkies earlier.

Though I don't think it's anything worrying, can you go tend to them? 』

『Nn? Got it.』

And Milim tried to cover up her "blunder".

I overlooked that with my magnanimous heart.

So, before I arrived, Frey and some guards were defeated. Maybe Milim used that as her "reason" for getting enraged.

They probably aren't as injured as Milim made them out to be, as she had already said.

(Diablo, can you hear me?)

(Yes, Rimuru-sama.)

(Before supporting me, go tend to Frey and co.'s wounds.)

(Then, I shall delegate the task to Testa and the others.

As of now, I have just received the message that the 4 other angels have been dealt with.)

Eh, already? That's way too fast!

Aren't those 4 angels, on par with awakened demon lords....

More like, it's somewhat troubling that I could only think of the awakened demon lord class as a comparison. As I am now, any single awakened demon lord isn't even a threat.

This might just be what Veldora-san's point of view is like. This almost justifies him letting it get to his head, going around picking fights with any other being.

Not like I would go around doing something as childish as that, neither do I need to.

(Is that so, I'll leave that to you then. So, are you heading to my position then?

(Yes. I am by your side, while totally hiding my presence!)

(Alright then, standby as you are for now. Don't be letting that angel Lucia sense your presence.)

(Of course!)

Fumu.

Now that I think about it. Seems like Ciel has noticed his presence, but I don't notice him if I don't concentrate on him.

Guess I should have Diablo standby in case something actually happens.

『Looks like there aren't any problems. I got a report from one of my underlings.』

『Is that so, thanks!』

I gave Milim a reply.

A report from Testa came in, stating Frey and co. are all fine.

As I was communicating with Milim, we were exchanging blows at the same time.

Though it was an exchange between a sword and a katana, we were flying around and really shifting the ground around us. As we were moving around with quite a bit of force, to onlookers it was really flashy.

And towards me, Lucia has been launching magic attacks every so often.

It's obvious she can attack, during the short pauses when "Castle Guard" isn't in use.

Would I be able to make a move on her if I manage to work out the timing?

《Unfortunately, as it works automatically, my prediction would be that the defenses would be prioritized.》

That much was obvious huh.

On that point, she's making more efficient use of the ability than Rudra did.

She's the Manas borne from the actual skill anyway, this much should be nothing for her.

What a troublesome opponent to deal with.

『That angel, she's getting annoying. But, I kinda want to earn her trust somehow.』

『Hah? Why would you need that? She *is* troublesome, but her attacks are being blocked, which is why we're ignoring her right?』

『You know....

She spouted some "Velda is my father, "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava".

I was thinking, I need to dole out some punishment for her insolence.』

Here I was thinking she wanted to get Lucia to lower her guard as she had no means of beating her as is, instead she was thinking of something else altogether.

After hearing the details, she intends to work out the unknown location of our enemy, and defeating "him" instead.

It's true, that in this great war, there isn't much meaning even if we manage to be victorious on all fronts. We still needed to deal with the root of the problem which is Velda.

Even if we did defeat the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders and get the strategic victory, it's still defeat for us if Velda manages to get away.

『I get your point, your aim is to earn Lucia's trust, so you can travel to where Velda is.』

That makes much more sense now.

This was a logical plan, the type that you would expect from Milim. This was why she isn't one to be underestimated.

《There is only one problem with your plan. As we have no idea how powerful Velda is, your safety isn't guaranteed.》

That, was my only concern.

Although Milim is one of the most powerful among us Demon Lords, isn't it still too dangerous for her to head into the heart of enemy territory alone?

『Wahahahaha! Fret not. You can leave it to me to pinpoint the location.

In other words. I'm gonna be a Spy!

I have studied, just for a moment like this! Stop worrying!』

Ahh, thinking back a little, she *was* watching a movie that was somewhat relevant....

It was part of an experiment to crystallize the footage from my memories into a "film"; it was that movie from my memories, the one we extracted then.

Milim was among them, the ones whose eyes were sparkling, which were also glued to the screen watching the story that was filled with riveting spy action[2].

Ahh, she ended up picking up some fairly unneeded knowledge.

But, if you think about it, this is an unexpectedly good plan for our current situation.

It's best to discuss the itty bitty details, and decide on our course of action.

But, before that....

(Ciel, *that* is getting annoying, I want to disable Lucia first.)

《Understood. Then――》

As per Ciel's explanation, I pieced together the relevant abilities in my head.

And then,

「You've been getting really annoying since earlier on, time for you to learn who's in charge here!!」

I intimidated Lucia with something suitable.

Reading the situation, Milim also faked being blown away by a swing from my katana, and entered a state of not getting in my way.

She's doing great there.

Looking down upon Lucia, I thrust my right hand forward.

There was actually no need for this movement, but theatrics are still important.

「Fufufu. You won't be able to penetrate my defenses no matter what you do.

This is where the true worth of "Castle Guard" really lies.」

「Is that so. But, let's see if you can still say the same after receiving this.」

After saying that, I began channeling『Void God Azothoth』's “Turn Null” energies onto my right hand, and maintaining control of it.

This was a lot harder to control that what I previously thought it would be.

This stuff, would cause a massive explosion if i were to release it as it is. This ain't the kind of stuff that's practically usable without Ciel's support.

After seeing the ultra compressed energy mass, there was an obvious change in expression even for Lucia.

Even if she would be unharmed, there was no doubt the remainder of the angels army would get annihilated though.

「You fiend, it's pointless for you to do that!!

Even if you were to turn the surroundings into a wasteland, it won't accomplish anything――」

「Silence, I get to decide if there's a point in doing this.

Now are you done with your prayers before the afterlife? Bye! Offensive Barrier "Eternal Pain"!!」

With the channeled energies, I activated a certain spell combination, shutting the screaming Lucia up.

As experimented from before, activating magic using this energy instead of the normal elemental magic results in multiple times the usual resulting output.

Such a spell, constructed using the ridiculous output of the ‘Turn Null’ energies, headed towards Lucia.

As she had utter confidence in her defenses, this was a major blunder for her.

The spell successfully made contact with Lucia, without any resistance.

Obviously, explosions or other direct forms of damage would not cause even a scratch whatsoever on Lucia.

But.... There was no need to cause damage to Lucia in the first place.

As per Ciel, this is what you would call "a change of perspective".

《There are no doubts that ANY kind of attack would have absolutely no effect.

That ability activates an "Impregnable" effect.

No matter what kind of attack it is, all known effects that cause "damage" would be shut out.

Which means――》

Simply, be it a nuke or poison, regardless of the damage it would inflict, all of that stuff would be blocked.

Even if I made use of『Void God Azothoth』and launched a high output attack, even if it was an attack that could destroy the stars, Lucia would survive in the end.

She would survive even if she was in outer space.

Well, that's also including the fact that she doesn't need to eat or breath as she is an angel which is a spiritual entity, such logic wouldn't work for Rudra who is human.

To sum it up, the fact is, there are no real means to "defeat" her as of now.

But, that doesn't mean there are no loopholes.

"Castle Guard", with its highly reflexive nature, limits the user's actions while active; this can be seen as a demerit of the ability.

For example, "Castle Guard" would activate and defend its user from say a sneak attack when the user is attacking something else, the user's own attack would get cancelled as well during that instance.

To sum it up, "Castle Guard" gets full priority.

So much to the point, that it puts a restriction on even simple movement.

Rudra, was totally restricted on movement when "Castle Guard" was active. But as expected of Lucia, she is capable of walking and simple flight, but that was the limit for her.

So I made use of that property.

I surrounded Lucia, with an offensive barrier that when triggered will constantly attack, limited to within a fixed space.

With my "Space Time Control" ability, fixing the coordinates for the barrier was a piece of cake.

So what happens? When you apply an offensive trigger, within a barrier?

The answer is simple.

Lucia would be restricted where she is, with "Castle Guard" constantly active.

And the space around the barrier is locked as an extra effect, so her movement is also effectively restrained.

With the space time properties added in, the effects would be sustained for a few hundred years. For such a simple barrier, the effects were pretty broken.

Well, a fair amount of energy was poured into the spell.

For me or Veldora, it would be possible to break through such a barrier with brute force if we don't mind taking some damage, but for someone who has "Castle Guard" forcefully activated constantly, this becomes a different story.

Lucia too understands, that if she were to deactivate "Castle Guard", she would no doubt take a concentrated barrage of damage for doing so.

The plan to totally restrain her has succeeded.

It is unknown if she is able to deactivate "Castle Guard" manually or not, but in the event she does deactivate it and break through the offensive barrier "Eternal Pain", I only need to hit her with another even more powerful one.

In terms of determining Lucia's capabilities, this "attack" of mine was an effective one.

Anyway, it looks like Lucia is unable to break out of the offensive barrier "Eternal Pain".

「Fuh! You shall twiddle your thumbs in there alone and in despair, for an eternity!」

I said that, as I struck a cool finishing pose.

That was perfect.

Lucia was screaming something in anger.

But, as she was impeded by the barrier, her voice failed to reach me. My voice too doesn't reach Lucia, so taking advantage of that I taunted her with my pose.

Offensive barrier "Eternal Pain", was a spherical shaped growth enchanted barrier. What that means, is that whenever Lucia's "Castle Guard" makes contact with the barrier, small explosions would occur; the energy generated from the explosions is then re-absorbed into the barrier, and is used for the growth of the barrier to increase its strength.

This was well thought out, a fearsome combination of nasty properties.

Hats off to Ciel there.

《Magnificent! Especially that pose at the end, it was perfect!》

Eh, that part?

Ciel showed no interest in the effects of the barrier or the results, as though they were invisible to her eyes.

And instead, reacted to my taunting pose, showering it with praise.

(Kufufufufu. I expected no less from Rimuru-sama!)

I felt Diablo's praises too telepathically, and he too, had no negative feedback about me.

Though I kinda wanted to be praised for succeeding in activating the spell that Ciel came up with on my first attempt, Ciel notwithstanding, getting praises from Diablo felt a little off too.

It felt like, getting elated from getting praise from someone who is usually very strict, that kind of feeling.

Well, now isn't the time to think of such luxuries. It's not like I know of any such beings who are close to me.

I should be happy for now, that nobody made jabs at me for the 8th grader syndrome-ish pose that I did.

I discreetly, breathed an empty sigh of relief.

So that was how, I succeeded in handily restraining Lucia.

Shortly after, with the addition of Diablo, Milim and the two of us started our discussions.

And of course, that was done while we were still in combat. That was done pretty damned skillfully if I were to say so myself.

While we were doing that, I received word from Carrera telepathically, reporting that Vega got his ass handed to him by Gobuta.

Plus, he did it handily too.

《――! As expected of Gobuta. He really showed his worth as his growth was one of the hardest to predict.

Though I did give him the Unique Skill『Genius(False Wiseman)』, to think he was this capable.》

Ciel gave Gobuta her honest praise.

I really want to question her, as to why she doesn't show such praise for me[3].

And when did she give him the Unique Skill『Genius(False Wiseman)』. And yea, it's a fake[4].

Gobuta and『Genius(False Wiseman)』, it's hard to tell if it actually fits him or not....

Oh well, he *is* a genius of sorts.

I did have a grasp on the abilities of everyone who had training of some form in the labyrinth, there were some parts that were unknown to me as Gobuta did his training in secret.

Even after considering the overall limits, it was predicted that he would have a hard battle with Vega as his opponent.

But then, it's quite the feat, for him to exceed Ciel's predictions as he has.

Even if we assumed he managed to reach his highest potential, the prediction was that he would gain victory, but only marginally; just what is Gobuta made of....

It probably *was* a tough battle. But after considering Gobuta's personality, it may have just "looked" like he managed to get the victory handily.

I shall leave it at that.

Now then, we have come to a decision.

First, I would take my leave from the battlefield, with my "defeat".

(Rimuru, first up is for you to "disappear"!)

As per Milim's words, our plan was finalized.

In other words, a plan where I "play dead".

(Kufufufufu. This is going to cause quite the ruckus!)

Diablo happily snickered.

For some reason, Ciel suggested that we do not relay the information regarding my "death" to my remaining followers.

《This is a prime opportunity, to smoke out the remaining problematic elements who are eluding us.》

That was the reason.

Though I don't think there would be any traitors among my comrades, this is a good opportunity to gain knowledge about the plans of the other demon lords; and according to Ciel, there is a chance of problems arising from the human countries.

Be it the western countries or the empire, we have been forcefully keeping them in check.

There might very well be some who hold discontent against us.

Maybe it's the empire soldiers who I revived, they might cause a rebellion after knowledge of my "death" reaches them.

(Won't this just cause greater confusion?)

Diablo's earlier reaction, was the answer to my amazingly "normal" question.

A cleansing storm would be whipped up, upon the ones who would plan to rebel.

(Also, I kinda feel bad, as I'll be deceiving the others too.)

I said that as I was thinking how I'll be worrying the others,

(Kufufufufu. There won't be any problems. Their happiness when they find out you are alive would be far greater!)

And, my pleas were declined as such.

According to Milim's plan, saving Lucia after dealing with me, would get her the greatest amount of trust.

In addition, it would lure Velda into lowering his guard, making him bolder and more complacent in his moves.

The plan was gleefully accepted by everyone except me.

And thus, a storm of great confusion would engulf the world.

On just the first day of the great war, major changes among the world's factions are about to occur.

* * *

[1] 消失, Kanji used in the title can mean Disappear, Vanish, Missing, Dead, Cease to exist, Extinct, Eliminated and many others.

[2] TN: They be watching some Skyfall I bet lol

[3] TN: Ooh rimuru is jelly huh lol

[4] GN: Rimuru so S





Chapter 200: Each of Their Reactions


At the same time as the strategy was decided, Milim said that she is going to use Dragon Nova, her strongest magic.

Under the cover of the extremely dangerous attack, indeed befitting to be called a mass extinction magic, she told me that she’ll let me go.

She once said that she wanted to show it to me and Ciel also has an interest in it, so I accepted her suggestion......

I thought I was going to die.

No, I’m serious.

I wish that she mentioned what kind of magic it is.

Milim doesn’t boast this as her strongest magic for nothing. I stopped time[1], so I was safe, since I escaped right away, but Diablo was in a terrible situation since he lost half of his body.

Oh dear, he’s acting as if he’s dying, what should I do with him, geez…

I can’t make fun of Milim ever again, I now see her in a new light.

But as the result, Milim made herself more trustworthy towards Lucia.

Milim shot a Dragon Nova and killed the body which was pretending to be me, and retrieved it to Lucia. Then, in order to make her think that I’m dead, I canceled “Eternal Pain” which had ensnared Lucia.

In that way, Milim succeeded in making Lucia trust her as well as infiltrate into the enemy’s stronghold.

As I hid myself, waiting for Milim’s signal, I slipped into the darkness with teleport.

Well then, while staying somewhere calm, I begin to think about various things.

The first is the change in Ciel that I felt a while ago.

About “Eternal pain” too, but I believe that Ciel’s ability has increased greatly.

Yet, I’m more bothered about my miscalculations on Gobuta’s growth limit.

(Hey, don’t you think that Gobuta’s rapid growth is a bit abnormal?

How much has he surpassed your calculations? And, isn’t the calculation deviation too extreme?)

That is the what I’m worried about.

Because up till recently, at the time when I still called her Raphael-sensei, it was rare for her predictions go awry.

I mean, as far as I remember, the only mistake in Raphael-sensei’s calculations was the nature of Veldora’s attack.

And yet, she incorrectly predicted Gobuta’s growth speed, isn’t this disappointing coming from Ciel? No matter how much of a genius Gobuta is, I wasn’t convinced at all.

Because I was so doubtful, I asked Ciel but,

《That is……whilst performing the calculation, deeper information was detected…… as a result, a large deviation has occurred.》

So I was informed.

In other words, since Gobuta’s ability increased so much, conversely the accuracy fell huh.

No, rather than that――

Isn’t the fluctuation happening due to the appearance of her emotions?

――The idea flashed in my mind.

This might not be a good example, but just like when taking a test, the more you check your answer, the more you question yourself.

It is often the case that the first answer will be the correct one.

In other words, what Ciel is feeling is none other than the emotion called “Anxiety”.

A human is a creature who makes mistakes.

Why is that?

It is because a human is an emotional creature.

Machines never make mistakes. Because they never feel anxiety.

If a machine makes a mistake, the cause may be that there was an error during the input of the data or the machine is broken.

As Ciel evolved, she obtained “Emotions”.

It means that a perfect being has fallen into an imperfect state.

Experiencing anxiety, she wavers, and so she made a mistake.

Is this a degeneration?

No.

This’s unmistakably, an evolution.

Ciel, despite being an existence that had reached perfection, wished for emotions.

A baby feels they’re almighty whilst inside their mother’s womb, but they lose that feeling as soon as they are born.

Thus, they feel insecure and cry.

Ciel is the same as the newborn baby.

From a perfect situation, like a perfect sphere, she had been transferred into a bigger container.

The vessel was so big, that her own existence became indeterminate.

Therefore, to fill that container, a large surge of emotion was produced.

But I feel relieved because that container, is me.

The chipped container for her indeterminate form is my soul. And, because Ciel was born inside of me, my heart is stable.

The emotions are like waves, they fill the cracks of my heart and become small.

Ciel was bewildered as she hadn’t produced a wave of emotion before, so it might take time before she becomes used to it, as for me, my uneasiness became tiny as my heart was filled.

In other words, Ciel felt the anxiety in my place.

(It is not a problem, so don’t worry about it. Have confidence in yourself!

You keep on analyzing even while in that state, if it’s you I’m sure you can arrive at the correct answer.

Therefore, believe it.

We complement each other, you’re not alone!)

《Master――》

Ciel remained silent to my words.

However, the waves of emotion became calm as my chipped heart was filled.

Then, Ciel also calmed down as her anxiety changed into relief.

《Yes, my lord! Everything will follow your heart’s desires!》

Ciel properly understood my words.

And while hiding under the cover of darkness, she will be reflecting on her meaning of life.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Velgrind flew into the sky with speed that holds up to the title of fastest. Her body feels light and her power seems to have increased.

With a heavy heart, and a mind that is tangled she thought to herself.

In the first place, what the hell is that person?

She, who is one of the strongest, a “True Dragon”, was unable to so much as scratch him.

An individual with a soul compatible with the dragon’s element and a body that is comparable to the “True Dragons” that stand at the summit of this world.

And that individual, possessing such enormous energy, stood firmly while being capable of absorbing a “True Dragon”.

Moreover, two of them.

Can such a being exist?

No, it must exist. It is undeniable that such a being exists.

However, for it to be a Unique Monster who was born from a collection of magic essences leaked from Veldora, by chance, is impossible.

Even if she looked at herself right now, compared to before, her condition is more optimized and in better shape.

She has a feeling that her energy levels has somehow increased.

So in other words, that slime, who manifested her, has a container that simply surpasses the total amount of her energy.

(I can’t believe it. Such a being…… as far as I know, there’s only one――）

She continued thinking.

While continuing to fly around the continent at high speed.

Her speed reached a dozen times the speed of sound and became a flying object which emitted extreme heat and without aiming to, blew away a flock of angels who crowded the sky.

The soul corridor that bound her, was closed.

There was no influence on her, that means, something happened to the person she bonded to.

But, she didn’t pay attention to that.

(Humph. That person wouldn’t be killed so easily. What is he planing now……)

So, she just fleetingly thought about it.

There is no point in worrying about it.

In the first place, there is no need for her to worry about it, or so she thought.

She is free right now.

Even though she buried it in her deepest thoughts, she was still in a fog of doubt.

She has been caught in the whirlpool of her own thoughts for a while now.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

The report made the executives of Tempest shudder.

On the first day of the Great War, the angels’ attacks had ended and the evening had come.

The monsters had even prepared for an ongoing battle, but the angels had withdrawn by the time night fell.

This is because for the light attributed angels, they had an advantage under the light of the sun.

As there is a need to eat, the loss of the energy is intense.

For the monsters, a short time of peace is a blessing.

Thus, it’s the time for dinner.

The report was brought by the people who returned at the time when the soldiers were taking their rest.

In the control room established inside the labyrinth.

The executives of Tempest, including the Guardian Lords, had gathered.

「Is it true that Rimuru-sama disappeared?」

「Yes…… that is correct.

He received a direct hit of Milim-sama’s Dragon Nova……」

To Benimaru’s question, Testarossa responded.

To that answer, silence descended to the room.

Then Testarossa explained the situation in detail.

「――Then, what did Diablo do? Where did that guy go?」

Benimaru asked while suppressing his anger.

――It is true that Diablo didn’t participate in this meeting.

There was a reason behind this.

Diablo is the only subordinate who knows that Rimuru is alive.

For this reason, Diablo can’t explain why he failed to defend Rimuru even though he was there.

Not seeing the reactions of the executives was regrettable for Diablo, although that isn’t important, he’s concerned with it, anyway this much is necessary to conceal Rimuru’s survival.

That being the case, he decided that it would be a problem if he, who had survived, participated in the conference.

Anyway, “Why didn’t you protect Rimuru-sama?”, he predicted that question would be directed at him.

Diablo figured that if he was in Benimaru and Co’s position, he surely wouldn’t be able to forgive him even if he tore apart Rimuru’s bodyguard.

Because he thought so, he displayed his current state, where he had lost half of his body, to Testarossa and Co who had rushed over at the time.

And whilst healing himself, he departed from the site, (in other words, escaped) leaving behind a message which said that he had left in order to observe Milim.

As for the content, it was something along the lines of,「I lost half of my body and thus shall not prove to be a useful combatant, I will be more useful for observing. 」.

Testa and Co believed Diablo’s explanation without any doubts, since Diablo’s condition displayed that his current energy had decreased sharply.

…… No, Testarossa seemed to doubt him a little, however, she was uncertain about her doubt. Therefore, she decided to accept Diablo’s reasoning.

By the way, what he meant by observation was that the strategy required him to pass information from Milim to Rimuru.

Thus, Diablo continued as Rimuru’s guard whilst under the cover of darkness――

Testarossa let out a sigh and,

「Diablo is performing an infiltration operation.

He expressed regret towards his inability to protect Rimuru-sama, but because he received an order he can’t even commit suicide.

It seems Diablo’s duty is to free Milim-sama from their control.」

She explained the story Diablo had told them.

Although Testa herself thought that it was dubious, it was also more or less coherent. Anyway, she remembered what she heard.

When she was about to question him, Diablo suddenly teleported after Milim. (He’s actually with Rimuru.)

Even though she found it doubtful, since she had let him get away, she couldn’t explain it to the others.

Because she feels that she has always talked subjectively, it would only bring confusion to the surroundings if she spreads such uncertain information.

Testarossa told it as it was, restraining herself from mixing her feelings into it.

Silence ruled the control room.

Even Gerudo and Gabil, who should have been tired due to the combat during the day, didn’t open their mouths as they had serious expressions.

Kumara had a dreadful pale face and was trembling.

Benimaru strongly grasped his fist while suppressing his anger.

Ramiris looked like she was about to cry while facing toward the floor.

It might be a good thing that Shion, who has the shortest temper of them all, was absent at this time.

In such a situation,

「If I had come along, such a thing wouldn’t have――」

The one who is usually calm, Souei, who would never become enraged in any situation, broke a desk in anger.

Testarossa closed her eyes as she agreed with Souei’s words.

That way of thinking is common. She herself was feeling anguish as she was unable to do anything.

Therefore, she can’t rebut Souei’s words.

She only thought deeply about her own powerlessness.

At that time, Zegion who had crossed his arms and kept silent moved.

He stood up,

「Fools. What are you all pointlessly worried about?

Rimuru-sama cannot possibly be dead.

Oh Testarossa, do you think that Diablo is a fighter whose power would drop by such a degree only because he lost half his body?

Along those lines, is he a fool who would give up on avenging his master?

Why don’t you think that there is some kind of reason?

Too childish.

Why don’t you notice that he is trying to deceive us?」

He declared as such towards those in the room.

And, seeing each of their reactions, he continued talking.

「Think about it carefully. Then feel it.

Even now we are still receiving Rimuru-sama’s divine protection.

The connection has been interrupted, but that doesn’t mean it has disappeared.

You should all calm down and deeply feel for it.

All of you should be able to understand that we are being tested by Rimuru-sama.

We are not weak, to the degree that we need to depend on Rimuru-sama for everything.

In spite of that, if someone says that he can’t do anything if Rimuru-sama is gone――

Such a weak individual should just die.

Am I wrong, Benimaru-dono?」

Saying all of that in one breath, Zegion waited for Benimaru’s answer.

Testarossa, who had thought what Zegion had said, had a slight smile sprout on her lips.

It was not only Testarossa who felt that way. Everyone in the room agreed to Zegion’s words.

「That’s right-ssu! There must be some kind of reason for Rimuru-sama to disappear-ssu.

It’s no good for us to keep relying on him all the time-ssu!」

「Certainly, we have relied on Rimuru-sama far too much.

I think we are always entrusting everything to that personage.」(Gerudo)

「That’s right. Even I became uneasy just because Rimuru-sama is not here.

In such a state, we would be laughed at by Rimuru-sama!」(Gabil)

「That’s right! Well, since I always believed in Rimuru, I was absolutely not worried at all!」 (Ramirirs)

「Yes! For Rimuru-sama to be defeated, that’s impossible!」(Kumara)

Vigor returned to the room immediately.

Benimaru also agreed as he saw the situation. Certainly, we all have been too dependent on the Great Demon Lord, Rimuru.

If he thought back, it had been that way since they first met.

For it to be pointed out by the newcomer, Zegion, Benimaru has failed as Rimuru’s retainer.

「Sorry, Zegion.

It is certainly as you said. We can still fight even if Rimuru-sama is not here.

Rather than that……

I think we should quickly conquer this world and give it to Rimuru-sama once he returns.

Surely, we are not such mere children that we cannot do anything without Rimuru-sama!

Alright, we shall quickly end this war and then give this world to Rimuru-sama!」

Benimaru declared so.

Whilst agreeing to it,

「Good grief…… For me, of all other people, to lose my composure……

As someone who governs the shadows, I still have a long way to go.

Thank you, Zegion. Thanks to you, I have regained my calm.」

Souei nods while expressing his gratitude to Zegion.

「Don’t worry about it.

I will return to my position.

Benimaru-dono, leave the labyrinth to me, you can go on the attack at ease.

I swear that I will certainly protect Ramiris-sama and the people taking refuge within the labyrinth until the end.」

Benimaru nodded to Zegion’s words.

Yes, that’s right. They have the strongest guardian, that is Zegion, for their defense.

There is nothing to be afraid of.

And so, Tempest’s executives began to move.

Wiping out the anxiety from before, their expressions are filled with power.

And their determination shone as they wish for their strength be recognized by their master, the Great Demon Lord Rimuru.

Right now, they have reached the moment where they shall take flight from the protection of the Great Demon Lord[2].

* * *

[1] Da Warudo, Toki yo tomare! XD

[2] Be independent, so to say





Chapter 201: Preparations on Leon’s Side


The second day of the Great War.

El Dorado, the domain ruled by Demon Lord Leon Cromwell.

One of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Kagali, began to move.

After the Walpurgis ended, each of the Demon Lords returned to their own territory in order to prepare for the Great War, the Black Knight Claude also returned to Leon.

After parting with Chloe, it took a while to return due to his caution towards Yuuki’s notice.

Even if he took quite a while, from Claude’s point of view, it was very necessary for him to be extremely cautious.

He returned and requested an audience with Leon.

Obviously, Claude believed that the audience would take quite a while to take place, since there was a possibility that he is still brainwashed.

However, Claude was guided straight before Leon.

As such, he explained all of the events that happened up till now.

With the clone “Shadow Knight” left behind, he had continued to grasp the situation.

In other words, he knows about the “Crimson Purge” by the “Scorch Dragon” Velgrind; Yuuki usurping the Ultimate Skill『Justice Lord Michael』from Rudra.

As well as the discord between Demon Lord Rimuru and Yuuki.

He was able to grasp everything through his “Shadow Knight.”

His “Shadow Knight” was destroyed afterwards due to contact with the angel of “Armageddon” that Rudra activated. But it could be said that he had succeeded in gathering enough information.

For Claude, his utmost priority was to bring his intel to his master Leon, whom he has pledged his allegiance to, even at the risk of his life.

And his wish came true, Leon has now learned it all.

「Well done.」

Two words.

It’s a disappointing response. However, for Claude, those words were priceless.

「Those words are more than I deserve――」

Claude became overwhelmed with emotion.

However, he understood that it is not the time to be immersed in emotion.

And that is the same for Leon too.

The intel from Claude was more detailed than what Demon Lord Rimuru had explained at the Walpurgis.

“Does this mean Demon Lord Rimuru is trying to steal the march over the other Demon Lords?”

Leon couldn’t throw away such a doubt, but he judged that that was not the whole truth.

There was no contradiction between Rimuru’s and Claude’s information, his doubt about the exaggeration of the enemy forces was cleared up.

If that’s the case, it can be said that the enemy has gigantic war potential.

「Claude, do you think that we can oppose them right now?」

The Black Knight Claude is the strongest knight among Leon’s subordinates so he sensed some value in Claude’s opinion.

「I’m afraid…… I need to express my honest thoughts.

As the difference in the number of this side and that side is great, perhaps, at best we can oppose an army of 50.000 angels assuming we devote ourselves to defense.

Not to mention, if we tried to attack outside the city barrier…… defeat may very well be inevitable――」

「What do you mean!? Claude-dono, we would be defeated?」

「We are Leon-sama’s strongest knights. As if we would be beaten by the angels!」

Each leader of the magic knights got angry by Claude’s remark.

But, Leon suppressed them.

Leon closed his eyes and begin thinking. He thought that Claude’s statement was correct.

Even if he compared it simply based on the war potential, aside from the knight leader class who are on pseudo-Demon Lord class, the best that the normal knights could do would be fight against several angels.

Perhaps the angels who absorbed the people of the mixed corps that Claude affiliated with before may have fighting power which exceed A rank.

If the angel army, which only consists of such special individuals came, then his side would have the lesser war potential and numbers.

He could agree to the prediction, defeat would be inevitable.

(Do I have no choice but to strengthen the barrier and go out and attack myself? But, that’s a really bad move……)

Leon is thinking.

He figured that the chance of victory was low in the case that his subordinates clashed with Kagali.

After all, she seems to have fused with an angel of Seraphim class who has energy rivaling that of an awakened Demon Lord.

If it’s Kagali, who was the former Demon Lord Kazaream who had lived for several hundred years, it be no wonder even if she obtained the ability that can rival an awakened Demon Lord. Perhaps, there’s a possibility that she is better than that, or so Leon thinks.

In that case, there’s no other choice but for him to fight......

(But in that case, the preparation against the angel army itself is tough, right?)

That is the problem.

If he goes to fight by himself, Leon believes that he wouldn’t get defeated even if his opponent is Kagali, but at the same time he predicted that Claude and Co wouldn’t be able to oppose the angel army.

Not to mention, in the case that his fight with Kagali dragged on, there is a possibility that he would get attacked from the rear by the angel army after they destroyed his country.

It wouldn’t be a problem if he is able to deal with Kagali quickly, but that would be an optimistic outlook.

After all, Kagali knows of Leon’s trump card; Ultimate Skill『Purity Lord Metatron』.

It was a big mistake for Leon to let Kagali and Yuuki escape when he fought them before..

The tab now falls on Leon.

When Leon opened his eyes, he surveyed his subordinates.

The chief knight, Silver Knight Alrose.

The strongest knight, Black Knight Claude.

And, each knight leader who leads the four knight orders.

Red Knight Order… Magic Knights skillful in offensive magic belong to this order.

4,000 members. The leader is the Red Knight Fran. A woman.

Blue Knight Order… Magic Knights skillful in support magic belong to this order.

2.000 members. The leader is the Blue Knight Oxishan. A man.

Yellow Knight Order… Magic Knights skillful in defensive magic belong to this order.

3.000 members. The leader is the Yellow Knight Kizna. A woman.

White Knight Order… Magic knights skillful in recovery magic belong to this order.

1.000 members. The leader is the White Knight Maetel. A woman.

Those six people were the strongest of the magic knights.

They are people capable of defeating something along the lines of an Arc Demon.

As for Fran, she has matured into a person who can handle stronger magic as she has experienced “death” once.

They are a lineup of people who would not look inferior even if compared with the other Demon Lords’ armies……

(There might be a chance for victory if I order all of them to go fight and die. But――）

‘Go and die!’ if he ordered such, Leon knew that they would sacrifice their bodies for him with pleasure.

However, that’s why, it is an order he will never be able to give.

Then, what he needs to do――

「Leon-sama, a guest seems to have arrived.」

The clear voice of a woman reported to Leon, who was in his thoughts.

It is Kizna who is skillful in defensive magic, she perceived some people had trespassed the barrier.

And so, his problem would be settled instantly, by the intruders’ arrival.

The one who came was Mizari, the demon subordinate of Guy Crimson,

And, for Leon, she brought a shocking proposal.

「Leon-sama, I'm terribly sorry to bother you after the Walpurgis.

On this occasion, I received the will of my master Demon Lord Guy Crimson and came here.

‘Let’s cooperate for the Great War!’ is the message I’m told to pass to you.」

With a respectful bow, Mizari informed Leon.

Leon looked at Mizari.

She kneeled before his eyes, and bowed her head to Leon.

But, the impression he got from Mizari was stronger compared to before.

He can feel that her power has increased greatly.

She interacted humbly with Leon because he is a friend of Guy, but her ability seems to have come to rival an awakened Demon Lord.

(What exactly happened?)

He had that question, but he considered it reassuring since they’re not hostile with each other.

If there’s cooperation from Mizari, opposing Kagali might be possible.

「I see. I guess it’s no use to keep putting on airs.

Honestly, I’m saved. But, is Guy’s defense, okay?」

「It would be disrespectful for the likes of me to worry about that personage……

Besides, Hirari is still there.」

「I see, that is true.」

Certainly, it is unnecessary to worry about Guy who is the strongest in the first place.

To Leon who nodded, Mizari offered a proposal.

「By the way, Leon-sama, here is a proposal, would you like to hear it?」

「Alright, what is it?」

「Yes, actually――」

Mizari raised her face and with a sweet smile, she told Leon.

「Will you fuses your 6 colored knights with our 6 demon generals using the forbidden secret art?」

Mizari asked such, grew an evil smile suitable for a demon.

The place was thrown into a commotion.

The 6 demon generals are the arc demons brought along by Mizari.

It is not to the extent of calling them demon dukes, but Leon was able to perceive that they have power incomparable to the usual arc demons who accept summonings.

It could be said, as expected of Guy’s subordinates. Perhaps, Leon’s top 6 subordinates――as Mizari says, the 6 color knights―― might be equal to them.

They were formidable demons, it would be difficult to say which one is superior, the knights or the demons.

「What is your intention?」

Leon asked.

「I will say it honestly.

I believe that individuals with power only at the Arch Demon level won’t be very useful in the Great War beyond this point.」

Mizari declared such.

Alrose and Co got angry from her words which implied that they were useless.

However, two of them, Claude and Fran, understood the meaning of Mizari’s remark.

It is true, they are weak.

Even Alrose who is the chief knight wouldn’t be able to compete with just one of Demon Lord Rimuru’s subordinates after all.

That oni woman called Shion is not even the strongest among Rimuru’s subordinates. It’s certain that she is one of the high ranking executives, but in reality there’s others above her.

Claude pacified Alrose and Co who were enraged. Then, he urged Mizari to continue.

Returning the favor with a bow, Mizari continued explaining.

「Will this be alright?

Hirari and I had awakened as Devil Lords due to Demon Lord Rimuru’s ”Secret Art of Evolution”.

But unfortunately, we can only spread a trifling amount of that gift to our followers.

I think that is because of the fact that we couldn’t make a soul bond between us.

Even though they are individuals close to being independent demons, they are connected to us.

Because of this, I expect these ones may not be able to evolve further.

Therefore, using the forbidden “Secret Art: Human-Demon Soul Fusion”, I want to perform a reset for all of their relationships.

I want them to throw away their current bodies and dwell in new bodies.

It will fail if it is with a low-ranking individual, but there’s a possibility of success if it is with individuals at the arc demon class.

Besides, the success rate jumps up if it’s with people at the same level.

As for the demerit, one of the consciousness will vanish.

As for the merit, a stronger individual will be born from the unification of two beings.

They will reincarnate as an existence of demon duke class, a class which surpasses the former Demon Lords!」

Mizari finished her explanation loudly.

Silence descended on the room.

The demons having consented to it, are waiting calmly.

Alrose and the other knight leaders digested the words that had just been spoken and had a discussion.

They want power.

However, naturally it’s not something obtained in one day.

If they’re not able to impact the fight against the angel army with their current power, it would be better to accept the proposal.

However, in the case that their consciousnesses got swallowed up, that’d be more terrible than death itself.

Yet, even so……

「Leon-sama, I wish to accept this proposal.」

「Me too.」

When Alrose reported such, everyone else agreed simultaneously.

Needless to say, Claude and Fran had resolved themselves after hearing Mizari’s talk.

「Leon-sama, if by any chance, we lose against the demons, at that time, I ask for your forgiveness――」

As the representative of the 6 people, Claude told Leon so.

Leon closed his eyes and remained silent.

Then,

「I will not tolerate it. All of you must win. You all must acquire the demons’ power and then continue serving me.」

Leon muttered calmly after a brief time passed.

Leon’s words show that he has accepted Mizari’s proposal.

「「We swear to meet your expectations!!」」

Alrose, Claude and the other members lowered their heads all at once and swore to Leon.

Thus, Mizari’s proposal was accepted.

The ceremony was held.

The 6 demon generals and the 6 color knights stood in a row and faced each other.

Each of them faced and observed their partner who had similar abilities to themselves.

The ones who lose will be swallowed by their partner. Tense expressions appeared on the knights’ faces.

On the other hand, the demons remained calm.

For the demons, they only need to carry out the orders they received. They don’t feel any need to become eager whatsoever.

And then, the time came.

「Well then, the “Secret Art: Human-Demon Soul Fusion” shall now begin.」

At the same time Mizari that declared such, the demon generals converted their physical bodies into energy.

The secret art is possible because the demons are spiritual life-forms.

And, when the knights confirmed it, it occurred.

Mizari suddenly cut the cores of the demon generals with a single blow.

「I have certainly witnessed the resolution of all of you.

Now then, please receive it!

The gift from Demon Lord Guy Crimson.

Please acquire your new power without holding back.

Your desire shall become your power.

Let us pray that you all can obtain more power!」

Mizari shouted.

That’s right, everything was planned from the beginning.

If they challenged the ritual without fearing the loss of themselves, the demons were ordered to give their power to them.

Guy’s orders are absolute, nobody defies them.

After all, since their evolution had stopped, they understood that there is no other way to obtain further strength than this method.

However, in the case that the knights were afraid of obtaining new power, the demons were authorized to take the leadership in the fusion.

「Wha! What happened!?」

「Oh knights, fear not. We had all agreed to be absorbed by you.

As ordered by our great Demon Lord Guy Crimson.

All of you have shown us your determination.

Thus we have acknowledged that you all are the suitable entities to be entrusted with our power!」

「That’s right, all of you had better be quick, since our cores are already destroyed.

There is no time to spare until we are no more, you know?」

Persuaded by the demons, the surprised knights who had come to a stop, began to move again.

They each fused the demon’s power with their own.

Thus the ceremony finished.

They succeeded the ceremony of “Secret Art: Human-Demon Soul Fusion” safely without losing anyone.

Thus, the six knights had obtained the power of demon duke class.

The preparations on Leon’s side finished without a hitch.

And, the decisive battle was going to begin soon.





Chapter 202: Moderate Clown Troupe[1]


The first day of the Great War.

The day ended without anything happening.

The magic city was completely protected from the angels’ attack due to the firm defensive barrier that covers it.

Under the command of the Yellow Knight Kizna and the White Knight Maetel, whom had their power increased, the knights successfully poured out all of their power in order to reinforce the city barrier.

However, on the second day.

The angels who acted without any unity the day before, now began to concentrate their attacks in order to break through the barrier at one point.

Even though the knights had strengthened the barrier against it,several angels were able to invade through a small gap.

Due to several angels, the direction of the war would tremble greatly.

It didn’t take much time for the news to be brought to Leon’s attention. The knight was greatly alarmed when he came to report.

「There are only four enemies who have penetrated the barrier, but the inside of the castle is in chaos!」

The knight reported so and returned in order to confront the enemy.

However, a scream was immediately heard from the hallway, signifying to Leon that the progress of the war had turned against him.

「The Magic division will blockade the castle! Isolate all of the intruders inside the castle.

Don’t bring the injured near the castle. The knight leaders are going to face the enemy!」

Leon urgently issued a blockade of the castle with an isolation barrier and had the knight leaders go face the intruders.

He left the maintenance of the city barrier to the yellow knight order and the white knight order, he had the spare forces, that is, the red knight order, blockade the castle.

The remaining forces were just the blue knight order. Depending on the situation, he needs to decide how he will deploy them.

Seeing how the second day suddenly became so hectic, Leon was irritated.

( Hmm, although I thought that we would hold out a bit longer, I see that the enemy is quite strong.)

Leon left his seat.

He is also going to confront the enemy and check out the intruders.

However, it seems that would be unnecessary.

With a loud sound, the front gate was destroyed.

The large door of the audience hall became small pieces and the splinters scattered like dust.

And, the intruder magnificently appeared from amidst the dust.

「Hoooooohohoho. Nice to meet you, everyone!

I am called Footman.

One of the Moderate Clown Troupe, Footman the Angry Pierrot am I.

Pleased to make your acquaintance!」

A plump man with an angry clown mask appeared.

However, that clown talked in a cheerful tone, creating a strange atmosphere.

He seemed to be one of the four intruders in the report, but it seems to only be this man named Footman who was able to reach Leon’s throne.

Is he someone who has great confidence in himself or just a thoughtless fool?

「You scum, coming to this place on your own, don’t think you can leave alive!」

Alrose shouts.

Claude, who was guarding Leon, placed his hand on his sword and didn’t move.

Leon was thinking.

‘This Footman guy, does he intend to defeat me just by himself?

If he thinks so, his actions are really underestimating this side too much.’

Naturally Leon considered that he might have a different objective.

「Hohoho. Are you angry? Maybe you’re not getting enough calcium?!

By the way, do you know what calcium is?

Things like this contain a lot of it.

Because it’s a gift, please don’t hesitate to take it!」

Footman lightly threw something he had dragged along towards Leon and Co whilst speaking with a full smile on his face.

The object burst and scattered in the air and, with a ‘pop’ sound, white things were scattered near their feet.

Leon, Claude and Alrose understood what it was at a glance.

It was the ruined figure of the knight who came to report a while ago.

Alrose became more agitated.

Claude stopped Alrose, who was going to attack Footman, in silence.

「Wait, that guy is dangerous.

If there’s 3 more people like him, the people inside the castle are in danger.

Because Fran and the others will be here, you go defend inside the castle――」

While Claude was still speaking,

「Ah, you are here after all, Demon Lord Leon.

Ufufufufu. As expected, you won’t let yourself be killed by anyone besides me, right?」

One woman interrupted, whilst passing through the broken door and entering the audience hall.

She was a beautiful female elf. However, her expression was evil.

One of the current Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Kagali who was the former Demon Lord Kazaream.

And, following behind Kagali, two more clowns entered as well.

Claude and Alrose tensed.

It was not because they noticed Kagali’s strength. It was simply because they noticed the person who was being carried on the shoulder of a man wearing a teasing face clown mask who had followed her.

「You bastard! Release Oxishan!!」

Alrose boiled with anger.

That’s right, what that clown was carrying is their comrade, the Blue Knight Oxishan.

「Eh!? Why? Even though I had killed it with a lot of effort and trouble……

Hence, I am going to make this thing my doll.

Unfortunately, I won’t hear any of y’all’s complaints.」 (Teasing Face Clown)

To his arrogant manner, not only Alrose, but Claude too had a red face of anger.

Kagali seemed to be amused looking at their expression.

And,

「Now, now, don’t make them so angry.

Let’s taste the pleasure slowly. You all, redo the self introduction from earlier.」

She said so and laughed happily.

Her manner was clearly of a high-ranking person, in fact, the presence that Kagali gave off was stronger and couldn’t be compared to before.

Leon noticed this and frowned.

She is a troublesome opponent.

Because even though she knew Leon’s strength, she still has time to play around.

Is it because the subordinates that she brought are strong? Or, is it because she became stronger that she’s overly confident in herself?

(Tch, how troublesome. I should have killed her back then.)

He thought such, but it was already too late.

Because Mizari is hidden and ‘waiting to see the situation’ for the time being, Leon thought that she could become insurance in the case of emergency, but Leon couldn’t ignore the ominous vibe from Kagali.

Leon made up his mind that he needed to take care of his problem at this time, so that there won’t be any next time.

And, the 3 clowns began their introductions toward Leon.

The fat clown was the first to open his mouth.

「Hohoho. Although I said it a while ago, I am Footman.

One of the Moderate Clown Troupe, Footman the Angry Pierrot am I.

Demon Lord Leon.

I have a grudge against you because you destroyed Demon Lord Kazaream-sama once before.

And, above all, you have also committed the sin of letting my friend Clayman die.

I will kill you painfully because I am angry!」

Saying so, he bent his fat body skillfully and bowed, and then he moved to the side.

Following after him was a girl with a teary eyed clown mask who stepped forward.

With a big sickle over her shoulder, she greeted like she was joking.

「I am Tear.

One of the Moderate Clown Troupe, Tear the Teardrop (Teary Eyes Clown).

I dislike sad things. Kagali-sama’s enemies shall be eliminated by me!」

Declaring so, she skillfully spun the large sickle in a kind of blade dance.

The last one stepped forward taking over the spot.

He was the man with a teasing face clown mask who was carrying the Blue Knight, Oxishan, on his shoulder.

「Well then everyone. Today seems to be a good day.[2]

My name is Laplace.

One of the Moderate Clown Troupe, whom is called Laplace, the Wonder Pierrot (Pleasure Clown).

Best regards.

Here today, under the order of the captain Kazaream-danna――No, right now it’s Kagali-anego[3].

One of our members that had been sent as a Demon Lord has gone missing, regrettably[4].

Even so, that Kagali-anego said she was prepared for a chance for revenge like this.

Since we have a crackling grudge to y’all, please take care.」

Were the words he spoke.

On the other hand, Leon asked him.

「Moderate Clown Troupe? I don’t know it.」

「Oh my? Well, it is a barely existing organization after all.

I think you had assisted the person named Clayman, have ya already forgot?

He was called Clayman, the Crazy Pierrot, he was such a high spirited chap.」

The person who introduced himself as Laplace answered, and gave a disgusting wink.

And he grinned like he was making fun of someone and had a smile that mocked other people.

However, Leon’s eyes had seen through the man called Laplace as someone who you can’t be careless with.

He has no gaps.

Although he was doing relatively useless movements, They were all connected to his next successive move.

A master. They were the movements of a person who had reached the deepest level of skill, mastering all movements.

Leon felt that, perhaps, he could be even more dangerous than Kagali.

And, as the result of him calmly measuring the energy of the enemy, Leon confirmed that the 3 clowns brought by Kagali had all surpassed Demon Lord class.

As for Kagali, she’s above the average awakened Demon Lord. It seemed that he had been completely outwitted.

The angels outside were just decoys, Leon thought that they might be pretending to be the enemy’s main force.

When Kagali and Co invaded inside the city barrier, the angels outside had finished their role.

In other words, this means that Kagali has absolute confidence that she can defeat Leon and his subordinates.

(They’re really looking down on us......

But, if that’s the case then I ought to teach her her place once again.)

Leon stood up.

「Humph. There’s no need to remember any of you. After all, you all don’t have a future anymore.」

He announced as such.

And then the fight began.

From Laplace’s rear, the Red Knight Fran, who had approached while suppressing her presence, released her deadly strike.

A strike from Laplace’s blind spot with a sword clad in flame. Fran swings her sword with full confidence that it was impossible for the enemy to evade the strike.

However, surprisingly, Laplace easily evaded it without even turning around.

It shouldn’t be easy to perceive Fran who had hid and completely suppressed her presence whilst using magic power interference, even if『Magic Power Perception』 was being used to grasp the surroundings.

「Woops, that’s dangerous right.

Oh right, if ya leak such angry emotions, even a precious invincible spell would be ruined by that.」

Laplace spoke such aloof words whilst evading Fran’s attack.

Fran’s ability has been improved greatly.

The power of a demon duke class, the technique she had trained up until now. And then, magic.

She felt it was as if she had reached the peak as a magic swordsman.

In fact, it might be said that she has obtained the capability equal to the former Demon Lords. Yet, in front of Laplace, all of her attacks were completely seen through, it’s like he is beyond her grasp.

「Impossible! You can see my attack!?」

She instinctively asked the question,

「That’s right, it’s completely visible.

The movement of the eyes, the flow of the aura, the fluctuation of the feelings.

All are gathered at one point.

At least if you don’t disperse them, it’s like you’re telling me where you’ll aim next.」

Laplace answered, shaking his head as his sign of disappointment whilst looking down on her.

Actually, Fran’s movements are not a thing that someone can easily read. Laplace pointed out her habits, which she herself would rarely ever realize.

But even so, coming from Laplace, he could read Fran’s movements clearly, to the extent that he is able to easily grasp them.

That’s because of the difference in capability.

At the same time Fran fought Laplace, Footman also moved.

He moved swiftly like he wasn’t thinking about his fat body, he moved like he was rolling.

And then, when he snapped his fingers, several knights who had attacked him were suspended to the air.

「Hooohhohoho. It’s time for some fun fun fireworks you know!」

Footman in high spirits raised a jarring laughter.

And then, with ‘Snap!’ He loudly snapped his fingers once more.

In an instant, the bodies of the knights in the air began to swell and expand.

「Hii! Wha, what is this!?」

「Stop. Stop this!!」

They bulged and expanded, then――

Bam!!

Like that, all of them exploded.

Several knights were at their wit’s end as Footman killed them with bombs. Their own bodies swelled up like balloons.

「Hooohhohoho. Soooooooo fuuuunnnnnnnnn!!」

The knights understood that numbers wouldn’t have any meaning at this point.

The elites of the Blue Knight Order that followed behind Fran surrounded the intruders in a circle without approaching the enemy.

Claude ground his teeth at the situation.

The enemy’s force seemed to be stronger than he thought.

Among the four people, excluding Claude and Alrose, Fran was the one who had the highest fighting power. Yet, she was unable to land even a single hit on the devil called Laplace.

And, the knights were useless against that devil called Footman.

Claude judged that he and Alrose had no choice but to move.

He was worried about Leon, but even if he worried about his master who was far stronger than himself, there would be no point, as there was an even stronger collaborator, Mizari.

What he had to do now was to support Fran who was his comrade, he renewed his readiness.

「Leon-sama, I will also make a sortie.」

Once Claude had confirmed that Leon had given his nod, he began to move in order to help Fran.

At the same time Alrose also,

「Leon-sama, I am also going to go!」

He shouted and rushed out.

The remaining people were only Leon and Kagali, who sweetly smiled.

A dismal atmosphere drifted in the air, tension increased between the two people.

As for Claude and Alrose who had entered the fray――

Claude began supporting Fran, Alrose went towards Footman.

And, Tear was left behind, alone, but two knights stood blocking her.

The two were the Yellow Knight Kizna and the White Knight Maetel who came running over in a hurry, entrusting the maintenance of the barrier outside to their subordinates.

As each group found their opponent, an intense battle began.

* * *

[1] The title came from 中庸Chuuyou which means the middle way, the middle path, the moderate way. Which also reference the Four Books of Confucian: Doctrine of the Mean.

[2] Laplace talk in Kansai ben entirely. Its counterpart in English could be Southern Accent or Australian English

[3] It’s Female counterpart of Aniki which mean boss.

[4] You know, since Clayman had been rekt by Rimuru in front of all of the Demon Lords.





Chapter 203: Great Demon Lord Kazaream


Kagali laughed.

She laughed evilly.

Everything was going as she had planned.

She got her chance to have her revenge on that hateful Leon.

And now, that’ll be an easy thing to do.

The Silver Knight Alrose fought against Footman.

After he obtained the power of demon duke class, he received strength equaling the Black Knight Claude.

He became a half spiritual life-form with high grade immortality and regenerative power, he also obtained a stronger body.

Overwhelming magic power and energy enabled him to use high-ranking magic that he couldn’t before.

He was even able to activate advanced level magic without any need for a long chant.

He felt his power overflowing and tasted the feeling that he had peered into the world’s abyss.

And yet, Footman clearly showed that he was taking it easy against Alrose.

Footman comically moved his fat body and avoided Alrose’s sword strikes with quick movements.

And merely by snapping his fingers, his evil power attacked Alrose.

Footman’s ability is the Unique Skill『The Fat (Amplifier)[1]』.

The essence of this ability is amplification.

With a small energy wave, he’s able to amplify a material at will.

Thus, the knights who failed to resist were burst open and died after Footman amplified their bodies.

Snap! So he snapped his fingers, he was able to turn the sound into a shock wave and send it out.

He possesses a fiendish ability which doesn’t match his appearance.

The one who faced Tear were the two female knight leaders.

The Yellow Knight Kizna and the White Knight Meutel.

The two of them are very compatible.

Against Kizna with her prided iron wall defense and Meutel who has a godsend healing ability.

There could only be a few people who possess the offensive capability that is able to surpass their combination.

On top of that, since they obtained the power of the demon duke class, the two could brag and didn’t think that they could be defeated.

Facing them, Tear laughed eerily.

She brandished the large sickle she held in her hand while laughing.

Tear the Teardrop. That’s the name of the grim reaper who reaps life.

Her favorite food are tears of entreaty.

She loves more than anything to see the tears of someone who is asking for mercy[2].

Tear possesses the Unique Skill『The Ignorant (Optimist)[3]』.

Her ideal is just doing what she is told to do without thinking about anything else.

Just like her personality, her ability has a condition to activate, that is, all of her abilities will increase only when she receives an order.

But for her, that’s not a problem.

Because Tear is strong, even without relying on her ability, as she had an unyielding mind which never worried and a strong body from the very beginning.

Above all else, it is because there were always reliable comrades who gave her orders.

She doesn’t worry about anything.

Therefore, she gives death to her enemy even more brutally.

And, fighting against the last person, Laplace, is the Red Knight Fran and the Black Knight Claude.

The Red Knight Fran is strong.

Because she has experienced death once already, her energy rose greatly.

And, it bloomed by fusing with a demon.

The ability she obtained is called Unique Skill『Unshaken One[4]』.

Her mind will not be affected by anything other than the feeling of excitement.

A rather mysterious ability that increases her strength if she feels unrest in her mind.

The ability that can even turn emotions like anger and fear into power.

And now, Fran felt fury towards Laplace, who was carrying the Blue Knight Oxishan, who is her brother, on his shoulder.

She changed her intense emotions into gushing power as she glared at Laplace.

As the way it was at that moment, her sword wouldn’t be able to graze Laplace. She understood that, thus she turned her emotions into energy in order to keep a calm mind.

Since Laplace said that he was reading her actions from the waves of her emotions, then she just needed to make everything unperceivable.

While facing against Laplace, Fran pushed her ability to a higher level.

The Black Knight Claude is the strongest knight among Leon’s subordinates.

However, he holds no arrogance in his heart.

He experienced what the strongest person is like, when he was with Yuuki.

The “Hero” Chloe O’Bell――She is special.

As well as the high-ranking people of the Mixed corps.

A lot of Otherworlders were a part of the corps and it could be said that they all own troublesome special abilities.

They didn’t fight foolishly with just a sword, as they also learned the techniques to fight using all of their available abilities.

Fair and square, that is to say, a phrase that is only true when the opponent also stands in the same arena. However, in real combat, justice is only for the one who survives.

Understanding that, Claude even studied the way to fight people who are stronger than himself, and thus Claude changed.

He became greedier and wanted for more strength.

Fusing with the demon was merely an opportunity. In order to gain the power he desires.

And the ability that he acquired was Unique Skill『Challenger(Battler)』.

The exact power that Claude was hoping for, an ability which specializes in fighting.

Claude didn’t neglect his training and made the ability blossom. Time was irrelevant, as the power had answered his wish.

And at this time, Claude was able to meet an enemy who he could test his ability on.

Claude challenged Laplace whilst making a ferocious smile.

And then there is Laplace.

He is the strongest member of the Moderate Clown Troupe.

He possesses fearsome power that could even be called at the level of an extraordinary Demon Lord.

The power to foresee, he can see the future several seconds ahead of time due to his Unique Skill『Seer (Future Vision)[5]』.

And, with his Unique Skill『Deceiver[6]』, he can unleash phantasmagoric attacks.

It is as if he brings something into existence from nothing, a knife flies out from an empty space, whilst actually being a bomb that he disguised as a knife, and it ends before the enemy can understand anything.

High physical strength and combat senses.

And with his highly versatile offensive ability and perfect future foresight, he can be considered invincible.

He introduced himself as the vice captain of the Moderate Clown Troupe, but if compared in fighting strength, Laplace surpasses Kazaream, who’s the captain.

It can be said that his combat ability is beyond the former Demon Lord.

However, since he disliked the idea of being in a troublesome position, he didn’t want to stand at the top.

Happily hanging out with his fellow clowns was what made him happy.

Kazaream, who had been his captain, severed the ties between the two of them after he rose to be one of the Demon Lords.

The reason was simple, because Laplace would overdo things.

Since a temporary agreement had been made, quarrels between Demon Lords were forbidden.

If Kazaream needed to ask Laplace to help him, the situation could easily go downhill.

In this way, Laplace was aware that he was not helpful.

In addition, it’s in his nature that he will become unstoppable by seeing more blood.

His nature is the reason why he doesn’t have any intention to stand at the top.

Therefore, Laplace was kept as the final trump card.

And he was able to carry out his goal. He had done it.

Bring chaos to the world!

It was his dream to raise up an uproar of agonized cries and transform the world to become more chaotic.

He is a genuine lunatic, he might become interested in Yuuki if he had the chance to talk with him.

He had gained that goal because of a sorrowful event.

Clayman, whom he had had a close relationship with, was murdered by Demon Lord Rimuru.

Laplace who hadn’t had a goal, obtained the goal of his dead best friend.

He acts in order to scatter fear and chaos so to make the world a crazier place.

Kagali didn’t have any regrets about involving her subordinates of the Moderate Clown Troupe.

She decided that she needed their power since this battle was the final and decisive one.

If she had sent Laplace at the time when she was still Demon Lord Kazaream, the result may have been different.

If she had requested Laplace’s help, whose madness and ability were both authentic, she thought that she may have walked a different path by this time.

Clayman could still be alive as her right hand man, so Kagali thought.

However, all of those are no more than afterthoughts.

At that time, she was a conceited person and had completely underestimated Leon.

Even if she regrets it now, she should reflect and keep living, however……

The word ‘reflect’ does not exist in Kagali’s dictionary.

Because Kagali didn’t have any strong fellowship with the others, like Laplace, she didn’t feel anything when the weak were eliminated.

She only had a small thought that perhaps there was a path like that too.

Since she involved her former colleagues in this war, she couldn’t do things half-heartedly.

Even though her power increased greatly, she was anxious as she had few pawns.

Thus, she called her most trusted people and gave them power.

She introduced them to Velda and had each of them were given a large quantity of souls.

In the process they obtained Demon Lord Seeds and awakened.

Did Velda use some kind of technique? Since it gave them only the power they wished for, like magic.

Currently, each of them had been strengthened to that of awakened Demon Lords.

Leon’s subordinates, the knights, seemed to have had their power increased greatly, but of course they were still no match for Kagali and Co.

It was funny when she thought about it, as the knights who showed their best resistance were pitiful in her sight.

At the same time, joy filled the innermost depths of her heart, she unconsciously broke into a smile.

(Foolish people. They won’t be able to defeat us anyway.)

Thinking so, Kagali advanced towards Leon whilst basked in a feeling of absolute superiority.

Intense battles commenced, and the situation declined quickly.

The Moderate Clown Troupe were too strong.

If the knights hadn’t fused with the demons, they would have been defeated almost instantly.

Leon’s subordinates, the knights, were not able to compete at all against the overwhelming strength of the Moderate Clown Troupe members who were of the awakened Demon Lord class.

Rather Leon might praise them for the fact that they had not been defeated at this point.

The group Kagali brought was terrifying.

(The situation will only get worse if this continues.)

Leon analyzed the bad situation and ground his teeth.

And, more importantly――

「Ufufufufu. Leon, you will end here. Your subordinates don’t seem reliable either.

And yet, you haven’t become serious, even in this situation.

I have realized your weakness.

You are too soft.

When I watched your fight against Yuuki-sama, I thought of this.

‘This guy, he’s really a softie who can’t get serious since he is always protecting his subordinates’.

You make me laugh.

Unlike us, who don’t feel anything even if we sacrifice 200.000 angels, you intend to protect 1 million citizens.

Did you seriously think that you could win if the two of us fight?

No way, you didn’t think something immature like ’The desire to protect something will become power!’ right?

I investigated about how you created this city by gathering the oppressed people and orphans that you picked up.

Also, I analyzed your behavior so far.

Although you stand out with your villain-like speech and behavior, aren’t you actually a nice guy?

Yes, I understand.

I know that you want to deny it too.

However, no matter how you deny it, the fact that you cannot fight all out won’t change.

After all, your power is too strong, you would destroy this country if you fight seriously!」

――That’s right, Kagali’s words were true.

Leon’s ability, Ultimate Skill『Purity Lord Metatron』is a wide ranged type ability suitable for large-scale annihilation.

If he went all out, this magical city state would be destroyed from the inside.

And Kagali who anticipated that the angels would be blockaded on the outside of the barrier, infiltrated with just her group.

Against Leon, who can’t go all out, she prepared more than enough forces.

And now, the situation splendidly became just as how Kagali wished for it to be.

Kagali who was happy, attacked Leon whilst laughing.

Attacking as if to torment him, Kagali was having fun cutting off Leon’s path of retreat.

In order to clear her long time grudge, Kagali, who had reached the moment of her revenge, felt the greatest delight.

Kagali who fused both the powers of an awakened Demon Lord and the power of a seraphim class angel, became a genuine monster.

Even so, it didn’t affect her desire to see Leon cornered and play with him to the end.

And thus, she succeeded.

「Hey, how are you feeling now? I wonder what you feel at this point now that you’ve been cornered by the person whom you looked down upon.」

The God class one-handed sword that Kagali held cut into Leon’s Gold Circle.

Although he was barely able to deal with all of her attacks, Leon was gradually being overwhelmed by the difference in strength.

Although he thrust out his Flame Pillar, Kagali warded off the attack perfectly.

「Shut your trap. There’s no need for me to get serious against someone like you.」

Leon answered without getting agitated.

The odds were against him. Which was exactly why it was not the time to panic.

Leon is someone who had awakened as a Hero. He was certain that with just his basic fighting power he was capable of defeating Kagali without relying on his ability.

However, that was a story from long ago.

At this point Kagali had become a spiritual life-form. Which means, although her appearance was an elf, her essence was something completely different.

Kagali――Demon Lord Kazaream―― was originally a long range support type devil who excelled at rear support.

Manipulating his pawns, he would skillfully achieve his goal.

Hence, she knew well that she wasn’t strong enough to fight at the front herself.

Besides, if it was with her original Demon Lord body, she could fight at an ordinary devil’s level, but her physical elf body wasn’t suitable for fighting, she realized that when she was defeated by Damrada.

That was why, she reconstructed her body.

She completely dominated her body with Ultimate Skill『Dominion Lord Melchizedek』.

The current Kagali has the physical ability to be able to fight against Leon equally, and supporting her is『Dominion Lord Melchizedek』which provides her with high battle senses.

Thus, Leon’s attack didn’t reach Kagali, instead Kagali grew each time they clashed as she absorbed Leon’s fighting style.

For Leon, he was in a very bad situation.

Though Leon was speaking as if he still had composure to spare, but he immediately realized that the situation was indeed abnormal.

On the other hand, just like what Kagali had said, the situation did not permit him to go all out.

Impatience rose in Leon since he had underestimated his opponent too much.

At that moment, one of Kagali’s sword strikes finally grazed Leon’s flank lightly. Leon received a small cut due to the tip of Kagali’s sword entering a gap of his armor.

Kagali who saw that, smiled complacently as she laughed evilly.

「Ufufufu. Oh my, my my.

Leon, even for someone like you, are you finally unable to handle my sword?

My movement will become even faster you know? I wonder if you will be alright with that?

If you cry and apologize to me whilst prostrating on the ground and swear your allegiance to me, I will spare your life, you know?」

「Fu. Shut up, I don’t need to lower my head to the likes of you!」

「Oh dear, I thought that you would say that.

Well then――」

So, she stopped talking for a moment, and deepened her evil smile.

And then,

「I’ll make your beautiful face soggy with tears and covered with remorse!!

I’ll strip you bare, cut off your limbs, turning you into a Daruma doll, and then I’ll attach a collar on your neck and parade you around in front of the citizens whom you protected!!

Gyaaahahahahahahaha!!

It will be fun to see the despair on their faces once they see your miserable and unsightly self.

Even if they cry and beg for mercy, I won’t spare them.

I’ll slaughter them one by one in front of you, and at the end, turn them into dog food!」

She declared those words and laughed loudly.

「Hohohohoho. Wonderful!! As expected from captain!!」(Footman)

「Yes, so fun. I also like it!」(Tear)

「Indeed, I didn’t have that idea. I didn’t even think of that, what a brutal act!」(Laplace)

Hearing Kagali’s remark, all members of the Moderate Clown Troupe praised her highly in excitement.

Even Leon frowned when he imagined it.

He thought that even a low-life had a limit.

Kagali smiled and grinned,

「Ufufufufu. It’s okay, Leon.

Even if you destroy this country because you hate the idea of exposing your unsightly figure.

If you get serious, I too, am willing to be fair and square and fight with you seriously, you know?」

She provoked Leon with a sneer which was like saying “you won’t be able do it”.

Even if Leon chose to do it, it was not a problem for Kagali either.

At that time, she would beat Leon from the front and show off her strength.

Now, Kagali didn’t sense any threat from Leon since she felt she had become strong.

If she could break Leon’s high pride, she didn’t care what sort of means she needed to take.

Leon saw that it wasn’t a bluff from Kagali’s expression.

If that was the case, Kagali could actually be equal to him or perhaps even stronger than him.

In any case, it would be difficult to put an end to this without casualties from the citizens with the way the things were going now.

「Leon-sama, please don’t mind us!!」

「Against fiends like them, you mustn’t let them escape!」

Alrose and Claude advised Leon together.

They were in their own desperate situations, however they didn’t remain silent when Leon was made a fool of.

That’s right. If he was defeated, the people in his country wouldn’t remain safe after all.

(Forgive me, I will certainly kill this fiend!)

Leon steeled himself.

Either way, as long as he didn’t defeat these fiends, his citizens’ safety couldn’t be guaranteed.

Then he would do the only thing he could.

Thinking so, he was going to release his powerful power――

「Please wait, Leon-sama. You do not need to worry, I have isolated this castle from the city.」

A clear woman's voice made him regain his senses.

A Devil Lord named Mizari. Also, the woman who was working together with Leon now.

With Mizari’s ability, the castle was completely separated from the outside world.

Observing the situation, Mizari prioritized to take the most optimum action depending on the situation.

Thanks to her, the situation would change once again.

Kagali unpleasantly knitted her brows due to Mizari’s appearance.

「Ah? Aren’t you Guy’s follower?

You were able to act on your own will, heh.

I certainly thought that you could only move by Guy’s order.」

「It’s been a long time, Kazaream-sama.

I certainly thought that you had died on some plain, but that stubbornness of yours is the same as before.」

「Fu, fufufufufu. Nice speach, for a small fry who only hides in Guy’s shadow!!」

「You want to try me? Well anyway, it’s this side’s victory to buy some time.

Because I had asked Demon Lord Rimuru’s aid, the reinforcements will come soon.」

「Huh? Demon Lord Rimuru’s aid you say? Ku, kukuku, ufu, uhahahahahahahaaaaaa!!!」

Kagali burst into laughter due to Mizari’s words.

It became a very loud laughter as Kagali’s subordinates also joined in.

「What is so funny?」

Mizari asked her as she felt that it was strange.

「Ufufufufu. Demon Lord Rimuru has died you fool!!

That annoying Demon Lord is already gone. About this time, Rimuru’s subordinates must be in the midst of pandemonium!

Whether due to an unsightly internal discord? Or are they splitting and naming themselves as the new Demon Lord?

Either way, this matter won’t be settled quickly.

Of course, they won’t be able to be reinforcements. Do you understand?」

As one might expect, Leon and Mizari changed their expressions since Kagali said it triumphantly.

It was too unexpected.

For that absurd Demon Lord Rimuru to be the one who lost first, that wasn’t a story that they could believe so easily.

But, They didn’t feel Kagali was telling a lie going from her looks.

「Impossible!? That stubborn Demon Lord wouldn’t die so easily!」

「Rimuru-sama who was recognized by Guy-sama, that is impossible……」

Kagali who was filled with a sense of superiority due to the two’s reactions, answered them.

「Ufufufufu.

Oh well, it may be good to taste your despair.

This Great War, our victory is already set in stone.

If you want to know why――

It’s because Demon Lord Milim is the one who destroyed Demon Lord Rimuru.

Do you understand what this means?

The strongest beings, that is Demon Lord Guy Crimson and Demon Lord Milim Nava.

As well as that annoying Demon Lord Rimuru.

Among those three. Demon Lord Milim Nava is under Velda-sama’s control.

And, Demon Lord Rimuru is dead.

The remaining one that we need to be cautious of is Demon Lord Guy Crimson alone.

And even that Guy will face the strongest hero. And――

Ufufufufu. So, can you understand with this, right?

Mizari, you will die in this place without being able to see Guy in his last moments.」

It shocked Mizari.

And even Leon.

To those two,

「Well, let us begin then.

Leon can go all out if this place is separated from the outside world.

In that case I shall fight seriously as well.

And, the two of you shall know despair!

Saying so, Kagali―― No, Kazaream’s body changed.

From the beautiful elf’s body into her optimized original Demon Lord Kazaream’s body.

And then, with his gushing tremendous power he gripped Mizari and threw her to the ground.

For Kazaream, it was a simple warm up.

Mizari, who reacted late, received the attack directly.

Due to the collision with the tremendous energy, it seems she received some damage.

The close combat ability obviously also increased, if he was careless it was clear that Leon would experience the same thing as Mizari.

But, Leon had a smile on his lips.

「Don’t be conceited, Kagali. No, Kazaream!

I will bury you once again like before.」

Leon responded such.

If it’s in an isolated space, Leon can also fight seriously.

Mizari also had enough spare power, as she calmly took a stance.

Thus, in the castle that was completely separated from the outside world, the battle between Kazaream and Leon+Mizari began.

Leon decided that after he finishes this battle, he would check the authenticity of the story about Demon Lord Rimuru’s death and switched over his thoughts.

Mizari too, as she thought that it was disrespectful for someone of her standing to be worried about her master, Demon Lord Guy Crimson, she concentrated her focus on the enemy in front of her.

Either way, whether that story was the truth or a lie, Kazaream was the enemy they needed to kill.

　………

　……

　…

And so the two people, discarded their pride in front of the despairing difference of power.

The awakened Kazaream introduced himself as a Great Demon Lord.

And, he proved the power suitable to that title.

The two came at him together, yet they couldn’t defeat Kazaream.

One of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Kazaream, had mastered his ability and cornered Leon and Co.

Then――

As the fight became more intense, the second day of the Great war passed on.

* * *

[1] 増幅者(フトルモノ), Zoufukusha= the one who amplify/magnify. Futoru mono= The person who makes things fatter.

[2] Which means she is a Super S.

[3] 楽天家(ムチナルモノ), Rakutenka= Optimist. Muchinaru mono= Ignorant person.

[4] 無常者(ユルガヌモノ), Mujousha, Mujou=Mutable Sha=person/er. Yuruganu mono= unshaken-able person.

[5] 未来視(ミエルモノ), Miraishi= Future Vision, Mieru mono= the one who sees.

[6] 詐欺師(アザムクモノ), Sagishi= Cheater, Swindler, Azamuku mono= Deceiver.





Chapter 204: The Confused World


Day 3 of the great war, in the Holy City of Ruberios.

Shion eyed the incoming Dagruel forces, and a cold, dark smile surfaced on her face.

As she thought that the chance has finally come, for her to let loose all the frenzied furious anger that was within her....

On the first day of the great war, Shion along with Adalman and Albert were ordered by their master Demon Lord Rimuru, to move out to aid Demon Lord Ruminas.

Having visited when he was working with Gerudo in setting up the Transit Gates, Adaman guided their forces to Ruminas' castle; upon reaching, the atmosphere at the castle was unnaturally calm despite the fact that they were in battle with the angels.

Ruminas was "elegantly" relaxing, as she lounged on her couch.

And, towards Shion and the other guests,

「To think I would get reinforcements against that measly angel army, that Rimuru is quite the worrywart.

Sure, the humans would be in danger should we fall here....

But isn't this a little too overprotective?

Not even I expected something like this to happen so soon.」

She calmly and matter-of-factly addressed.

But....

「Rimuru-sama, has predicted that there would be an incoming attack here, from Demon Lord Dagruel who has betrayed us.」

She froze upon hearing Shion's reply.

Ruminas was confident that her forces can maintain their advantage against the angel army, but if Dagruel's forces were to come into play, that changes everything.

More so, the fact that Dagruel, one of the oldest pillars among the demon lords, has made his move; this isn't a situation that can be taken lightly anymore.

「Gather the others immediately! We're holding a strategy conference right away!」

With Ruminas' command, her followers, the 7 great nobles and ranking commanders, gave orders for the other key appointment holders to gather.

Right on the dot of nightfall, it was fortunate that the angels began to pull out.

Thanks to that, the other officers who were taking part in battles are now able to attend the conference.

Not wasting time, they gathered at the conference hall where a light dinner was prepared.

Representing them, were the 7 great nobles, the "Seven Celestial Sages", and the Holy Knight Arnoud.

The second-in-commands, knight squad leaders, along with any noteworthy majin who were nobles were amongst them.

Seeing that all who were relevant has arrived, Ruminas gave a short opening address, and declared the start of the conference.

And so, the meet begins.

Shion spoke first, speaking of Rimuru's predictions.

Then the movements of the angel armies, and the situations of the other areas.

Finally, finishing with Dagruel's movements, and what was predicted to be their goal.

「――no way.... If Demon Lord Dagruel is making his move, we are going to end up getting pincered from both the skies and on land.

As we have nothing to fall back upon, if we fall here the central countries will definitely fall shortly after!」

The alarmed Arnoud anxiously spoke out.

To him, who is one of the linchpins in the human defense forces, their current location can pretty much be called the final defense line.

In comparison, the monster(Ruminas/majin) side wasn't as disturbed.

At worst, the choice of forsaking this country and escaping is still a viable option for them.

Just like they have did once in the past, when this country was destroyed by Veldora. For they believe that there will still be somewhere out in the vast lands of this world that would accept them.

But, that doesn't apply for all of them.

The higher beings are all thinking about something, with a face that looked like they were chewing something bitter.

Ruminas was, too.

To protect the believers, who are citizens of the country, while simultaneously probing for a possible location for a new country, was what the nobles were suggesting; Ruminas was still thinking on the sidelines, while watching Arnoud debate.

It's simple to abandon the country.

For a monster such as herself, it's not too much effort to build another country from scratch.

But, if she were to flee, there's no guarantee the angels aren't going to pursue her.

Chances are, they will give chase. The opposition has every intent on wiping out all intelligent beings, having declared their intentions to destroy the world.

It's hard to imagine them letting Ruminas and co. get away.

Additionally, the odds of victory for them doing a full scale tactical retreat while protecting non-combatants is pretty much nonexistent.

「Silence.」

Which is why, with this single cold word from Ruminas, silence returned to the room.

「――to me, whatever happens to the humans, is really none of my concern.

They'll replenish their numbers shortly anyway, it's probably not much of a problem if their numbers are reduced somewhat, these are my honest thoughts.

That's if they manage to replenish, that is.

As the enemy has declared their intention to wipe out everything, there are no guarantees that humans will be allowed to survive.

For that reason, I have decided to protect this land.

This is by no means, something done for the sake of the humans.

Some of you are saying we should escape, but when it ends up with us alone against the angel forces, do you think we will be able to win?

I mean, think about it.

The other demon lords too, are fighting to protect their citizens and territory.

That, is something that can be called a "contract", but at the same time it is also the obligation of we who rule over these lands.

Guy is an exception....

Ramiris, Milim, Leon, and even the newcomer Rimuru are doing their utmost.

I too have such intentions.

This, is us demon lords putting our pride on the line, turning our backs to the angels is unthinkable.

The newcomer Rimuru, has noticed Demon Lord Dagruel's betrayal and has sent reinforcements already.

Instead, if we were to escape, it would be foolish to think we could ever live proudly again after that.

We, are not living for the sake of living.

It is because we live proudly, that we live as nobles, as kings.

Escape will not be forgiven.

Prioritize our victory, and start thinking of how we will achieve it!

Let victory be ours!!」(TN: gawd she sure talked alot)

「「「Uooooooooh!! Let victory be ours!!」」」

The conference room was wrapped on a silent fervor, and showed the unity of all present in an instant.

Now that Ruminas' intentions are made known to them, the monster followers very easily made up their minds and mentally prepared their resolves.

Ruminas' charisma as a demon lord was not just for show. She splendidly grasped the hearts of her followers.

And, without that fervor cooling down, the conference shifted to the discussion on their plan to engage the incoming attack.

In the end, it was decided to leave the bare minimum to defend against the angels, while redirecting everything else they had to face Dagruel.

Luckily there wasn't any noteworthy commander among the angels, which is also why they didn't have any tough battles for the day.

Nevertheless, there were crack troops being reorganized as reserves, so as to not be complacent in light of that.

As they have no choice but to engage on two fronts, it was decided for the reserves to assist whichever side that has the most trouble.

This reserve squad, now bears a heavy responsibility, having been given the important task of making the proper decision. Due to the shortage of reserve forces in the current situation, most reinforcements can't be relied on.

All the other demon lords have their hands full holding their own territory.

Ruminas' forces are in a more positive situation now, having received reinforcements from Demon Lord Rimuru.

If they were to be pincered by their foes from both land and the skies without Demon Lord Rimuru's aid, they would have been destroyed without the chance to even contemplate escaping.

Due to Demon Lord Rimuru's quick assessment of the situation, the aid and information sent to Ruminas has pretty much saved her.

(Fumu. Guess I owe him one, huh――)

On the inside, Ruminas was reluctantly accepting this fact. (TN: still so tsun tsun lol)

And so, the location of their final battle is decided, for Ruminas' forces which occupy the Holy City of Ruberios.

Against the angel forces would be Arnoud and his holy knight forces, plus the Bloody Knights who are led by the nobles.

The 7 great nobles, the ones known as the "Celestial Sages", would be their assault force.

Against the traitor Dagruel, would be Shion and her personal guard forces.

In addition, are Adalman and the death knights he leads.

Over the night, using his summoning magic, Adalman brought forth his followers from the Labyrinth.

It's not like he could summon *everything* he could muster up in one night, but having took on the task, he could manage to bring over a substantial force over if he had 2 days.

Dagruel and his forces were also travelling at abnormal speeds without stopping to even sleep, it was calculated that they would cross the deserts and invade these lands in 3 days time.

With that being the scenario, they will make it in time to prepare their defenses.

Making use of the transit gates that were set up, Shion's personal guard were also gathering up.

Of course, as they had priority on the usage, Dagruel's forces couldn't make use of the gates on their side.

Shion was giving orders to her forces to be on their guard, as they made their preparations for their upcoming battle with Dagruel's forces.

If things go smoothly, the decisive battle will take place on the 3rd day(of the great war).

With the plan in motion, the move to deal as much damage as they could to the angel army on day 2, was decided during the conference in the first night.

According to reports from their scout squads, the movements of Dagruel's forces were spotted as per the predicted timeline.

Showing their differences when compared to the human forces, Dagruel's forces move non-stop without a care for food or rest, maintaining their threatening speed.

But, as they moved at a constant pace, their time of arrival was accurately predicted.

Inversely, that also means the scouts held an important responsibility, as they are required to be able to keep up if there were any increases in movement speed.

For that purpose, Ruminas had the "Celestial Sages" take the job.

The reasoning for that was that they were highly skilled in plotting and gathering information, they are able to keep an eye on Dagruel's forces without being noticed.

Also, they had teleportation type abilities, so on the off chance that they were to be spotted they would still be able to escape and return to base.

The plan was for the "Celestial Sages" to switch over to their assault troop role the moment Dagruel's forces enter their territory.

With that decided, on the 2nd day, everyone but the "Celestial Sages" were to be combatting the angel army.

With the plan going well, they managed to greatly reduce the numbers of the angel army, which was using the same monotonous attack as the first day.

But, something unexpected happened as well.

During the afternoon of the 2nd day.

Velda made another appearance, towards the entire world.

『Allow me to enlighten everyone on the current situation.

My beloved daugther――Demon Lord Milim, has destroyed a pillar of the demon lords.

That's right, the one who perished was Demon Lord Rimuru.

Though he was a newbie, he was the demon lord who had the closest ties to the humans.

2 other pillars among the demon lords are old friends of mine, and have shown that they were willing to follow my lead.

The number of demon lords who are still against me, is but a measly 4 pillars now.

You are welcome to resist to the end, but for those who give up, they shall be granted a swift painless death.

So instead of wallowing in fear and despair, wouldn't it be better to just choose death?

The hammer of god shall be brought down on the 7th day, on every existing human capital.

Until then, you have my word that I shall intervene no further.

Do you understand the meaning of what I just said?

The ones who want to die without suffering, just stay put in the capitals instead of running or hiding.

As I am such a merciful being, I shall definitely keep this promise!』

Working the same way as when he did his declaration of war, a massive vision of Velda appeared in the skies and delivered his speech.

Shocks were sent throughout the world.

To the many capital cities of the Ingracia kingdom around the world, and to the capital of the empire in the east.

Many panicked and began their escape, while there was also the extreme minority that has accepted the end and decided to stay.

Now that the situation has been made known to every living being, the world was now swept up in a swirl of chaos.

The many leaders are too, stumped with the problems that the chaos is causing.

Having declared dropping the hammer of god on the 7th day, that also meant that the capitals around the world are safe zones until then.

There was no reason for him to lie at this point.

If Velda was in the mood, he could have dropped the hammer without saying anything. Him not doing so and instead stating a deadline, was perhaps to show that he really was as merciful as he made himself sound.

But Velda's *true* motive was probably that he found searching for loose ends to be too much of a chore. But then, even for those who noticed that, it's still a good and efficient choice to make use of the capitals as safe zones.

In any case, to guarantee the safety of their citizens, gathering in the capitals was a no brainer.

Inversely, it is also a double edged sword, as one wrong move and everything crumbles in one go. It was a bad gamble of sorts.

If the demon lords emerge victorious, their safety is assured and the remaining problems would clear out in time. However, if they are defeated, escape will be impossible at that point.

Then again, even if they are to escape from the capitals and spread out to the many corners of the world, the number of beings who are capable of surviving being constantly on the run is very limited.

Anyways, the fate of being found by meticulous trackers and then finally killed was very clear.

In fact, there are countries which are sending their defense forces against the sweeping angel squads that have appeared throughout the lands, there are already many uncounted casualties.

Before the start of the great war, Demon Lord Rimuru and the other demon lords have had talks, and the fact that the demon lords themselves are taking part in the war was known.

Demon Lord Ruminas took part in those talks, and it was decided that she and Demon Lord Rimuru were to take full charge of the defenses on the western front.

Which, brings us back to the current situation, where the civilian populace needs to depend on the power of the demon lords, to protect them from Velda who intends to destroy the world.

That finally brings us back to the point, as that is the problem the human leaders around the world are getting headaches for.

To them, their symbolic defender, and also the symbol of fear, is Demon Lord Rimuru.

As they have experienced, what kind of "death" that immensely powerful being is capable of unleashing.

To the world leaders, the defeat of said demon lord directly leads to the destruction of mankind.

What this means, is that the news of the defeat of Demon Lord Rimuru, brought unreal amounts of despair for them.

The fact that Demon Lord Rimuru disappearing this fast, was something that didn't cross any of their minds.

Even if he was defeated, pulling through no matter how many times he had to do it, was the image of Demon Lord Rimuru that they(the world leaders) held.

But that only amplified the despair that they felt.

(If the news of Demon Lord Rimuru's defeat wasn't made known, the capitals would still believe that the demon lords can emerge victorious――)

That, was the unfiltered thought process of the world leaders, in the current situation.

The reaction of the countries after hearing this information, was split into two opposing directions.

The ones who still believe the demon lords will be victorious, even after knowing that Demon Lord Rimuru has been "defeated"; and the ones who have decided to do whatever they want, with the assumption that the demon lords will be defeated.

For those who still believe in the demon lords' victory, they would be safest to stay in the capitals which have been declared to be safe from attack.

In the end, most of the western country leaders and the empire's important figures, are part of the side which believe in the demon lords.

Whatever happens, running around like a headless chicken won't get them far. If that's the case, staying away from the fighting and hoping for the best is still more ideal for them.

Moreover, for the beings who have closer ties to Demon Lord Rimuru, they find it hard to seriously believe that he really was defeated; this was the greatest reason why they(the human world leaders) have yet to lose faith.

To quote the words of a certain 1st generation committee leader――

『What bullshit is that. There's no way that fella would die this easily.

If he was such an easy opponent, he would have been destroyed by me a long time ago.』

――end quote.

The thoughts of many of the beings which had closer ties to said demon lord, were more or less similar.

Cunning and cautious, a bold demon lord who never fully shows his hand. There's no way such a demon lord would so honestly let himself be destroyed! And other such stuff.

Which meant, they were the ones who never believed that he would be one of the first to be defeated....

With the thought that he's most likely planning something, the ones who thought this way end up pulling up the weaker willed ones along with them.

This trend, was stronger for the ones who had closer ties to Demon Lord Rimuru.

It is said, that the king of the newly born country "Falmenas" and some of the surrounding countries, managed to easily protect their citizens and provide relief; they helped the stragglers in the vicinity and accommodated villagers, from the many small villages which surrounded their country, into their capital, displaying just how thorough they were.

『Haa!? There's no way the master would die that simply. That Velda fella looks like he's all talk, getting duped that easily.』

『I know, right. He's oh so underestimating that person, like I had in the past, looks like he's fully unaware of the ploy that's right under his nose.』

Such, was the recorded talks between the young king and his aged advisor.

These are some of the people who have close ties with Demon Lord Rimuru, and they placed great faith in him. They were the best representatives, of the beings who had absolute faith in the demon lords' victory.

This trend, was seen in many of the countries that surrounded the Great Jura Forest.

The Dwarf Kingdom, the country of Burmund and Sorcerer’s Dynasty Sarion count among these countries.

And the leaders of said countries reacted quickly to the news. They issued a "conference call" for all the other demon lord believers, and succeeded in tipping the scales of the minds of the other world leaders.

More than half of the western countries tipped in favor, and chose to believe in the demon lords' victory.

Even the empire which has only recently tried to invade the Great Jura Forest, showed their fealty to the demon lord side.

The perfect post war therapy by Demon Lord Rimuru during the period of turmoil after the emperor's death gave them the extra push that was needed.

The almost religiously fanatical explanations of the soldiers who returned to their surprised families probably contributed much.

The returnee soldiers spoke in unison,

『Defeat is impossible, for Demon Lord Rimuru-sama.』

They said as such.

The soldiers elaborated proudly, even though they were the ones who returned with disgraceful results from an overwhelming defeat.

Because of how unnaturally absurd it was, it inversely caused the empire citizens to believe the soldiers.

Although large scale confusions did happen, the swift response from the remaining empire leaders suppressed the civilian unrest within a few days of the occurrence.

This, would be recorded as a miracle during the great war, and talked about by future generations.

But, problems arose, from the other side.

A certain minimum number of the people, who are doing whatever they want on the assumption of the demon lords' defeat, exist everywhere around the world.

Sadly, most countries had to split some of their defense force, to keep these miscreants in check.

If this was also part of Velda's aims, it couldn't be helped that there will be some fools who end up falling for his ploy.

These people only think of themselves. Which causes them to make bad choices, even if it was during such dire times.

The world was currently falling into despair, as per Velda's intentions.

From it, confusion was borne.

With that, one of his objectives was accomplished.

One of Demon Lord Rimuru's followers, "Warlord" Shion. She worshiped Demon Lord Rimuru as though a god.

So when she heard Velda's speech about his "death", all she could feel was a blinding rage.

That rage, was about to awaken a certain unstable emotion that was supposed to have been sealed deep within her heart....

And that, was about to whip up a turbulent storm upon the impending battlefield.





Chapter 205: Vs Dagruel Part 1


Dagruel’s army had reached the Holy Kingdom Ruberios and kept on their march through its border.

And they mowed down all of the people who blocked their path and aimed at the Holy Capital with great vigor.

The Holy Capital was protected by a threefold barrier.

The large-scale magic essence warding barrier blockaded the city’s outskirts.

It was a barrier which obstructed the accumulation of magic essence to prevent outbreaks of monsters. However, it is naturally not invincible, just like in the present situation, there may be an outbreak of rare monsters due to the barrier’s destruction that might come to invade the city.

To prevent this invasion, an anti-monster defence barrier had been installed, which protected the daily lives of the holy capital and its surroundings.

As its name suggests, it was intended to prevent the invasion of monsters.

It was a barrier with a strong magic essence isolation ability, but it only had influence on a certain level of monster and weaker. It didn’t affect vampires, its true masters.

Its purpose was to protect the citizens of the Holy Capital from field monsters.

The Holy Knights usually patrolled between the first and the second barriers. And their work included searching for tears in the barrier and restoring them.

It was common knowledge that the Holy Kingdom Ruberios was protected by a twofold barrier, but the existence of the third one was only known by the high ranking people of the holy capital.

The Evil Purification Barrier.

It was the protection barrier of the highest level that had protected the sacred Holy Capital for a long time.

It was a barrier that could be called the perfected version of the holy field, the barrier which attacks monsters with the only exception of those registered with an identification code.

Everything inside the ramparts of the Holy Capital was within the scope of its influence. It was the largest-scale barrier of its level, but it still couldn’t cover the entire range.

Even so, it was the strongest barrier, worthy to protect the Holy Capital.

The transfer gate was established within the anti-monster invasion prevention barrier and outside the Evil Purification Barrier. The reason was because Ruminas didn’t want the subordinates of the other Demon Lords acting freely within the Holy Capital.

That was a reasonable argument, because not only it was troublesome to set and register identification codes for individuals, there was no guarantee that they wouldn’t be hostile by next time.

Therefore, the Evil Purification Barrier was applied to every monster with the only exception being Ruminas’ subordinates.

The effect was applied even to the high ranking monsters in Shion’s entourage.

Thus, Shion’s elite corps who arrived from the transfer gate organized themselves at the peripheral of the living area without entering the Holy Capital.

The battlefield was outside the anti-monster invasion prevention barrier.

It was the decision of the conference the night before.

The barrier was ineffective against the angel army ―― or rather, the anti-monster has no meaning against the holy attributed angels ――the monster army led by Shion and Co. were suitable to oppose Dagruel.

The ironic thing is that the Immortal Legion led by Aldaman, which could be considered evil itself, didn’t receive the effect due to『Holy-Demonic Inversion』.

However, it would be a problem if undead came and went within the Holy Capital like they owned the place, so that’s one of the reasons why Aldaman was assigned to the interception forces.

Tempest’s group will engage Dagruel, Ruminas’s group will suppress the angels.

That is the plan.

Immediately sensing that Dagruel’s army had destroyed the large-scale magic essence warding barrier that had stretched around the border, Shion notified the entire army.

As preparations were everything, Shion had finished stationing her elite corps.

The Immortal Legion which Adalman had summoned stood at the front in perfect order.

With 2.000 Death Knights as the main force.

The rest of the Legion’s composition was as following:

100.000 Zombie Soldiers (Carrion Soldiers).

20.000 Pawn Soldiers (Skeleton Soldiers).

10.000 Pawn Archers (Skeleton Archers).

10.000 Pawn Knights (Skeleton Knights).

There were such overwhelming numbers.

They were an army that had been created by Aldaman by using the corpses gathered from Great Jura Forest.

They usually wandered around the floors of the labyrinth, but they all sortied this time.

The 100.000 Zombie Soldiers are the monsters prepared urgently for this war. Most of them were once the soldiers of the Empire.

Deployed inside the labyrinth, the ones which had their rotten flesh neatly removed were the Pawn Soldiers.

Among them there might be those which were once adventurers who had died inside without buying a bracelet, but this was a rare example.

In preparation for this Great War, they had gathered the corpses which had been vacated by their souls, it was quite a large number.

As there was a possibility that they might evolve into a higher rank being if they are able to survive this Great War, they excitedly decided to participate in the war.

Thanks to that, the total number was a little less than 150.000.

Under Adalman’s rule, they received an ability increase effect. Furthermore, due to『Holy-Demonic Inversion』, they wouldn’t be affected by the effects of the barrier’s magic essence isolation.

Unlike inside the labyrinth, they cannot revive if destroyed however…… They won’t be purified by Undead Purification: Turn Undead.

They became such a dreadful existence, because as undead that had turned into holy attributed beings, they won’t be affected by Holy Magic.

And because they couldn’t die from normal attacks either, the only way to stop their movement is to completely destroy them.

And then, Shion’s elite corps.

10.000 Terror Knights.

Like the Death Knights, their strength was equivalent to “A-” rank. And after the previous battle with the Empire, they had grown stronger.

The true main force this time was Shion’s elite corps.

The only problem was that the commanders of the elite corps were the sons of the enemy leader, Demon Lord Dagruel.

Shion believed that Dagruel’s sons would not betray her since they had sworn loyalty to her lord, Rimuru.

However, even without betrayal, whether or not they could fight was another story.

「Hey you guys. The enemies are your relatives, can you guys fight them?」
